I'm not sure what this has to do with linguistics. This is more like the politics of censorship.

The only linguistics thing I can eplxain to you is that "GA accent" means "General American accent", but you probably knew that. Not sure what to explain "nigga" is just some phonemic rendition of how "nigger" is pronounced in a non-rhotic-accent like African-American Vernacular English and.. surprise surprise, when the next word starts with a vowel the rhotic resurfaces again.No, analysing the sentence we obtain:

- subject: "a total of $6,448"
  - head: "a total"
      - article: "a" (indefinite)
      - noun: "total"
  - adpositional phrase: "of $6,448"
     - adposition: "of"
     - noun phrase: "$6,448" (here I'm going to write it out in full to further analyse it")
         - numeral: "six-thousand-four-hundred-fourty-eight"
         - (composite) noun phrase: "US dollars"
             - head noun: "dollars"
             - dependent noun "us"
- praedicate:  "were raised"
  - finite verb: "were"
  - subject-complement: "raised"

The number of a complete noun phrase in English is always just the number of its head.Favourite one I know is Fluxbox, which doesn't say much because it annoys me, just less so than the other window managers I guess.

They should really add a way to hook up to it via d-bus or something as an alternative to this "fluxbox-remote" clu which is really clunky and apparently a security risk.Wayland isn't just a "better X", it sacrifices some good things about X.

Wayland seems to be pretty bad compared to X to write a portable application that can remote control your window placement for instance.&gt; When people in FOSS think something is crap, they usually rip and replace it. That has rarely required another project being persistently developed over time. I think it's okay to have a monoculture with the understanding that that monoculture may violently change in a couple years.

This relies on the assumption that "crap" is objective rather than subjective and deeply personal which tends to be the assumption people who are okay with monoculture tends to make.&gt; I think you think that somehow we are taking work away from white males and giving it to minorities and that's just not True.

Why isn't it?

I mean, the job would've existed without these programmes surely. And if the best person for the job just happens to be a white male, without these programmes it would've gone to the one who deserves it most, now, not any more.How can you know that concept is the reason if by your own admission you, or anyone, doesn't understand the concept?no, not I*

I mean "me made a bunch of scripts"?

No, I think not. Don't use disjunctive pronouns, people might think you're French.I totes did not see this coming.&gt; if Gentoo's not your thing.

And some people like ocular sex. Never met them though.&gt; It's like giving stipends to poor kids who can't pay for university

No, because _every_ person who is poor can't pay for university. At this point it's no longer based on a group-based generalization.

Furthermore, in that case it's not about "increasing the number of poor people who participate in academics". At this point it speaks to the individual, not the group.Really, then give me such proof?

I find it very hard to believe proof regarding any of this exists, in any direction. How are you ever going to have a controlled trial on this really?&gt; As with every response you'd made in this thread, you seem to be completely ignorant about all your "opinions". There are significant current social biases for hair, and historically they were very strict esp. for women.

Ohh, you're talking about retarded "social pressure" stopping people from doing what they want.

Well, I'm not, I'm actually talking about people not _hiring_ competent people due to archaic stereotypes.

The only person to blame for "social pressure" is yourself. IF you don't want to do something you'd like to do because "Muh social expectations" then that's your own problem to work on.

&gt; You are getting upvotes though, presumably by lots of random young white MRAs that are equally as ignorant. Enjoy pretending you are oppressed.

lolProof? statistics?Did you know that the word "nigger" was once not offensive and only started to gain that character around the 1880's? There are citations in British English from as late as the 1940's which still seem to use it in a sense which makes it hard to assume the author meant something negative with it.

The word "nigger" basically started out about as offensive as "laddie" is for "young boy".

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nigger#Etymology_and_historyMore like in the United States.

I honestly forget most of the time I'm not white in the Netherlands. It's not I, like, this country _very much_ makes it impossible to forget my gender and you definitely notice you are treated differently because of it. But unlike in the US, I've rarely felt treated any differently because of my skin colour at all. Hell, the few people that do make it an issue tend to be racial minorities and seem to find it some-what of a big deal.Not sure why this is downvoted, it's a thing that needs to be pointed out.

A lot of sociological research is unduly extrapolated beyond its original domain. These things _heavily_ depend on locus. Even "In the United Kingdom" is not specific enough. Sociology has a tendency to make extrapolations you just can't justify.&gt; In my opinion, if you use the command line it's easier than Ubuntu because everything is accessible through dnf instead of split across several commands - install from a local package, install from a repository, importing signing keys, etc. I have no experience with Arch so can't offer an opinion for it.

I never got why this is "easier". Is:

    apt-get install &lt;whatever&gt;
    apt-get remove &lt;whatvever&gt;

really easier than?
    
    xbps-install &lt;whatever&gt;
    xbps-remove &lt;whatever&gt;

A space instead of a hyphen. `xbps` puts install and remove into different binaries. Of which there are definitely some things to be said, such as allowing you to give different permissions to both files.There are many problems with X. But in a lot of Wayland discussions I see very few people actually demonstrating they fully understand the differences, I sure as hell won't claim that I have more than a superficial understanding becuase thee was no need for me to research it properly but from what I do know it is _definitely_ not the case that Wayland is just "a better X"The default Gentoo installation procedure uses only standard Unix tools.

All you need is internet, tar and chroot really. You can install it from a running distro if you so desire without any live system.

In fact, you don't need internet, you just need a way to obtain the stage-3 tarbal, the repository snapshot and the distfiles you need. The internet is the usual way but you can obtain them via pidgeon if you want.Four has "spiritual tendencies"?

Four was always portrayed as extremely devoid of emotion and any spirituality, he's very realistic, weighs the odds mathematically and then decides.

Which is kind of a welcome change to the usual "code of honour" stuff they give anyone who wields a blade. He's also not afraid to pick up a gun whenever a gun is more advantageous.Hurd has pluggable schedulers _while it's running_. You can seriously swap scheduler without a reboot.Looks like a nightmare to type on though.While runit on Gentoo certainly works, as in, I use it. The current ebuild is very flawed, installs asinine default configuration and you're completely on your own, packages also do not ship with `./run` files so you have to write those yourself, which is extremely easy though and anyone who says unit files are easy should give these a try. They are _super easy_ all the while retaining the extensive power of shell scripts.Well, I came here expecting someone who pointed out this runs plenty in PCMR being upvoted to the top, and I was right.

And I'm pretty sure that if someone posted this with "PC gamers in a nutshell" on some console fanboy board the same would happen and someone would say "As if we don't do this as well."

People are dumb, but not this dumb.&gt; Bullshit. There are poor people who manage to shoulder the burden of university even though they get no stipends while similarly poor peers of them get stipends.

Then that is dumb, I was under the assumption you meant that stipends would be given out the same to people who have the same income.

Obviously it is extremely stupid if you don't get the same.

&gt; And I don't understand your 2nd paragraph. How are those stipends not demographic discrimination?

They wouldn't be under the assumption that it was done under a system where "some getting them, but similarly poor people not getting them" would not exist.It excites yourself. I've found that a lot of the big things I've done in my free time, the ones that got finished the most were the ones that started as a small thing that gained more and more features until it was fairly big. Basically, the things that were already used for something when they got small. I'm sure a lot of people can relate to this.

Linux actually started as a super simple task switcher that Linus wrote for himself to be able to do two things at the same time.&gt; Whereas in comparison, Linux isn't going to get working btrfs without a restart-required update.

Why not? You can compile the module and insert it into the running kernel right?

Writing a new filesystem driver does not require a restart of the kernel as far as I know.&gt; Also Linux has the ksplice feature that upgrades the kernel without reboot.

ksplice can't upgrade the kernel, it can change some function definitions in a very rudimentary way, it can't add new functions as far as I know.

Basically, it can fix security holes and that's about it.&gt; [P]rostitution, adultery, necrophilia, bestiality, possession of child pornography, and even incest and pedophilia \u2026 should be legal as long as no one is coerced. They are illegal only because of prejudice and narrow mindedness.

&gt; Some rules might be called for when these acts directly affect other people's interests. For incest, contraception could be mandatory to avoid risk of inbreeding. For prostitution, a license should be required to ensure prostitutes get regular medical check-ups, and they should have training and support in insisting on use of condoms. This will be an advance in public health, compared with the situation today.

&gt; For necrophilia, it might be necessary to ask the next of kin for permission if the decedent's will did not authorize it. Necrophilia would be my second choice for what should be done with my corpse, the first being scientific or medical use. Once my dead body is no longer of any use to me, it may as well be of some use to someone. Besides, I often enjoy rhinophytonecrophilia (nasal sex with dead plants).

  \-- RMSWhy not?

You feel guilty for not buying DRM laden proprietary software? Like you seriously do?

Maybe, just maybe, I'd feel guilty if it was free software, not laden with DRM and I actually bought the software rather than a "licence to pay it", but at the moment I feel about as guilty as I would when I downloaded a car which had some stupid system on it that prohibited me from driving on roads they didn't want me to drive on and didn't allow me to put in the fuel I wanted or open up the hood and tinker with it to make improvements to my car. And no, not stealing, downloading, just getting a copy through the internet.

Yeah, that's about as guilty as I feel when I pirate modern video games.

Best part is, it's perfectly legal where I live.&gt; Sharing copyrighted intellectual property is theft.

Legally? Nope. It's copyright infringement which in most jurisdictions is a civil wrong, not a felony.

&gt; Why would the inclusion of a DVD ROM and a case make such a difference?

Do I really have to explain the difference between removing a physical good and making a copy of a bunch of bits to you or did someone already do that to you? I'm going to guess the latter if you actually tend to spill this around.Legally speaking, not really.

So let me ask you, do you believe piracy is wrong when it's legal to do so and the copyrlght has elapsed?

Life of the artist + 70 years. So tell me, is it wrong to publish Peter Pan which is now in the public domain without compensating the descendants of the original authors. And if not, is it then suddenly wrong 1 hour before midnight when the copyright has not yet elapsed, but suddenly not wrong any more 1 hour after.

And if so, then clearly you operate on the legal definition of wrong, in which case "theft" should be considered a legal term for purposes of this discussion.I 'd disagree, Mitchell is considerably less loose and more military than Crichton.

Farscape in general is considerably more "self-aware" than Stargate. I completely lost it when Crichton called Grayza "Commander Cleavage", usually when they do that stuff where they pull such ridiculous gratuitous cleavage no one remarks on just how absurd it is in fiction.Netherlands, there are multiple places where piracy is legal, which was actually the original way copyright functioned. Some states made things like piracy illegal, not the other way around.

Originally, the idea of copyright infringement was purely for commercial purposes. Noncommercial infringement was always fine. The idea was that they couldn't make money of your stuff without paying you. It was a way to give artists (mostly writers at the time) a bargaining point against publishers. It was a response to the invention of book pressing and mass producing books which required it.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Copyright_infringement#Noncommercial_file_sharingIf you want to make a legal argument, you lose, piracy is completely [lega](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Copyright_infringement#Noncommercial_file_sharing) where I live, copyright infringement for noncommercial purposes tends to be. Strange place, we also have legal drugs, suicide, prostitution, scary liberal place.Poe's law man, poe's law.What a fucking stupid debate. The best feeling on the planet is peeing when you _really_ needed to go and everyone knows it.You imply I would actually use the objective case as a __subject__-complement?

Of course I would say "It's I".Min-ChulI can't believe this is the first time I read this or think about this.

You'd expect this to be one of the most commonly repeated nonsensical things about Star Trek, but it seems like OP was largely the first to point out the silly nature of it.Probably one of the best ways to learn. Not necessarily one of the best distros to use as a daily system though.

And people who say that newbies can't install Gentoo and need to first get familiar with Ubuntu are talking out of their arse. You can perfectly well install Gentoo without any prior Unix experience, I know people who've done so, you just need to have the patience and willingness to read, it explains everything.\&gt; girl

\&gt; guy

More like "human being" and "ridiculous overparodied stereotype fo women" the fuck is up with the bottom anyway.&gt; EXT3 remove

My guess is that a lot of people who don't understand this are going to explode on the news item.&gt; Suspend doesn't always work when closing my laptop.

How is this related to either X or Wayland?Niggers... dudes, it's 2015. "Nigger"'s just become a generic term to say "dude", just like ... "dude" has become that. It used to mean uneducated shallow young bachelor or something like that.Funny isn't it, that when a basic modicum of quality becomes rare, people become "impressed" when companies aren't total scum.\&gt; crashed twice in two years 

\&gt; good

Let me guess, you run Windows?Same thing, don't go binary distro. Only Gentoo-Hardened.\&gt; implying steam is good instead of ridiculous anti-consumer crap.Not caring is sometimes strategic.

There's such a thing as realizing it's not smart to invest in an unattainable goal. It's the responsibility of the tournament to provide players with an incentive they cannot turn down to try their hardest. Relying simply on their "honourableness" to try their hardest, meh.

Reminds me, in WoL there was some showmatch of Ret versus the 4 best SEA players, but there was very little money on the line, so one did one of those tank drop strats at the time it was considered extremely strong to overpowered. So Ret just immediately typed "gg" and quit the moment the strategy was revealed. That's what happens when you don't give people a stake to win.

People bitched on Naniwa and Stephano too when they just did pathetic cheeses when the were already out of the tournament but were still required to play a game. But even if they didn't, they wouldn't try as hard anyway. It just gives plausible deniability, the tournament design just needs to ensure that as long as people still play games that they have a stake in winning.Not really, there is limited time to practice, if he fancies his chances so low that even with practice he stands no chance, he'd better spend that time practising for an attainable goal.

You're basically expecting this guy to risk his career for lost causes and romantic goals. He's practising for LotV because he has an attainable goal there, or so he fancies./r/pcmr in regards to steam is like it is in regards to Assassin's Creed. Praise it praise it praise it, and then they do something awful that screws them for the thousandth time and everyone is like "gee guys, we should be more critical." and then 2 weeks later everyone forgot again.Yeh, also, a lot of people on the defiant for no real reason all the time.

Like when they delivered the proof of the wormhole tampering with the defiant (which somehow could not be subspace-faxed because plot reasons), the entire senior staff takes that ship for some reason.You must be from the United States.More like the inverse. Foreigners live too much in the moment of single matches and don't treat practise and build orders like a resource.

Koreans, (and Naniwa) would frequently skip a tournament altogether to practice for a bigger one or one where they had a better shot.Well, why should he care? He has some obligation to care or something?

To him, Blizzcon is as meaningless as a tournament without a prize pool, he gets matched up in the first round against someone whom he fancies himself no chance of beating.I guess the difference is that they cancel in advance rather than providing a sub-part performance when they said they'd come. They definitely have that going for it, when they say they come they'll come even if they're sick.Xorg doesn't signal that, acpi does.

Maybe there is some weird thing in GNOME where it doesn't properly handle that when it uses Wayland for whatever reason.I'm seriously more "offended" by the guy censoring his words than his words. Like why on earth would you do that, what logic is behind writing "f\*ck" instead of "fuck"? He thinks kids won't get brain cancer from reading it this way or something?

It's just such a sanctimonious gesture.

Also """news"""Hmm, I find it kind of unlikely that this has anything to do with Wayland thugh

No doubt you can find out how GNOME handles this ACPI business, troubleshoot it and apply a fix. Of course, that would involve not being the  typical retard that actually uses GNOME and is incapable of fixing elementary problems like this, but who knows, maybe you're smarter than the average GNOME user.Seems like a legitimate reason if that is the one.These things in particular are why since I've actually decided to read up on Wayland I'm honestly not that much enamoured with what it's going to do. It seems to very much want to go into the direction of binary configuration and making it very hard to write simple, portable tools that for instance script and automate window placement like `xdotool` or `wmctrl` do now.That's whom I meant with "the guy".

I'm well aware Linus likes to put asterisks in random places to spare our innocent children the awful fate of brain cancer.&gt; This direction isn't actually very surprising since one of the goals of Wayland is to improve safety. The binary configuration also seems to fit the bill very well for full-blown DEs like Gnome or KDE.

KDE does not use binary config as far as I know,  GNOME does. GNOME stands for _everything_ that's wrong with the direction of modern Unix is taking to achieve this vaunted "year of the Linux desktop". It treats its users like children, it uses binary configurations, it thinks it's okay to some-how claim systemd as a dependency.

&gt; I very much like Wayland for its simplicity as a protocol. It's still early days, and I hope the situation will improve for minimal window managers as the work on libweston goes on. Hopefully there will also be some kind of a plugin system which most of the WM ecosystem could agree upon. That could be used to implement tools like xdotool, wmctrl or sxhkd.

Time will tell, for the moment, their existing is one thing, they also have to be portable and work across Wayland compositors, that seems to be the major problem.

&gt; Personally, as soon as libweston is in a semi-stable state, I'd like to go ahead and try to implement something like wmutils[1] for Wayland. I think it wouldn't be too hard to do and could serve as a base for other window managers as well. We'll see :)

Won't that just mean it'll work for Weston and not for other things?It's Latin for "I weed out" essentially.\&gt;using a pointing device to edit the image rather than editing the image directly with sed

Do you even Unix bro?I like how a lot of people assert this dogma that "buffs are better than nerfs" with no evidence to back it up while every time Blizzard attempted a buff it basically resulted in disaster:

- first infestor buff, tooks 4 nerfs to get it from not being broken
- queen buff
- immortal buff led to the glory days of sentry/immortal all ins all the timeTo be fair, I'm pretty sure that that's purely because there is no strong mill deck. The moment a strong mill deck that is actually good enough to bring to tournaments starts to dominate the ladder people will probably be far more frustrated with it than they ever were with aggro.A game like Dota can't hardly ever be "imbalanced", It has a pick and ban format. It's pretty hard to fuck balance up in a Moba.

In an RTS like StarCraft, if _one_ unit is only slightly too powerful you will get months of one race dominating tournaments. You can't just have a format where you can ban certain units, everyone would just trollface ban essential units.

Blizzard pretty much managed to produce the most balanced RTS games in the history of video games. They invented the concept of asymmetric RTS, or at least were the first studio that dared to do it when the belief was that such a thing would be impossible to balance and no other studio has yet been able to replicate a balanced asymmetric RTS like Blizzard.Because the FCC has randomly decided that "crap" is less offensive than "shit".

Ever noticed how US prime time television liberally features "screw you" but never "fuck you", both, literally and figuratively, mean the exact same thing but the FCC considers one offensive and not so much the other.WarCraft I and II were not asymmetric, neither were most of the C&amp;C games.

StarCraft I was probably the first RTS game that could rightfully be called asymmetric.That only shows the GDI tree, not the Nod tree.

Also, the WarCraft "different units" were almost purely reskins, they were mechanically identical but looked different.Except Weston is using client-side decorations which won't go well with anyone but the GNOME devs.With asymmetric RTS I mean that the different races you can pick have a radically different design.

In WarCraft and C&amp;C before it they were for the most part reskins of each other.&gt; There's nothing wrong with them buffing things a bit too much so long as they are willing to reel it back in. But Blizzard always seems to take a stance on their changes and are especially stubborn about going back on a change they made. I guess they are insecure about being wrong or something, but realistically they can't always know how things will turn out.

They're reverted many changes:

- The bunker is the most iconic example, the build time was constantly upped 5 seconds, then dropped 5 seconds and so forth
- The time it took to research stim was also constantly increased and decreased
- The Thor's ability became cooldown based with a really short cooldown, a massive buff that was eventually reverted to its old state again
- The Ultralisk's burrow-charge ability was added, and then removed&gt; Oh come on. The FCC didn't arbitrarily decide this. They made a rule based on societal standards.

Quite right, social standards arbitrarily decided it.

&gt; I seriously hope that if you're ever in a room with a 4-year-old, you would prefer "crap" over "shit" and "screw" over "fuck". 

Why not? You think it's bad for their health in some way or damages them? Gives them brain damage or something?AoE wasn't asymmetric, all factions had largely the same units with some really minor changes here and there.&gt; And yet every single non-nerd user I've seen use it loves it.

Where "non nerd" is a nice euphemism for massive idiot.

&gt; Normal users don't care about the nerd holy war against systemd. They don't care about binary configuration, provided they can change the config stuff that they need to (hint: they're not using emacs to edit config files now... but they will use a nice GUI tool for a binary config file!) They don't give a shit about whether or not they can change window tiling settings.

Agreed, though you might as well phrase it in a shorter way and say "normal users are fucking indifferent ignorant idiots."

&gt; They care about using their computer as a tool, as means to an end.

Ohhh, watching youtube and checking email and browsing reddit, guess what, you can do that on Windows too, no need for Unix there.

&gt; For these users, any time spent thinking about the DE is a failure of the DE.

For these idiotic users, yes.

&gt; I know this isn't how you want it to be. I know you want users to all care about the same issues that you do. But they don't.

I don't want them to care, I want them to be pitchforked out back to Windows. I don't see the use of all this "ohh, we have to increase Linux adoption" if that's just going to mean it's going to be as bad as Windows. What's the use then?

&gt; Mac OS X succeeded where Windows was failing because it "just worked". There's an important lesson to be learned from that, and GNOME has learned it.

Except Windows is way more popular than OS X and Windows also "just works". "Just works" is garbage anyway, it never works the way you want and it just reeks of a lack of perfectionism and lacking imagination.

&gt; Don't like it? Don't use it.

If only systemd wasn't on a crusade to make everything on the planet depend on it to force to "homogenize" the Linux oecosystem. This isn't some conspiracy theory, Red Hat and Poettering have openly stated that one of the goals of systemd was to bring more consistency. The point of systemd is massive adoption for the sake of getting the same thing everywhere.

&gt; But don't bash GNOME; they've created what might be the first Linux DE that looks good and is simple enough for your Grandma to use. That's a major accomplishment.

It's an accomplishment in the same way a door without keys so that the biggest idiots who are too dumb to know how a key works can still "operate" it, the downside it is misses the function of an outside-door.It's kind of typical of "Korean Culture" though, as in, everyone is all high and might about honour and values when people are looking, but behind your back a lot more shit is going on. I mean, obviously these are all averages and don't apply to everyone but in general it's often a case of people speaking high and mighty but doing the opposite when no one is looking.&gt; This. This right here is why people think the Linux community is full of asshole neckbeards.

Yes, people love to do that when they get told, however truthfully, that they're idiots.

&gt; Maybe the biggest problem isn't the DE design or the underlying daemon(s) or the display stack. The biggest problem preventing the "year of the Linux desktop" might well be the toxic elements of the community that treat people like dirt if they're not a power user or developer.

Maybe the problem is that you didn't read. Like I said, I don't give a shit about the "year of the linux desktop", Linux being popular means more idiots get in, and that abominations like GNOME seriously exist and all those fucking retarded GUI applets shows waaay too many idiots are already in.1. StarCraft winrates are objectively way more balanced than BW winrates. Like, BW winrates don't even come close to SC2 winrates in how close the latter are to 50%. I have no idea why people often say that BW was oh-so-balanced, it probably means they didn't play Protoss.

2. Blizzard has had essentially no involvement into the BW competitive scene and just "let it happen". The only involvement they had was that they officially sanctioned the GOM Classic which was purely because GOM was the only network to actually ask Blizzard if they could use their game. This was done for the symbolic price of 1 USD. Blizzard had no involvement in either building or killing the BW competitive scene. OGN/MBC/KeSPA just used their game and built something of it.This article seems to mostly compare it to sysvinit. Which is what is often done, which I don't get. The only distro that I can name which actually transitioned from sysvinit to systemd was Debian. Fedora and Ubuntu went from Upstart, Arch went from BSD-style init. Basically, sysvinit was pretty much dead before systemd became a thing.

I mean, yeah, you can make systemd look good by comparing to something which was already close to replaced before sytemd was as much as starting development. But try to make it look good by comparing it to an actual modern init. I mean, pretty much all it says is that unit files are brevier than old init scripts. Well yeah, pretty much every modern service management tool has solved that in one way or another. Some use declarative things like systemd and others use fully fledged turing complete scripts which can be kept super simple.

Also, the main criticisms on systemd are not that it's "bad", but that it does too much, I thought everyone knew that. The discussion is obviously centred on how tightly coupled these 70-odd binaries are in the end. Some argue they are uncoupled "enough" while others argue they are too coupled. I think most can agree though that they are certainly more coupled than the different GNU coreutils and certainly less coupled than the Linux kernel to its modules.The criticism on systemd is that it's good for companies, bad for the user like most "monolithic" software. Basically, the criticism on   lack of modularity is that it subverts the control the user has over his or her system. Which is not something the distro cares a lot about.

You'll also notice that no distro which is known for giving the user control over his or her system has mandated systemd. The only distros that have mandated it are known to shoehorn their users along rail tracks and those that made it optional but "as default" are some-what in-between.

Basically, people also criticize Windows day and night for what it does but it continues to do it. The interest of the user and the interest of the vendor don't always align. Poettering has openly stated that one of the goals of systemd was simply making the Linux-oecosystem more homogeneous. Which is nice for companies but takes control away from the user.

edit: Also, ever noticed how (with the exception of Arch Linux) sytemd has only been really adopted by distros which target users that most likely will never even notice what init/service system is being used and aren't expected to directly interface with it for the most part. Except for Arch I don't really know a meaningful distro that is both targeted at users who will be writing their own init scripts/units/whatevers and what-not and that has switched to systemd as a default.True, it's kind of ridiculous to say that most sysadmins won't notice the change. For better or worse.Arch gives its users very little control even compared to other binary distros, the only distro that gives it less that I have any knowledge of is Fedora. Arch is basically one size fits all:

- Bleeding edge
- OpenSSL as TLS implementation
- No SElinux
- Only one supported init (systemd), and thus with it only one supported login manager, one service manager, one supported session manger, one supported syslogger bla bla bla
- Only one libc: glibc
- Only one kernel: Linux
- Only x86

The only thing it offers choice in that other binary distros don't is bootloader really. Arch does not care what bootloader you use and I honestly don't get why Debian does care and tries to rub GRUB2 in your face because I see no reason why a distro should care and since multi-booting exists distros that care about your bootloader are supremely obnoxious, if you multi-boot and both want to force a different one on your MBR it turns into an ugly mess, of course.

I have the feeling the misconception that Arch offers choice stems from that Arch is minimal. Which is a different thing. While Ubuntu _by default_ offers a DE and Arch does not. Nothing stops you on Ubuntu from installing another one and removing the default one. It doesn't get in your way in any way and other window managers are in Ubunut's repositories ready to be installed with a single command. I guess this gives some people the idea that Arch offers a choice in what graphical environment you may pick and Ubuntu doesn't while in reality pretty much every distro lets you choose all those "higher level" applications as you see fit, some just come with a selection that is there by default. Enabling choice in there requires no effort from the developers whatsoever, just put the package in the repos, which is why every distro offers it.

Things like your TLS implementation, your libc and all that other stuff requires a bit more effort from the devs to support more than one and for them to make a commitment to ensure it actually all works with everything and some engineering inside the distro. Which is why not all distros go so far to support multiple libc's or multiple TLS implementations or init systems. Arch probably ranks at the absolute bottom of how little choice it offers in any of those things though.

tl;dr: "default selections" and "choice" are not exclusive.&gt; Yes, that can be done without systemd as well, but no Linux distribution managed to do that reliably enough to turn that on by default before.

What does "reliable" here mean? Like, not crashing? I've been running X as user for a year now with no problems.

I have the feeling that what you point towards is that systemd enabled it to run as user from a display manager or something similar rather than from `startx`. Most distros which fancy "defaults" tend to have display managers enabled in their default and don't like shipping a certain default configuration if it involves typing `startx` at a console.&gt; Hardware -&gt; Drivers -&gt; Display Server -&gt; Window Manager -&gt; Toolkit &gt; App

This is where it's wrong and lacks in detai. The "Window manager" part here doesn't add up. A window manager is just another client as far as X is considered. _any_ client can make calls to the server to manage any window. The Window manager does not sit at any special place at all. It's just another client.

This is what Wayland perceives as a shortcoming it wishes to rectify. There is actually in X no requirement to have a window manager at all. X perfectly well supports the possibility that each window manages its own placement and no window manager is used at all for that. That would be pretty awful but it's certainly possible within X.And systemd does not depend on the Linux kernel, just on an interface the Linux kernel provides.

Until there are specifications of said interface and multiple implementations. The two are indistinguishable. You can fight a terminology warfare like that with _every_ dependency.&gt; So how do you make sure a daemon managed by runit does not talk an the network

Not sure what this means, "talk an the network"?

&gt; will never spawn more than 5 processes any given time, ans not use more than 1GB of RAM?

With `chpst`, a modular utility provided by runit which can spawn processes with for instance capped resources, niceness subprocess caps and so forth.

&gt; How do you make sure it will never modify any binary or any configuration? How do you stop that daemon from even seeing any file in /home?

By using `chpst` to start it as a user that does not have those rights I guess.

&gt; All of the above are really easy with systems.

They are also easy with runit. The difference is that how runit achieves this goal is using a modular utility which does not depend on the rest of runit. `chpst`can be used outside of runit for whatever you want. In essence it does nothing more than starting a process within a specific profile to say limit the resources it can use or the rights it has.

That's the criticism of systemd in a nutshell, the facilities are interlocked, in runit they are modular. While runit provide its own pid1, its service manager, `runsvdir` which itself just spawns a couple of `runsv` processes do not depend on any particular pid1 or even root access. runit and openRC are both composed of modular utilities which do not assume the existence of the rest of the suite and as such I've easily been able to combine them to hack together my own system initialization which uses runit as pid1, OpenRC for initial filesystem checking and runit to monitor services with the exception of udev which is monitored by OpenRC again.

Note that I don't think systemd is bad at a lot of the things it does, I think it's actually pretty good at a lot of the things it does, I also think it's horrible at some of the things it does. And I'd just like to be able to pick only the parts I like and throw away the rest. And journald is most definitely a part I _don't_ like. So I'm sort of waiting until uselessd matures to give it a shot.There _is_ a lot of FUD generated about systemd, there's also a lot of legitimate criticism generated about systemd. The thing is that a lot of people make systemd "look good" by only attacking the ridiculous FUD some detractors come with while ignoring to answer the legitimate points.

Which is really nothing new. Politicians have known since ancient times that the easiest way to make yourself look good is to only answer the dumb criticisms raised by stupid people.&gt; It must be rough to hold all that contempt around. :) I remember a guy, Jim Gettys, he was the architect of X actually. He wouldn't talk to you unless he was introduced to you by someone he already knew. It was like the male chauvinist version Facebook/Linkedin. Ah, Jim , you are a treasure. Of course, we get along quite well, but I noted it all the same.

Not sure what this guy has to with me because I think: "He wouldn't talk to you unless he was introduced to you by someone he already knew. " is pretty fucking dumb. A lot of my friends happen to be friends with people whom I absolutely cannot stand, it's no guarantee.

&gt; Such attitudes are self defeating there is always someone you can learn from. Assuming people who don't know the internals of their DE or computer as somehow inferior says something about the person who feels that way. We are all ignorant on the things we don't care about. :)

Quite right, but then again, surely I have no desire to learn more things about the things I don't care about.Pretty much.

Someone else made an interesting observation though pointing out that the worst systemd detractors come with ridiculous FUD but the worst systemd defenders don't actually defend systemd as much as that they attack the worst systemd haters on a personal level without actually pointing out why sysd is good. And I think that tends to hold True surprisingly often.

Ever noticed how much of the defence of systemd tends to come down to attacking the personality of those who dislike it?&gt; Even on the console: root-less X11 on Linux depends on logind to manage permissions. Logind in turn depends on systemd.

How?

I'm pretty sure root-less X is older than logind.

&gt; The alternative is to manually adjust permissions in /dev: That can be done for a one user mashine, but you can not scale that up to something a distribution can ship and enable by default.

Yes, it is required for "sessions" and "seats" and differentiating "logged in" from "having the seat", that doesn't mean it's unreliable to run Xorg nonroot. It means that it can't implement "sessions" and "seats" and what-not. Which I don't use anyway systemd or not.

&gt; Anything a distribution can not ship is unreliable in this context. Sooner or later someone will trigger a corner case that will break the whole setup.

I don't think the word "unreliable" is what you're looking for. But simply "lacking features". I gain the impression that what you wanted to say is that logind is the first system that can implement seats and sessions for rootless Xorg.

I mean, yeah, I can ssh into my own computer and snoop on my own input events even if I'm not having a seat behind it at that point since I'm in the "input" group.I'm not sure I buy this, I can find a lot of synonymous, both hving harsh phonemes where one is mild and one isn't. How offensive they are also seems to depend on dialect often:

- Cock, dick, prick
- Cunt, twat, twit (one vowel difference, but very less much less harsh)
- cum, scum (some-how adding an s- makes a word meaning sperm completely all-ages)To be fair, it's been my nigh unfaltering experience that "authorities" are worth about as much. Especially in "soft" sciences you can often find two authorities which say the exact opposite. People often misuse their "authority" to give their vision on subjective things as if it were more commonly accepted within the entire community than it really is.

See the Tanenbaum-Torvalds debate about microkernels. Tanenbaum as the authority said something like "the debate is essentially done, no one takes monolithic kernels seriously any more, microkernels have won", I'm pretty sure you could find another authority at the time on Kernels who'd be like "There are still plenty of people who think there is a good use for monolithic kernels and the advantages of microkernels, while theoretically solid remain just that, theory rather than something proven in practice."

As much as from a theoretical perspective I find microkernels to be more sound, intuitively more robust and even just more "elegant", let's face it, the microkernel revolution that Tanenbaum forecasted didn't happen at all. There is no microkernel in large use still and the "hybrid kernels" that are in use are essentially just "We started out as a microkernel, but that didn't really work out so we didn't throw away what we had and just made it into a monolithic kernel."So like is this Xubuntu users or Xfce users?

Also, do you qualify if you installed a different WM than Xfce on Xubuntu or if you installed Xfce on mainline Ubuntu?

How many standard Xfce applications are you allowed to swap out for things of your own liking?

The problem with "desktop environments" and "distros" is that they suffer from the species problem.

Well, that's not the problem, that's the the good thing, it would be pretty annoying if you _had to_ use Gedit with GNOME and couldn't just uninstall that and use \u00fee olde Vim.It's not a problem of it not _working_, it still works, the problem is that the arch devs basically gave people 3 months to switch and said that after that point they would stop shipping scripts for it in their packages and depend on systemd in other packages.

Of course no one is using it or some of the other unofficial ones in the AUR if a lot of packages assume systemd exists.Waaat?

    $ mv oldname newname

Am I missing something?

Also, bonus points for command line do like:

    $ mv /long/path/to/old/name{,.bkp}

    $ rename \(.\).JPG \\1.jpg\&gt; "modern '''''year of the linux desktop'''' system"

\&gt; expecting to appease a user who doesn't want to waste time with useless BS and execute one quick command to do a lot.

Get with the time, we have to draw all the Windows idiots it by showing them Linux can be just as slow and frustrating as Windows if you really want.

I honestly feel a stronger affinity with NT users who live by PowerShell (which is legitimately really good) than I feel with Linux users who use their silly little rodent file manager to be slow.I use Fluxbox and use pretty much only keyboard, often my mouse idle times go into the hours. I remember once that it took me ~ eight hours after open up my notebook to solder some loose power contact to realize I had in fact not connected the touchpad and I was living without mouse for like half a day.

The things I use mouse for are the applications that need it, some with good reason. There's nothing wrong with using the mouse as a pointing device where pointing makes sense. The problem is when they force you to use the mouse to click "icons", you really do not need a pointer for that. If there are less than 60 icons navigating with directional keys is probably even faster, let alone just giving them a name, typing the name and tab-completing it.Current trends in distros catering to a specific breed of users who are well, let's call it "not exactly power users".

You will find that the above are common in virtually all distros  that cater to "power users". Or more specifically, (in this case excluding Arch), want control over their system rather than some "distro" making the choices for them.

Slackware is noteable because by choice it does not automatically resolve dependencies based on the argument that you can make your own choices regarding that. Sometimes certain "dependencies" are just not required to make the program start, only for certain functionality, which you may not use.

Basically, slackware by design does not do a lot of things you might not be aware of, giving you intimate knowledge of your own system. This contrasts king-of-cosutomization distros in the Gentoo-like family which, while being more flexible also automate quite a lot so you give up the intimate knowledge of your own system.

Another advantage of this is that in Slackware you will almost never pay the price for mistakes devs make. In virtually any distro you can pay the price because a dev made some mistake but in Slackware that is very rare. The system is designed so that it's very hard for the devs to make a mistake.

As a result, Slackware is _rock solid_ provided the system admin is rock solid.Hmm, never heard of it, reading up it seems to be used in some cars and mobile phones, yes.

Anyway, 0 or 1, it doesn't change the point too much, Tanenbaum stressed that monolithic kernels would basically die out in favour of microkernels and that certainly hasn't happened.&gt; ps: fluxbox is not a DE, just a WM with a menu right ? it's not comparable to windows graphic stack.

I always find this supposed distinction to be about as futile as the difference between a pile and a lump.&gt; Going by its man page chpst can do none of the things I asked. 

Then be more specific, you asked limit memory and processes which does not require kernel namespaces. Maybe you meant something more specific than that but just limiting memory and processes and time is something chpst does.

And I'm still not sure what "talk an the network" can possibly mean, it seems like a typo somewhere to me.
I'm not sure what this means.I don't think it's that binary. Chomsky would be a fool to not realize that people are going to lend undue credit to his political stuff simply by his status of being "famous". His boycott of Israel's conference with Hawking was obviously done because both men know the considerable gravitas their fame commands and they use it.

The issue is that it's impossible to not "use it" if you're that famous. Whatever you say is going to be taken more seriously than if you were a nobody so it's hard to blame them.What is "fancy input logic", and pretty much everyone uses GUI toolkits like GTK and qt surely?Well, then Fluxbox is a "DE" by your argument because:

- It has a keybinding file which is capable of both binding keybindings easily to its own operation as well as to arbitrary commands as well as hooking onto some of its own specifics like keybindgs only activating on certain workspaces or if certain tabs within windows are selected.

- It sets wallpapers and is capable of associating wallpapers with its own themes as well as different wallpapers for different workspaces
- It has a capacity to put icons on the background which are clickable and can be bound to things
- It provides a "root menu" which understands xdg and is capable of providing the user with "applications"
- it provides window decorations

While I agree that the strictest definition of "Window manager", as in something which _only_ manages windows and does not draw anything or provides anything else is quite clear. Usually when people say "window manager" this is a binary that does far more than that already.&gt; ChromeOS isn't for people like us who want more control of our systems.

If "us" is the average user of /r/linux then ehh.

Have any debate here about the inadequacies of GNOME and what-not and people jump left and right "omagad dude, the average user doesn't want control, just something that works, omagad, most people don't compile their own kernels, you're insane."Why do leaves fall? It's in their nature.And admittedly loaded as fuck. I mean, I'm basically pointing out my suspicion that these things are not defined at all.

It would be academically curious to not list the exact selection criteria and first define what "a Xubuntu user" really means and in the event that Ubuntu+Xfce does not qualify motivate why exactly that choice was made and what difference between both systems prompts such an interesting in that separation.&gt; Not all of us are keyboard centric. Yes the keyboard is faster if that is your main input. My way like many others is the mouse.

So you basically just agree with /u/BirdDogWolf 

I mean, you're basically just saying "You are right, but not all of us are quick".Okay, have fun with your contest of "being the quickest constrained in an environment which is ridiculously slow". It's like a speedwalking contest.Well, these two:

&gt; - use Ubuntu (14.04 or 15.04) as a Linux distribution
&gt; - use Xfce (Xfwm and Thunar) and Google Chrome/Chromium Browser

Are the ones I was talking about, none of those are atomic and clear and runs into the specifies problem. Especially considering FOSS and forks. How much of the source code can I modify for it to still be considered Xfwm? Distributions are not atomic either. Xubuntu is considered an Ubuntu derivative but how much may a derivative change to still be considered to fall under the loose umbrella term "derivative".Hmm, so it's not really about Xubuntu but more of a practical matter because Xubuntu hooks onto the PPA software?

Ah yes, I see, I thought it considered Xubuntu users the demographic.&gt; Also, as a former Xubuntu developer and user, I must say I don't quite understand the difference between Xubuntu and Ubuntu + Xfce :-)

Neither do I, I always wondered what the deal exactly was with Kubuntu and Xubuntu._if_ `ol*` singularly matches `oldname` then `ol[TAB]` which is the same number of keypresses just completes it which is a safer because it warns you when it doesn't match.So it's basically a process but the end result is the same?&gt; If their had been enough Arch developers wanting alternative init-support, there would have been.

And there weren't, that's why I say Arch isn't about choice. The devs don't give a shit about making choice possible and every X time retcon the "arch ways" and drag all their users along.

&gt; The vast majority of Arch developers simply didn't care at all about using anything else than systemd.

Exactly, so Arch isn't about choice.

Of course, you managed to turn "is arch about choice or not" to "is systemd good or not" like virtually anything ever you seem to turn into a systemd thing. Which wasn't the point here, the point was whether or not Arch offered a lot of choice, which it most certainly does not.For mouse users the Hurd's timeschedule is quick.

All hail the year of the Linux desktop, where we draw in all the Windows troglodytes by showing them that Linux can be just as painfully annoying, slow and obnoxious as Windows as long as you just install your retarded Cinnamon 2.8 desktop environment.&gt; Make sure the process can not modify anything in /etc or /usr, even when running as root. Make sure a service can never ever steal the SSH keys of the user, even if an attacker manages to run arbitrary code through that service (even as root).

This really sounds like a condition of "solve my problem the way that systemd solves it", the problem is that it can't modify those files or access those things. "root" means "give it all the rights humanly possible" in traditional Unix parlance. The way to solve it is to make a user that doesn't have that access but does have the access you want and run it as that user in runit, being closer to traditional Unix design.

No, you can't do what you want as far as I know while still making it run as root, but having it run as root isn't the goal.&gt; Well, first of all it showed, just like the GR vote on Debian, that the overwhelming amount of developers wanted systemd. The state of Arch Linux is simply a reflection of what their developers want.

Which clearly isn't _choice_.

Note that Debian elected to still make their old init available and supported rather than forcing a different init. Also, the majority of Gentoo users and devs want sysvinit+OpenRC but systemd is available and fully supported, why? Because Gentoo is committed to choice.

&gt; Secondly, this is not how open source work; developers that aren't paid work on what they want. "Choice" always imply work, and if nobody are willing to work on such choices, they won't materialize.
It is a major problem for the systemd-opponents that they are such a tiny minority with so few developers willing to work for them.

You have a knack for making things about systemd which aren't about systemd do you?

And yes, they don't want to work on enabling choice, which is why Arch is not about choice, unlike say Debian or Gentoo where the devs are committed to making obscure use cases available like kFreeBSD, alternative C libraries, hardened kernels and a variety of obscure architectures because the Debian and Gentoo devs have an interest in choice, the Arch devs do not. They like to just railroad their users along a set path.

&gt; It is one thing that eg. Debian is using systemd as default, but no group of "Sysvinit" proponents have stepped up and offering to do major maintenance work to make it possible for Debian to continue to also support Sysvinit.

Debian continues to support sysvinit and will do so for quite a while. Ubuntu also continues to support upstart.

And again, you seem to have magically turned a discussion of "is arch about choice or not" into "is systemd a good thing or not" where systemd was just one of the 7 examples of where Arch does not offer any choice.&gt; Will this help people who have moved across from windows? Yes.

The point is that you assume that it's wise to "help" these people rather than chase them away with pitchforks.

There's such a thing as idiots ruining it for others you know. More idiots in Unix means that more software is going to be accommodated towards them. I mean, take a basic program like cheese, it's pretty annoying to use because it caters to idiots. Now, you might say "So someome can write a program that does the same but isn't.", but here's the problem, no one is going to write it if cheese already exists and is "good enough", that's the problem, if the first person who makes a program that fullfills a general use case makes it with an interface tailored to idiots, people probably aren't afterwards going to replicate the functionality just to get around the obnoxious interface.

So yeah, idiots _do_ ruin it for others. It's not as simple as just "ohh, you can ignore the programs tailored towards idiots", no, these programs simply _existing_ takes away the motivation from people to get programs with a proper interface that do the same thing.Nigga pleez. The average /r/linux user seems to seriously use ridiculous things like GNOME and Cinnamon. I always thought that was just some weird parody BS meme nonsense but apparently people actually seriously _use_ that crap.

What's the point of switching from Windows if you're just going to repeat the same recalcitrant interface, but hey, now you can say you're free \*cough\* proprietary drivers \*cough\*. &gt; Yes it is. "Choice" is also about "choosing" not offering alternatives. Again, some people think that OSS is like a candy shop where everything is free and you can just mix any bag of sweets from all the shelves. But as said, in the OSS world choices only happens if somebody wants to work on such choices. And for various reasons, few are willing to work on alternatives to systemd.

It was pretty clear that in the purposes of this discussion  of my explaining why Arch wasn't about choice when someone asked the idea was explaning why Arch did not allow you very much to tailor your system to your own specific needs.I don't understand this post in relation to my comment.

What I'm saying is that your challenge was "How do I achieve this on runit while the system still runs as root" and my response is "By not running it as root, this is just how runit achieves what you want here". Unless you need to run it as root for some reason which I don't understand, the only reason I can see to ever run soemthing as root is to give it every right humanly possible. Which you didn't want already becuse you wanted to limit some things.I didn't invent the term "rodent" though I am quite fond of it.

It's just in general a way to refer to the mouse getting in your way because some random application which has no solid keyboard-only interface when there is no justification mandates it. You know, because the connotation of "rodent" is that it's a pest and mice are rodents. I quite like it.

Few things are as annoying as applications which otherwise do a decent thing force you to rodent for no apparent reason. I'm talking to you PlayOnLinux./r/linuxmasterrace:

\&gt;complaining about forced updates

\&gt;using Arch LinuxThat sentence is misphrased. It's not hard for them to make a mistake, but it's hard for that mistake to be forced onto you against your will or accidentally.

Slackware doesn't automate much, packages don't go fiddling with your system like on other distros.There is nothing "special needs that no one else has". Arch Linux is the most popular distro on this sub in the last poll.

Please don't act like GNOME troglodytes are the majority, they just venture into this thread because Cinnamon 2.8 news item. The majority of Unix users still have brain cells and steer far away from shit like that. But if Canonical can help it they'll all come streaming in with their rodent interfaces.If you ever want to install anything ever again yeah.

Officially, installing a package on arch without first doing a world update is unsupported.I don't, usually. I just got dragged into a discussion which started to be about something else.

Anyway, any inferior rodent user I can scare away with "waah waah linux elitism" is a win for the cause.No, it's not within Debian or Ubuntu which are "versioned releases", as in, it's fully supported that all packages within a specific "version" work together and don't break, but you can't combine packages from different versions.

Arch has no version, or rather, it has micro-versions, you can effectively see Arch as that every new update of the repos every 24 hours constitutes a new "version" so versions are basically tiny slices in Arch.

The reason why Debian and the lot need versions and can't just go rolling is because of the shared-object problem. The shared libraries that specific packages are compiled against, since they are compiled against specific versions of the libraries which generally can't just co-exist it has to be like that, when the version is upgraded the shared libraries can all be upgraded and all packages for the new version are compiled against the newer shared libraries.

Arch solves this problem by always compiling it against the latest shared libraries thus requiring that your shared libraries are always up to date to the latest, this is where `pacman -Syu` comes into play.

Debian is just "updating is nice because newer software (that is stable) is better. Arch is "If you don't always keep your shared libraries up to date then you get a linker error when trying to load the program and it won't run."

Source-based distros like Crux and Gentoo which were the first rolling distros solved it in an entirely different way. Since you compile your software locally on your system it is always compiled against whatever shared library is on your system. This also requires a recompile of all stuff compiled against specific libraries whenever a library is upgraded, I don't know about Crux but I know Gentoo handles this automatically.

The downside of the source-based approch is obviously long compile times. The upside is that it's extremely easy to mix and match old and stable with bleeding edge software. You can't keep an Arch system frozen while keeping a single package up to date and bleeding edge. With Gentoo this is not a problem. Within Debian this can only be done within a specific version.RHEL is targeted at those users?

Doesn't that like ship with GNOME by default?&gt; Arch perfectly allow you to tailor your system including using Upstart/SysVinit/OpenRC whatever. It is just that people don't care to do so.

No, it does not, because the packages:

- assume systemd exists and depend on many of its interfaces
- are compiled against glibc
- are compiled against OpenSSL

You can't just swap any of those things out on Arch and expect stuff to still work. I'm sure not all are but for the most part when systemd's d-bus exports are missing on Arch applications will complain and/or crash because they're compiled to expect them.

&gt; Another meta-distro, Gentoo, works the same way: it only has one default init-system, OpenRC, and that is the only officially supported init-system. It is entirely up to the systemd "herd" to maintain their software stack so they can use systemd as their init system. In short, the do they work so choice exist, and if the systemd "herd" stops maintaining systemd in Gentoo, it will disappear as a choice too.

No, Gentoo has two "offically supported" init systems. sysvinit/OpenRC and systemd. Note the contrast, virtually no one who uses Gentoo uses systemd but it's there and officially supported because Gentoo _is_ committed to choice.

Now, "officially supported" in Gentoo means little more than that init scripts/unit files for either respectively are provided by the packages. As Gentoo is a source-based distro and not a binary distro, stuff is compiled locally on your system and will thus not crash on any pid1/service manager. The downside is however that for any service manager other than OpenRC/systemd you're going to have to roll your own service definitions.

systemd in Gentoo is officially supported by the devs, not the community. There are systemd-profiles selectable at install which will automate setting the appropriate use-flags and properly compile a fully functional systemd.

&gt; Arch Linux is all about choice, including the choice of using only one default program because all the Arch developers agrees that is the best and nobody bothers to make an alternative.

No, Arch is the antithesis of choice. Like I said, other distros offer you a choice in different libc's, different SSL implementations, different kernels, different sysloggers, cron daemons and what have you. Arch offers exactly _one_ of all of these.

&gt; Again, no work, no choice.

Yes, the devs do not put in work to enable choice, devs of other distros do. You can run Musl on Void Linux, it's officially supported and the devs are commited to keep it work.To rid Unix of all the rodent-lovers and restore it to its rightful glory of course.

I shall found a glorious Unix state where managing files with rodents is punishable on pain of death.Exherbo obviously if you just do it to try something wild.

That or NixOS because it works totally differently.Most of them are death anyway already.

But if they were alive, they'd be deadened once more to serve as an example that no one shall manage files with rodents and get away with it.&gt; No, only OpenRC is the officially supported default init-system. It is entirely up to the systemd/runit/whatever "herd" to maintain their stack. If people stop working on systemd, the Gentoo project is under no obligation to fix problems or still maintaining it.

No, it's not. Systemd is fully supported by the Gentoo team with a default profile and shipped unit files. Every ebuild in the default gentoo repository comes with an accompanying unit file.

https://wiki.gentoo.org/wiki/Systemd

&gt; And you are wrong about Gentoo people not using systemd to any significant degree, and I thoroughly expect them to switch over to use systemd as default when they are finished making the infrastructure necessary to allow make the switch in a streamlined way.

You have never set foot on the Gentoo forums have you?

Virtually everyone there and on the IRC channel _dispises_ systemd.

You don't know what you're talking about and in general have a tendency to have a ridiculously biased and rose-coloured view on systemd. Systemd is fully supported in Gentoo as an init system and used by about 10% of the users or something.

&gt; All this is entirely made by those who wants systemd when using Gentoo. If the systemd "herd" disappears, so does the systemd support, simply because other Gentoo developers have no obligation at all to take over the support. They would have if they had a "commitment" to choice; then they would have to support systemd whether they liked or not.

No, it isn't. _every_ package in Gentoo regarldess the maintainer must ship with a systemd unit file which is literally the _only_ extend systemd support in Gentoo goes to. Gentoo, being a sourced-based distro, having an rc supported means nothing more than a service description file being shipped with the packages. At the moment this happens for OpenRC and systemd and no others. _every_ package in Gentoo must be shipped with systemd unit files, that's a guarantee they make at this point, and that is all the support entails. There is no further development needed because Gentoo is a source-based distro with USE flags that keeps packages very close to upstream. Upstream has compile-time options for systemd, or it doesn't. This contrasts a binary distro like Arch where those options are enabled, then the binaries are transported into the repos.

&gt; That would be because Arch Linux developer choose not to work on any such alternative.

And because Arch developers tend to choose to not work on such alternatives Arch is not about choice. Debian, Void and Gentoo developers do.

&gt; Besides, Arch Linux have at least 3 different syslog implementations and last I checked they had several different libc implementations including eglibc, dietlibc, musl.

Source? There is nothing on the Archwiki on Musl and as far as I know Archlinux does not support it.

&gt; They also have both OpenSSL and LibreSSL, but since the latter conflicts with the first, and little software supports LibreSSL (not OpenSSL compatible), they have to use statically linked packages. LibreSSL simply can't coexist with OpenSLL so they have no other choice.

Void Linux is a binary distro which supports both Open- and LibreSSL, they simply provide two binaries, they compile it twice against either.

&gt; They also provide OpenRC and other initsystems, they just aren't officially supported.

THey don't provide it, it's in the AUR but it won't work with any package which is compiled against systemd expecting systemd to be there.

&gt; So choices exist in abundance in Arch Linux. Not sure where you got the idea that they didn't.

That there is absolutely nothing to be found about it on google or on the Archwiki, no page on the website whatsoever that explains how you can run Arch with Musl.&gt; \#DO NOT EDIT WILL BE OVERWRITTEN

This is typically the syndrome of distros setting up automated stuff that overwrites this. If you want to absolutely avoid this, go Slackware. But for the most part you can disable this stuff I guess.

I'm personally not a fan of automaticlaly generated config files.The catch is that you don't have to move to the mouse to select a file first.

Also, oldname is tab completed of course.&gt; If you\u2019re __a software developer, laptop or home user, hobbyist, enthusiast, or student__, Fedora Workstation is perfect for you. Fedora Workstation includes the newest release of the __GNOME desktop__,

lel.Will be the same if successful, whatever differences exist will likely be not noticeable.

This is under the assumption that it's successful. These things purely exist because believe it or not, Unix is infested with aneuploidic wastes of meiosis who seriously lack the intelligence to install a piece of software. This probably being the driving force behind the success of GNOME in and of itself. Quite. These things seriously spreading the impression that the "DE" is not anything more than a program that is installed like any other. Can be changed without a reboot or if you're fancy, keep both at the same time running besides each other.Live kernel patching is like one of the most misunderstood overhyped things ever.

Also, I'm sure you can compile your own kernel and turn it on again if you want it. I'm sure Fedora has the sources of their kernel around some-where. It's just a standard thing you can turn on or off in the kernel.&gt; Yeah, but I don't make the mistake of confusing a small group of toxic systemd haters on Gentoo chat with the Gentoo community that also include systemd developers with commit access.
It is a classic mistake for the systemd-opponents that they make themselves believe they are more people than they really are; it is just a small group of people endlessly posting anti-systemd posts. They are all talk an no code, so developers are simply ignoring them, preferring to code systemd support instead of refuting a constant stream of wrong info or wacky conspiracy theories.
So some people are in for a rude surprise when Gentoo changes to systemd as default init because the majority of Gentoo developers want that. They won't give up on OpenRC, but it just won't be default anymore.

So how on earth have you managed to turn a discussion on Arch offering choice or not into one your typical systemd adoption crusades?

&gt; See the package here: https://www.archlinux.org/packages/community/x86_64/musl/

... that's to build busybox which is used inside initramfs. That doesn't replace your standard c library.

You can't just install a a libc and expect it to work, you do know that every single package has to be compiled _against_ a specific libc right for it to work or you get linker errors?Yes, it's kind of annoying how those comments sometimes don't put that there, sometimes they do though.

But if you want to be completely free from this shit, go Slackware. Slackware is a venerable bastion of Unix, it's so Unix it grows filthy messy beard hairs across its filesystem.\u00ddou do know that microkernel and small resource consumption are completely unrelated thing, right?If there was a way to check the boxes "correctly" the boxes would not exist.

The boxes exist because they're subjective choices.It never existed?

People like to act like these things used to be better, come one.&gt; insert some Ray Kurzweil statement about how we're going to be robots in 10 years.

I think it's more like that the people who come with the sensationalist claims tend to _become_ famous because of them.

Can't speak too mich about Kurzwell, but take Carl Sagan as an example, he really hasn't done that much in Astrophyistics but his continued pushing of boyhood space programme dreams have sort of _made_ him famous.I'm not sure what this has to do with linguistics. This is more like the politics of censorship.

The only linguistics thing I can eplxain to you is that "GA accent" means "General American accent", but you probably knew that. Not sure what to explain "nigga" is just some phonemic rendition of how "nigger" is pronounced in a non-rhotic-accent like African-American Vernacular English and.. surprise surprise, when the next word starts with a vowel the rhotic resurfaces again.No, analysing the sentence we obtain:

- subject: "a total of $6,448"
  - head: "a total"
      - article: "a" (indefinite)
      - noun: "total"
  - adpositional phrase: "of $6,448"
     - adposition: "of"
     - noun phrase: "$6,448" (here I'm going to write it out in full to further analyse it")
         - numeral: "six-thousand-four-hundred-fourty-eight"
         - (composite) noun phrase: "US dollars"
             - head noun: "dollars"
             - dependent noun "us"
- praedicate:  "were raised"
  - finite verb: "were"
  - subject-complement: "raised"

The number of a complete noun phrase in English is always just the number of its head.Favourite one I know is Fluxbox, which doesn't say much because it annoys me, just less so than the other window managers I guess.

They should really add a way to hook up to it via d-bus or something as an alternative to this "fluxbox-remote" clu which is really clunky and apparently a security risk.Wayland isn't just a "better X", it sacrifices some good things about X.

Wayland seems to be pretty bad compared to X to write a portable application that can remote control your window placement for instance.&gt; When people in FOSS think something is crap, they usually rip and replace it. That has rarely required another project being persistently developed over time. I think it's okay to have a monoculture with the understanding that that monoculture may violently change in a couple years.

This relies on the assumption that "crap" is objective rather than subjective and deeply personal which tends to be the assumption people who are okay with monoculture tends to make.&gt; I think you think that somehow we are taking work away from white males and giving it to minorities and that's just not True.

Why isn't it?

I mean, the job would've existed without these programmes surely. And if the best person for the job just happens to be a white male, without these programmes it would've gone to the one who deserves it most, now, not any more.How can you know that concept is the reason if by your own admission you, or anyone, doesn't understand the concept?no, not I*

I mean "me made a bunch of scripts"?

No, I think not. Don't use disjunctive pronouns, people might think you're French.I totes did not see this coming.&gt; if Gentoo's not your thing.

And some people like ocular sex. Never met them though.&gt; It's like giving stipends to poor kids who can't pay for university

No, because _every_ person who is poor can't pay for university. At this point it's no longer based on a group-based generalization.

Furthermore, in that case it's not about "increasing the number of poor people who participate in academics". At this point it speaks to the individual, not the group.Really, then give me such proof?

I find it very hard to believe proof regarding any of this exists, in any direction. How are you ever going to have a controlled trial on this really?&gt; As with every response you'd made in this thread, you seem to be completely ignorant about all your "opinions". There are significant current social biases for hair, and historically they were very strict esp. for women.

Ohh, you're talking about retarded "social pressure" stopping people from doing what they want.

Well, I'm not, I'm actually talking about people not _hiring_ competent people due to archaic stereotypes.

The only person to blame for "social pressure" is yourself. IF you don't want to do something you'd like to do because "Muh social expectations" then that's your own problem to work on.

&gt; You are getting upvotes though, presumably by lots of random young white MRAs that are equally as ignorant. Enjoy pretending you are oppressed.

lolProof? statistics?Did you know that the word "nigger" was once not offensive and only started to gain that character around the 1880's? There are citations in British English from as late as the 1940's which still seem to use it in a sense which makes it hard to assume the author meant something negative with it.

The word "nigger" basically started out about as offensive as "laddie" is for "young boy".

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Nigger#Etymology_and_historyMore like in the United States.

I honestly forget most of the time I'm not white in the Netherlands. It's not I, like, this country _very much_ makes it impossible to forget my gender and you definitely notice you are treated differently because of it. But unlike in the US, I've rarely felt treated any differently because of my skin colour at all. Hell, the few people that do make it an issue tend to be racial minorities and seem to find it some-what of a big deal.Not sure why this is downvoted, it's a thing that needs to be pointed out.

A lot of sociological research is unduly extrapolated beyond its original domain. These things _heavily_ depend on locus. Even "In the United Kingdom" is not specific enough. Sociology has a tendency to make extrapolations you just can't justify.&gt; In my opinion, if you use the command line it's easier than Ubuntu because everything is accessible through dnf instead of split across several commands - install from a local package, install from a repository, importing signing keys, etc. I have no experience with Arch so can't offer an opinion for it.

I never got why this is "easier". Is:

    apt-get install &lt;whatever&gt;
    apt-get remove &lt;whatvever&gt;

really easier than?
    
    xbps-install &lt;whatever&gt;
    xbps-remove &lt;whatever&gt;

A space instead of a hyphen. `xbps` puts install and remove into different binaries. Of which there are definitely some things to be said, such as allowing you to give different permissions to both files.There are many problems with X. But in a lot of Wayland discussions I see very few people actually demonstrating they fully understand the differences, I sure as hell won't claim that I have more than a superficial understanding becuase thee was no need for me to research it properly but from what I do know it is _definitely_ not the case that Wayland is just "a better X"The default Gentoo installation procedure uses only standard Unix tools.

All you need is internet, tar and chroot really. You can install it from a running distro if you so desire without any live system.

In fact, you don't need internet, you just need a way to obtain the stage-3 tarbal, the repository snapshot and the distfiles you need. The internet is the usual way but you can obtain them via pidgeon if you want.Four has "spiritual tendencies"?

Four was always portrayed as extremely devoid of emotion and any spirituality, he's very realistic, weighs the odds mathematically and then decides.

Which is kind of a welcome change to the usual "code of honour" stuff they give anyone who wields a blade. He's also not afraid to pick up a gun whenever a gun is more advantageous.Hurd has pluggable schedulers _while it's running_. You can seriously swap scheduler without a reboot.Looks like a nightmare to type on though.While runit on Gentoo certainly works, as in, I use it. The current ebuild is very flawed, installs asinine default configuration and you're completely on your own, packages also do not ship with `./run` files so you have to write those yourself, which is extremely easy though and anyone who says unit files are easy should give these a try. They are _super easy_ all the while retaining the extensive power of shell scripts.Well, I came here expecting someone who pointed out this runs plenty in PCMR being upvoted to the top, and I was right.

And I'm pretty sure that if someone posted this with "PC gamers in a nutshell" on some console fanboy board the same would happen and someone would say "As if we don't do this as well."

People are dumb, but not this dumb.&gt; Bullshit. There are poor people who manage to shoulder the burden of university even though they get no stipends while similarly poor peers of them get stipends.

Then that is dumb, I was under the assumption you meant that stipends would be given out the same to people who have the same income.

Obviously it is extremely stupid if you don't get the same.

&gt; And I don't understand your 2nd paragraph. How are those stipends not demographic discrimination?

They wouldn't be under the assumption that it was done under a system where "some getting them, but similarly poor people not getting them" would not exist.It excites yourself. I've found that a lot of the big things I've done in my free time, the ones that got finished the most were the ones that started as a small thing that gained more and more features until it was fairly big. Basically, the things that were already used for something when they got small. I'm sure a lot of people can relate to this.

Linux actually started as a super simple task switcher that Linus wrote for himself to be able to do two things at the same time.&gt; Whereas in comparison, Linux isn't going to get working btrfs without a restart-required update.

Why not? You can compile the module and insert it into the running kernel right?

Writing a new filesystem driver does not require a restart of the kernel as far as I know.&gt; Also Linux has the ksplice feature that upgrades the kernel without reboot.

ksplice can't upgrade the kernel, it can change some function definitions in a very rudimentary way, it can't add new functions as far as I know.

Basically, it can fix security holes and that's about it.&gt; [P]rostitution, adultery, necrophilia, bestiality, possession of child pornography, and even incest and pedophilia \u2026 should be legal as long as no one is coerced. They are illegal only because of prejudice and narrow mindedness.

&gt; Some rules might be called for when these acts directly affect other people's interests. For incest, contraception could be mandatory to avoid risk of inbreeding. For prostitution, a license should be required to ensure prostitutes get regular medical check-ups, and they should have training and support in insisting on use of condoms. This will be an advance in public health, compared with the situation today.

&gt; For necrophilia, it might be necessary to ask the next of kin for permission if the decedent's will did not authorize it. Necrophilia would be my second choice for what should be done with my corpse, the first being scientific or medical use. Once my dead body is no longer of any use to me, it may as well be of some use to someone. Besides, I often enjoy rhinophytonecrophilia (nasal sex with dead plants).

  \-- RMSWhy not?

You feel guilty for not buying DRM laden proprietary software? Like you seriously do?

Maybe, just maybe, I'd feel guilty if it was free software, not laden with DRM and I actually bought the software rather than a "licence to pay it", but at the moment I feel about as guilty as I would when I downloaded a car which had some stupid system on it that prohibited me from driving on roads they didn't want me to drive on and didn't allow me to put in the fuel I wanted or open up the hood and tinker with it to make improvements to my car. And no, not stealing, downloading, just getting a copy through the internet.

Yeah, that's about as guilty as I feel when I pirate modern video games.

Best part is, it's perfectly legal where I live.&gt; Sharing copyrighted intellectual property is theft.

Legally? Nope. It's copyright infringement which in most jurisdictions is a civil wrong, not a felony.

&gt; Why would the inclusion of a DVD ROM and a case make such a difference?

Do I really have to explain the difference between removing a physical good and making a copy of a bunch of bits to you or did someone already do that to you? I'm going to guess the latter if you actually tend to spill this around.Legally speaking, not really.

So let me ask you, do you believe piracy is wrong when it's legal to do so and the copyrlght has elapsed?

Life of the artist + 70 years. So tell me, is it wrong to publish Peter Pan which is now in the public domain without compensating the descendants of the original authors. And if not, is it then suddenly wrong 1 hour before midnight when the copyright has not yet elapsed, but suddenly not wrong any more 1 hour after.

And if so, then clearly you operate on the legal definition of wrong, in which case "theft" should be considered a legal term for purposes of this discussion.I 'd disagree, Mitchell is considerably less loose and more military than Crichton.

Farscape in general is considerably more "self-aware" than Stargate. I completely lost it when Crichton called Grayza "Commander Cleavage", usually when they do that stuff where they pull such ridiculous gratuitous cleavage no one remarks on just how absurd it is in fiction.Netherlands, there are multiple places where piracy is legal, which was actually the original way copyright functioned. Some states made things like piracy illegal, not the other way around.

Originally, the idea of copyright infringement was purely for commercial purposes. Noncommercial infringement was always fine. The idea was that they couldn't make money of your stuff without paying you. It was a way to give artists (mostly writers at the time) a bargaining point against publishers. It was a response to the invention of book pressing and mass producing books which required it.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Copyright_infringement#Noncommercial_file_sharingIf you want to make a legal argument, you lose, piracy is completely [lega](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Copyright_infringement#Noncommercial_file_sharing) where I live, copyright infringement for noncommercial purposes tends to be. Strange place, we also have legal drugs, suicide, prostitution, scary liberal place.Poe's law man, poe's law.What a fucking stupid debate. The best feeling on the planet is peeing when you _really_ needed to go and everyone knows it.You imply I would actually use the objective case as a __subject__-complement?

Of course I would say "It's I".Min-ChulI can't believe this is the first time I read this or think about this.

You'd expect this to be one of the most commonly repeated nonsensical things about Star Trek, but it seems like OP was largely the first to point out the silly nature of it.Probably one of the best ways to learn. Not necessarily one of the best distros to use as a daily system though.

And people who say that newbies can't install Gentoo and need to first get familiar with Ubuntu are talking out of their arse. You can perfectly well install Gentoo without any prior Unix experience, I know people who've done so, you just need to have the patience and willingness to read, it explains everything.\&gt; girl

\&gt; guy

More like "human being" and "ridiculous overparodied stereotype fo women" the fuck is up with the bottom anyway.&gt; EXT3 remove

My guess is that a lot of people who don't understand this are going to explode on the news item.&gt; Suspend doesn't always work when closing my laptop.

How is this related to either X or Wayland?Niggers... dudes, it's 2015. "Nigger"'s just become a generic term to say "dude", just like ... "dude" has become that. It used to mean uneducated shallow young bachelor or something like that.Funny isn't it, that when a basic modicum of quality becomes rare, people become "impressed" when companies aren't total scum.\&gt; crashed twice in two years 

\&gt; good

Let me guess, you run Windows?Same thing, don't go binary distro. Only Gentoo-Hardened.\&gt; implying steam is good instead of ridiculous anti-consumer crap.Not caring is sometimes strategic.

There's such a thing as realizing it's not smart to invest in an unattainable goal. It's the responsibility of the tournament to provide players with an incentive they cannot turn down to try their hardest. Relying simply on their "honourableness" to try their hardest, meh.

Reminds me, in WoL there was some showmatch of Ret versus the 4 best SEA players, but there was very little money on the line, so one did one of those tank drop strats at the time it was considered extremely strong to overpowered. So Ret just immediately typed "gg" and quit the moment the strategy was revealed. That's what happens when you don't give people a stake to win.

People bitched on Naniwa and Stephano too when they just did pathetic cheeses when the were already out of the tournament but were still required to play a game. But even if they didn't, they wouldn't try as hard anyway. It just gives plausible deniability, the tournament design just needs to ensure that as long as people still play games that they have a stake in winning.Not really, there is limited time to practice, if he fancies his chances so low that even with practice he stands no chance, he'd better spend that time practising for an attainable goal.

You're basically expecting this guy to risk his career for lost causes and romantic goals. He's practising for LotV because he has an attainable goal there, or so he fancies./r/pcmr in regards to steam is like it is in regards to Assassin's Creed. Praise it praise it praise it, and then they do something awful that screws them for the thousandth time and everyone is like "gee guys, we should be more critical." and then 2 weeks later everyone forgot again.Yeh, also, a lot of people on the defiant for no real reason all the time.

Like when they delivered the proof of the wormhole tampering with the defiant (which somehow could not be subspace-faxed because plot reasons), the entire senior staff takes that ship for some reason.You must be from the United States.More like the inverse. Foreigners live too much in the moment of single matches and don't treat practise and build orders like a resource.

Koreans, (and Naniwa) would frequently skip a tournament altogether to practice for a bigger one or one where they had a better shot.Well, why should he care? He has some obligation to care or something?

To him, Blizzcon is as meaningless as a tournament without a prize pool, he gets matched up in the first round against someone whom he fancies himself no chance of beating.I guess the difference is that they cancel in advance rather than providing a sub-part performance when they said they'd come. They definitely have that going for it, when they say they come they'll come even if they're sick.Xorg doesn't signal that, acpi does.

Maybe there is some weird thing in GNOME where it doesn't properly handle that when it uses Wayland for whatever reason.I'm seriously more "offended" by the guy censoring his words than his words. Like why on earth would you do that, what logic is behind writing "f\*ck" instead of "fuck"? He thinks kids won't get brain cancer from reading it this way or something?

It's just such a sanctimonious gesture.

Also """news"""Hmm, I find it kind of unlikely that this has anything to do with Wayland thugh

No doubt you can find out how GNOME handles this ACPI business, troubleshoot it and apply a fix. Of course, that would involve not being the  typical retard that actually uses GNOME and is incapable of fixing elementary problems like this, but who knows, maybe you're smarter than the average GNOME user.Seems like a legitimate reason if that is the one.These things in particular are why since I've actually decided to read up on Wayland I'm honestly not that much enamoured with what it's going to do. It seems to very much want to go into the direction of binary configuration and making it very hard to write simple, portable tools that for instance script and automate window placement like `xdotool` or `wmctrl` do now.That's whom I meant with "the guy".

I'm well aware Linus likes to put asterisks in random places to spare our innocent children the awful fate of brain cancer.&gt; This direction isn't actually very surprising since one of the goals of Wayland is to improve safety. The binary configuration also seems to fit the bill very well for full-blown DEs like Gnome or KDE.

KDE does not use binary config as far as I know,  GNOME does. GNOME stands for _everything_ that's wrong with the direction of modern Unix is taking to achieve this vaunted "year of the Linux desktop". It treats its users like children, it uses binary configurations, it thinks it's okay to some-how claim systemd as a dependency.

&gt; I very much like Wayland for its simplicity as a protocol. It's still early days, and I hope the situation will improve for minimal window managers as the work on libweston goes on. Hopefully there will also be some kind of a plugin system which most of the WM ecosystem could agree upon. That could be used to implement tools like xdotool, wmctrl or sxhkd.

Time will tell, for the moment, their existing is one thing, they also have to be portable and work across Wayland compositors, that seems to be the major problem.

&gt; Personally, as soon as libweston is in a semi-stable state, I'd like to go ahead and try to implement something like wmutils[1] for Wayland. I think it wouldn't be too hard to do and could serve as a base for other window managers as well. We'll see :)

Won't that just mean it'll work for Weston and not for other things?It's Latin for "I weed out" essentially.\&gt;using a pointing device to edit the image rather than editing the image directly with sed

Do you even Unix bro?I like how a lot of people assert this dogma that "buffs are better than nerfs" with no evidence to back it up while every time Blizzard attempted a buff it basically resulted in disaster:

- first infestor buff, tooks 4 nerfs to get it from not being broken
- queen buff
- immortal buff led to the glory days of sentry/immortal all ins all the timeTo be fair, I'm pretty sure that that's purely because there is no strong mill deck. The moment a strong mill deck that is actually good enough to bring to tournaments starts to dominate the ladder people will probably be far more frustrated with it than they ever were with aggro.A game like Dota can't hardly ever be "imbalanced", It has a pick and ban format. It's pretty hard to fuck balance up in a Moba.

In an RTS like StarCraft, if _one_ unit is only slightly too powerful you will get months of one race dominating tournaments. You can't just have a format where you can ban certain units, everyone would just trollface ban essential units.

Blizzard pretty much managed to produce the most balanced RTS games in the history of video games. They invented the concept of asymmetric RTS, or at least were the first studio that dared to do it when the belief was that such a thing would be impossible to balance and no other studio has yet been able to replicate a balanced asymmetric RTS like Blizzard.Because the FCC has randomly decided that "crap" is less offensive than "shit".

Ever noticed how US prime time television liberally features "screw you" but never "fuck you", both, literally and figuratively, mean the exact same thing but the FCC considers one offensive and not so much the other.WarCraft I and II were not asymmetric, neither were most of the C&amp;C games.

StarCraft I was probably the first RTS game that could rightfully be called asymmetric.That only shows the GDI tree, not the Nod tree.

Also, the WarCraft "different units" were almost purely reskins, they were mechanically identical but looked different.Except Weston is using client-side decorations which won't go well with anyone but the GNOME devs.With asymmetric RTS I mean that the different races you can pick have a radically different design.

In WarCraft and C&amp;C before it they were for the most part reskins of each other.&gt; There's nothing wrong with them buffing things a bit too much so long as they are willing to reel it back in. But Blizzard always seems to take a stance on their changes and are especially stubborn about going back on a change they made. I guess they are insecure about being wrong or something, but realistically they can't always know how things will turn out.

They're reverted many changes:

- The bunker is the most iconic example, the build time was constantly upped 5 seconds, then dropped 5 seconds and so forth
- The time it took to research stim was also constantly increased and decreased
- The Thor's ability became cooldown based with a really short cooldown, a massive buff that was eventually reverted to its old state again
- The Ultralisk's burrow-charge ability was added, and then removed&gt; Oh come on. The FCC didn't arbitrarily decide this. They made a rule based on societal standards.

Quite right, social standards arbitrarily decided it.

&gt; I seriously hope that if you're ever in a room with a 4-year-old, you would prefer "crap" over "shit" and "screw" over "fuck". 

Why not? You think it's bad for their health in some way or damages them? Gives them brain damage or something?AoE wasn't asymmetric, all factions had largely the same units with some really minor changes here and there.&gt; And yet every single non-nerd user I've seen use it loves it.

Where "non nerd" is a nice euphemism for massive idiot.

&gt; Normal users don't care about the nerd holy war against systemd. They don't care about binary configuration, provided they can change the config stuff that they need to (hint: they're not using emacs to edit config files now... but they will use a nice GUI tool for a binary config file!) They don't give a shit about whether or not they can change window tiling settings.

Agreed, though you might as well phrase it in a shorter way and say "normal users are fucking indifferent ignorant idiots."

&gt; They care about using their computer as a tool, as means to an end.

Ohhh, watching youtube and checking email and browsing reddit, guess what, you can do that on Windows too, no need for Unix there.

&gt; For these users, any time spent thinking about the DE is a failure of the DE.

For these idiotic users, yes.

&gt; I know this isn't how you want it to be. I know you want users to all care about the same issues that you do. But they don't.

I don't want them to care, I want them to be pitchforked out back to Windows. I don't see the use of all this "ohh, we have to increase Linux adoption" if that's just going to mean it's going to be as bad as Windows. What's the use then?

&gt; Mac OS X succeeded where Windows was failing because it "just worked". There's an important lesson to be learned from that, and GNOME has learned it.

Except Windows is way more popular than OS X and Windows also "just works". "Just works" is garbage anyway, it never works the way you want and it just reeks of a lack of perfectionism and lacking imagination.

&gt; Don't like it? Don't use it.

If only systemd wasn't on a crusade to make everything on the planet depend on it to force to "homogenize" the Linux oecosystem. This isn't some conspiracy theory, Red Hat and Poettering have openly stated that one of the goals of systemd was to bring more consistency. The point of systemd is massive adoption for the sake of getting the same thing everywhere.

&gt; But don't bash GNOME; they've created what might be the first Linux DE that looks good and is simple enough for your Grandma to use. That's a major accomplishment.

It's an accomplishment in the same way a door without keys so that the biggest idiots who are too dumb to know how a key works can still "operate" it, the downside it is misses the function of an outside-door.It's kind of typical of "Korean Culture" though, as in, everyone is all high and might about honour and values when people are looking, but behind your back a lot more shit is going on. I mean, obviously these are all averages and don't apply to everyone but in general it's often a case of people speaking high and mighty but doing the opposite when no one is looking.&gt; This. This right here is why people think the Linux community is full of asshole neckbeards.

Yes, people love to do that when they get told, however truthfully, that they're idiots.

&gt; Maybe the biggest problem isn't the DE design or the underlying daemon(s) or the display stack. The biggest problem preventing the "year of the Linux desktop" might well be the toxic elements of the community that treat people like dirt if they're not a power user or developer.

Maybe the problem is that you didn't read. Like I said, I don't give a shit about the "year of the linux desktop", Linux being popular means more idiots get in, and that abominations like GNOME seriously exist and all those fucking retarded GUI applets shows waaay too many idiots are already in.1. StarCraft winrates are objectively way more balanced than BW winrates. Like, BW winrates don't even come close to SC2 winrates in how close the latter are to 50%. I have no idea why people often say that BW was oh-so-balanced, it probably means they didn't play Protoss.

2. Blizzard has had essentially no involvement into the BW competitive scene and just "let it happen". The only involvement they had was that they officially sanctioned the GOM Classic which was purely because GOM was the only network to actually ask Blizzard if they could use their game. This was done for the symbolic price of 1 USD. Blizzard had no involvement in either building or killing the BW competitive scene. OGN/MBC/KeSPA just used their game and built something of it.This article seems to mostly compare it to sysvinit. Which is what is often done, which I don't get. The only distro that I can name which actually transitioned from sysvinit to systemd was Debian. Fedora and Ubuntu went from Upstart, Arch went from BSD-style init. Basically, sysvinit was pretty much dead before systemd became a thing.

I mean, yeah, you can make systemd look good by comparing to something which was already close to replaced before sytemd was as much as starting development. But try to make it look good by comparing it to an actual modern init. I mean, pretty much all it says is that unit files are brevier than old init scripts. Well yeah, pretty much every modern service management tool has solved that in one way or another. Some use declarative things like systemd and others use fully fledged turing complete scripts which can be kept super simple.

Also, the main criticisms on systemd are not that it's "bad", but that it does too much, I thought everyone knew that. The discussion is obviously centred on how tightly coupled these 70-odd binaries are in the end. Some argue they are uncoupled "enough" while others argue they are too coupled. I think most can agree though that they are certainly more coupled than the different GNU coreutils and certainly less coupled than the Linux kernel to its modules.The criticism on systemd is that it's good for companies, bad for the user like most "monolithic" software. Basically, the criticism on   lack of modularity is that it subverts the control the user has over his or her system. Which is not something the distro cares a lot about.

You'll also notice that no distro which is known for giving the user control over his or her system has mandated systemd. The only distros that have mandated it are known to shoehorn their users along rail tracks and those that made it optional but "as default" are some-what in-between.

Basically, people also criticize Windows day and night for what it does but it continues to do it. The interest of the user and the interest of the vendor don't always align. Poettering has openly stated that one of the goals of systemd was simply making the Linux-oecosystem more homogeneous. Which is nice for companies but takes control away from the user.

edit: Also, ever noticed how (with the exception of Arch Linux) sytemd has only been really adopted by distros which target users that most likely will never even notice what init/service system is being used and aren't expected to directly interface with it for the most part. Except for Arch I don't really know a meaningful distro that is both targeted at users who will be writing their own init scripts/units/whatevers and what-not and that has switched to systemd as a default.True, it's kind of ridiculous to say that most sysadmins won't notice the change. For better or worse.Arch gives its users very little control even compared to other binary distros, the only distro that gives it less that I have any knowledge of is Fedora. Arch is basically one size fits all:

- Bleeding edge
- OpenSSL as TLS implementation
- No SElinux
- Only one supported init (systemd), and thus with it only one supported login manager, one service manager, one supported session manger, one supported syslogger bla bla bla
- Only one libc: glibc
- Only one kernel: Linux
- Only x86

The only thing it offers choice in that other binary distros don't is bootloader really. Arch does not care what bootloader you use and I honestly don't get why Debian does care and tries to rub GRUB2 in your face because I see no reason why a distro should care and since multi-booting exists distros that care about your bootloader are supremely obnoxious, if you multi-boot and both want to force a different one on your MBR it turns into an ugly mess, of course.

I have the feeling the misconception that Arch offers choice stems from that Arch is minimal. Which is a different thing. While Ubuntu _by default_ offers a DE and Arch does not. Nothing stops you on Ubuntu from installing another one and removing the default one. It doesn't get in your way in any way and other window managers are in Ubunut's repositories ready to be installed with a single command. I guess this gives some people the idea that Arch offers a choice in what graphical environment you may pick and Ubuntu doesn't while in reality pretty much every distro lets you choose all those "higher level" applications as you see fit, some just come with a selection that is there by default. Enabling choice in there requires no effort from the developers whatsoever, just put the package in the repos, which is why every distro offers it.

Things like your TLS implementation, your libc and all that other stuff requires a bit more effort from the devs to support more than one and for them to make a commitment to ensure it actually all works with everything and some engineering inside the distro. Which is why not all distros go so far to support multiple libc's or multiple TLS implementations or init systems. Arch probably ranks at the absolute bottom of how little choice it offers in any of those things though.

tl;dr: "default selections" and "choice" are not exclusive.&gt; Yes, that can be done without systemd as well, but no Linux distribution managed to do that reliably enough to turn that on by default before.

What does "reliable" here mean? Like, not crashing? I've been running X as user for a year now with no problems.

I have the feeling that what you point towards is that systemd enabled it to run as user from a display manager or something similar rather than from `startx`. Most distros which fancy "defaults" tend to have display managers enabled in their default and don't like shipping a certain default configuration if it involves typing `startx` at a console.&gt; Hardware -&gt; Drivers -&gt; Display Server -&gt; Window Manager -&gt; Toolkit &gt; App

This is where it's wrong and lacks in detai. The "Window manager" part here doesn't add up. A window manager is just another client as far as X is considered. _any_ client can make calls to the server to manage any window. The Window manager does not sit at any special place at all. It's just another client.

This is what Wayland perceives as a shortcoming it wishes to rectify. There is actually in X no requirement to have a window manager at all. X perfectly well supports the possibility that each window manages its own placement and no window manager is used at all for that. That would be pretty awful but it's certainly possible within X.And systemd does not depend on the Linux kernel, just on an interface the Linux kernel provides.

Until there are specifications of said interface and multiple implementations. The two are indistinguishable. You can fight a terminology warfare like that with _every_ dependency.&gt; So how do you make sure a daemon managed by runit does not talk an the network

Not sure what this means, "talk an the network"?

&gt; will never spawn more than 5 processes any given time, ans not use more than 1GB of RAM?

With `chpst`, a modular utility provided by runit which can spawn processes with for instance capped resources, niceness subprocess caps and so forth.

&gt; How do you make sure it will never modify any binary or any configuration? How do you stop that daemon from even seeing any file in /home?

By using `chpst` to start it as a user that does not have those rights I guess.

&gt; All of the above are really easy with systems.

They are also easy with runit. The difference is that how runit achieves this goal is using a modular utility which does not depend on the rest of runit. `chpst`can be used outside of runit for whatever you want. In essence it does nothing more than starting a process within a specific profile to say limit the resources it can use or the rights it has.

That's the criticism of systemd in a nutshell, the facilities are interlocked, in runit they are modular. While runit provide its own pid1, its service manager, `runsvdir` which itself just spawns a couple of `runsv` processes do not depend on any particular pid1 or even root access. runit and openRC are both composed of modular utilities which do not assume the existence of the rest of the suite and as such I've easily been able to combine them to hack together my own system initialization which uses runit as pid1, OpenRC for initial filesystem checking and runit to monitor services with the exception of udev which is monitored by OpenRC again.

Note that I don't think systemd is bad at a lot of the things it does, I think it's actually pretty good at a lot of the things it does, I also think it's horrible at some of the things it does. And I'd just like to be able to pick only the parts I like and throw away the rest. And journald is most definitely a part I _don't_ like. So I'm sort of waiting until uselessd matures to give it a shot.There _is_ a lot of FUD generated about systemd, there's also a lot of legitimate criticism generated about systemd. The thing is that a lot of people make systemd "look good" by only attacking the ridiculous FUD some detractors come with while ignoring to answer the legitimate points.

Which is really nothing new. Politicians have known since ancient times that the easiest way to make yourself look good is to only answer the dumb criticisms raised by stupid people.&gt; It must be rough to hold all that contempt around. :) I remember a guy, Jim Gettys, he was the architect of X actually. He wouldn't talk to you unless he was introduced to you by someone he already knew. It was like the male chauvinist version Facebook/Linkedin. Ah, Jim , you are a treasure. Of course, we get along quite well, but I noted it all the same.

Not sure what this guy has to with me because I think: "He wouldn't talk to you unless he was introduced to you by someone he already knew. " is pretty fucking dumb. A lot of my friends happen to be friends with people whom I absolutely cannot stand, it's no guarantee.

&gt; Such attitudes are self defeating there is always someone you can learn from. Assuming people who don't know the internals of their DE or computer as somehow inferior says something about the person who feels that way. We are all ignorant on the things we don't care about. :)

Quite right, but then again, surely I have no desire to learn more things about the things I don't care about.Pretty much.

Someone else made an interesting observation though pointing out that the worst systemd detractors come with ridiculous FUD but the worst systemd defenders don't actually defend systemd as much as that they attack the worst systemd haters on a personal level without actually pointing out why sysd is good. And I think that tends to hold True surprisingly often.

Ever noticed how much of the defence of systemd tends to come down to attacking the personality of those who dislike it?&gt; Even on the console: root-less X11 on Linux depends on logind to manage permissions. Logind in turn depends on systemd.

How?

I'm pretty sure root-less X is older than logind.

&gt; The alternative is to manually adjust permissions in /dev: That can be done for a one user mashine, but you can not scale that up to something a distribution can ship and enable by default.

Yes, it is required for "sessions" and "seats" and differentiating "logged in" from "having the seat", that doesn't mean it's unreliable to run Xorg nonroot. It means that it can't implement "sessions" and "seats" and what-not. Which I don't use anyway systemd or not.

&gt; Anything a distribution can not ship is unreliable in this context. Sooner or later someone will trigger a corner case that will break the whole setup.

I don't think the word "unreliable" is what you're looking for. But simply "lacking features". I gain the impression that what you wanted to say is that logind is the first system that can implement seats and sessions for rootless Xorg.

I mean, yeah, I can ssh into my own computer and snoop on my own input events even if I'm not having a seat behind it at that point since I'm in the "input" group.I'm not sure I buy this, I can find a lot of synonymous, both hving harsh phonemes where one is mild and one isn't. How offensive they are also seems to depend on dialect often:

- Cock, dick, prick
- Cunt, twat, twit (one vowel difference, but very less much less harsh)
- cum, scum (some-how adding an s- makes a word meaning sperm completely all-ages)To be fair, it's been my nigh unfaltering experience that "authorities" are worth about as much. Especially in "soft" sciences you can often find two authorities which say the exact opposite. People often misuse their "authority" to give their vision on subjective things as if it were more commonly accepted within the entire community than it really is.

See the Tanenbaum-Torvalds debate about microkernels. Tanenbaum as the authority said something like "the debate is essentially done, no one takes monolithic kernels seriously any more, microkernels have won", I'm pretty sure you could find another authority at the time on Kernels who'd be like "There are still plenty of people who think there is a good use for monolithic kernels and the advantages of microkernels, while theoretically solid remain just that, theory rather than something proven in practice."

As much as from a theoretical perspective I find microkernels to be more sound, intuitively more robust and even just more "elegant", let's face it, the microkernel revolution that Tanenbaum forecasted didn't happen at all. There is no microkernel in large use still and the "hybrid kernels" that are in use are essentially just "We started out as a microkernel, but that didn't really work out so we didn't throw away what we had and just made it into a monolithic kernel."So like is this Xubuntu users or Xfce users?

Also, do you qualify if you installed a different WM than Xfce on Xubuntu or if you installed Xfce on mainline Ubuntu?

How many standard Xfce applications are you allowed to swap out for things of your own liking?

The problem with "desktop environments" and "distros" is that they suffer from the species problem.

Well, that's not the problem, that's the the good thing, it would be pretty annoying if you _had to_ use Gedit with GNOME and couldn't just uninstall that and use \u00fee olde Vim.It's not a problem of it not _working_, it still works, the problem is that the arch devs basically gave people 3 months to switch and said that after that point they would stop shipping scripts for it in their packages and depend on systemd in other packages.

Of course no one is using it or some of the other unofficial ones in the AUR if a lot of packages assume systemd exists.Waaat?

    $ mv oldname newname

Am I missing something?

Also, bonus points for command line do like:

    $ mv /long/path/to/old/name{,.bkp}

    $ rename \(.\).JPG \\1.jpg\&gt; "modern '''''year of the linux desktop'''' system"

\&gt; expecting to appease a user who doesn't want to waste time with useless BS and execute one quick command to do a lot.

Get with the time, we have to draw all the Windows idiots it by showing them Linux can be just as slow and frustrating as Windows if you really want.

I honestly feel a stronger affinity with NT users who live by PowerShell (which is legitimately really good) than I feel with Linux users who use their silly little rodent file manager to be slow.I use Fluxbox and use pretty much only keyboard, often my mouse idle times go into the hours. I remember once that it took me ~ eight hours after open up my notebook to solder some loose power contact to realize I had in fact not connected the touchpad and I was living without mouse for like half a day.

The things I use mouse for are the applications that need it, some with good reason. There's nothing wrong with using the mouse as a pointing device where pointing makes sense. The problem is when they force you to use the mouse to click "icons", you really do not need a pointer for that. If there are less than 60 icons navigating with directional keys is probably even faster, let alone just giving them a name, typing the name and tab-completing it.Current trends in distros catering to a specific breed of users who are well, let's call it "not exactly power users".

You will find that the above are common in virtually all distros  that cater to "power users". Or more specifically, (in this case excluding Arch), want control over their system rather than some "distro" making the choices for them.

Slackware is noteable because by choice it does not automatically resolve dependencies based on the argument that you can make your own choices regarding that. Sometimes certain "dependencies" are just not required to make the program start, only for certain functionality, which you may not use.

Basically, slackware by design does not do a lot of things you might not be aware of, giving you intimate knowledge of your own system. This contrasts king-of-cosutomization distros in the Gentoo-like family which, while being more flexible also automate quite a lot so you give up the intimate knowledge of your own system.

Another advantage of this is that in Slackware you will almost never pay the price for mistakes devs make. In virtually any distro you can pay the price because a dev made some mistake but in Slackware that is very rare. The system is designed so that it's very hard for the devs to make a mistake.

As a result, Slackware is _rock solid_ provided the system admin is rock solid.Hmm, never heard of it, reading up it seems to be used in some cars and mobile phones, yes.

Anyway, 0 or 1, it doesn't change the point too much, Tanenbaum stressed that monolithic kernels would basically die out in favour of microkernels and that certainly hasn't happened.&gt; ps: fluxbox is not a DE, just a WM with a menu right ? it's not comparable to windows graphic stack.

I always find this supposed distinction to be about as futile as the difference between a pile and a lump.&gt; Going by its man page chpst can do none of the things I asked. 

Then be more specific, you asked limit memory and processes which does not require kernel namespaces. Maybe you meant something more specific than that but just limiting memory and processes and time is something chpst does.

And I'm still not sure what "talk an the network" can possibly mean, it seems like a typo somewhere to me.
I'm not sure what this means.I don't think it's that binary. Chomsky would be a fool to not realize that people are going to lend undue credit to his political stuff simply by his status of being "famous". His boycott of Israel's conference with Hawking was obviously done because both men know the considerable gravitas their fame commands and they use it.

The issue is that it's impossible to not "use it" if you're that famous. Whatever you say is going to be taken more seriously than if you were a nobody so it's hard to blame them.What is "fancy input logic", and pretty much everyone uses GUI toolkits like GTK and qt surely?Well, then Fluxbox is a "DE" by your argument because:

- It has a keybinding file which is capable of both binding keybindings easily to its own operation as well as to arbitrary commands as well as hooking onto some of its own specifics like keybindgs only activating on certain workspaces or if certain tabs within windows are selected.

- It sets wallpapers and is capable of associating wallpapers with its own themes as well as different wallpapers for different workspaces
- It has a capacity to put icons on the background which are clickable and can be bound to things
- It provides a "root menu" which understands xdg and is capable of providing the user with "applications"
- it provides window decorations

While I agree that the strictest definition of "Window manager", as in something which _only_ manages windows and does not draw anything or provides anything else is quite clear. Usually when people say "window manager" this is a binary that does far more than that already.&gt; ChromeOS isn't for people like us who want more control of our systems.

If "us" is the average user of /r/linux then ehh.

Have any debate here about the inadequacies of GNOME and what-not and people jump left and right "omagad dude, the average user doesn't want control, just something that works, omagad, most people don't compile their own kernels, you're insane."Why do leaves fall? It's in their nature.And admittedly loaded as fuck. I mean, I'm basically pointing out my suspicion that these things are not defined at all.

It would be academically curious to not list the exact selection criteria and first define what "a Xubuntu user" really means and in the event that Ubuntu+Xfce does not qualify motivate why exactly that choice was made and what difference between both systems prompts such an interesting in that separation.&gt; Not all of us are keyboard centric. Yes the keyboard is faster if that is your main input. My way like many others is the mouse.

So you basically just agree with /u/BirdDogWolf 

I mean, you're basically just saying "You are right, but not all of us are quick".Okay, have fun with your contest of "being the quickest constrained in an environment which is ridiculously slow". It's like a speedwalking contest.Well, these two:

&gt; - use Ubuntu (14.04 or 15.04) as a Linux distribution
&gt; - use Xfce (Xfwm and Thunar) and Google Chrome/Chromium Browser

Are the ones I was talking about, none of those are atomic and clear and runs into the specifies problem. Especially considering FOSS and forks. How much of the source code can I modify for it to still be considered Xfwm? Distributions are not atomic either. Xubuntu is considered an Ubuntu derivative but how much may a derivative change to still be considered to fall under the loose umbrella term "derivative".Hmm, so it's not really about Xubuntu but more of a practical matter because Xubuntu hooks onto the PPA software?

Ah yes, I see, I thought it considered Xubuntu users the demographic.&gt; Also, as a former Xubuntu developer and user, I must say I don't quite understand the difference between Xubuntu and Ubuntu + Xfce :-)

Neither do I, I always wondered what the deal exactly was with Kubuntu and Xubuntu._if_ `ol*` singularly matches `oldname` then `ol[TAB]` which is the same number of keypresses just completes it which is a safer because it warns you when it doesn't match.So it's basically a process but the end result is the same?&gt; If their had been enough Arch developers wanting alternative init-support, there would have been.

And there weren't, that's why I say Arch isn't about choice. The devs don't give a shit about making choice possible and every X time retcon the "arch ways" and drag all their users along.

&gt; The vast majority of Arch developers simply didn't care at all about using anything else than systemd.

Exactly, so Arch isn't about choice.

Of course, you managed to turn "is arch about choice or not" to "is systemd good or not" like virtually anything ever you seem to turn into a systemd thing. Which wasn't the point here, the point was whether or not Arch offered a lot of choice, which it most certainly does not.For mouse users the Hurd's timeschedule is quick.

All hail the year of the Linux desktop, where we draw in all the Windows troglodytes by showing them that Linux can be just as painfully annoying, slow and obnoxious as Windows as long as you just install your retarded Cinnamon 2.8 desktop environment.&gt; Make sure the process can not modify anything in /etc or /usr, even when running as root. Make sure a service can never ever steal the SSH keys of the user, even if an attacker manages to run arbitrary code through that service (even as root).

This really sounds like a condition of "solve my problem the way that systemd solves it", the problem is that it can't modify those files or access those things. "root" means "give it all the rights humanly possible" in traditional Unix parlance. The way to solve it is to make a user that doesn't have that access but does have the access you want and run it as that user in runit, being closer to traditional Unix design.

No, you can't do what you want as far as I know while still making it run as root, but having it run as root isn't the goal.&gt; Well, first of all it showed, just like the GR vote on Debian, that the overwhelming amount of developers wanted systemd. The state of Arch Linux is simply a reflection of what their developers want.

Which clearly isn't _choice_.

Note that Debian elected to still make their old init available and supported rather than forcing a different init. Also, the majority of Gentoo users and devs want sysvinit+OpenRC but systemd is available and fully supported, why? Because Gentoo is committed to choice.

&gt; Secondly, this is not how open source work; developers that aren't paid work on what they want. "Choice" always imply work, and if nobody are willing to work on such choices, they won't materialize.
It is a major problem for the systemd-opponents that they are such a tiny minority with so few developers willing to work for them.

You have a knack for making things about systemd which aren't about systemd do you?

And yes, they don't want to work on enabling choice, which is why Arch is not about choice, unlike say Debian or Gentoo where the devs are committed to making obscure use cases available like kFreeBSD, alternative C libraries, hardened kernels and a variety of obscure architectures because the Debian and Gentoo devs have an interest in choice, the Arch devs do not. They like to just railroad their users along a set path.

&gt; It is one thing that eg. Debian is using systemd as default, but no group of "Sysvinit" proponents have stepped up and offering to do major maintenance work to make it possible for Debian to continue to also support Sysvinit.

Debian continues to support sysvinit and will do so for quite a while. Ubuntu also continues to support upstart.

And again, you seem to have magically turned a discussion of "is arch about choice or not" into "is systemd a good thing or not" where systemd was just one of the 7 examples of where Arch does not offer any choice.&gt; Will this help people who have moved across from windows? Yes.

The point is that you assume that it's wise to "help" these people rather than chase them away with pitchforks.

There's such a thing as idiots ruining it for others you know. More idiots in Unix means that more software is going to be accommodated towards them. I mean, take a basic program like cheese, it's pretty annoying to use because it caters to idiots. Now, you might say "So someome can write a program that does the same but isn't.", but here's the problem, no one is going to write it if cheese already exists and is "good enough", that's the problem, if the first person who makes a program that fullfills a general use case makes it with an interface tailored to idiots, people probably aren't afterwards going to replicate the functionality just to get around the obnoxious interface.

So yeah, idiots _do_ ruin it for others. It's not as simple as just "ohh, you can ignore the programs tailored towards idiots", no, these programs simply _existing_ takes away the motivation from people to get programs with a proper interface that do the same thing.Nigga pleez. The average /r/linux user seems to seriously use ridiculous things like GNOME and Cinnamon. I always thought that was just some weird parody BS meme nonsense but apparently people actually seriously _use_ that crap.

What's the point of switching from Windows if you're just going to repeat the same recalcitrant interface, but hey, now you can say you're free \*cough\* proprietary drivers \*cough\*. &gt; Yes it is. "Choice" is also about "choosing" not offering alternatives. Again, some people think that OSS is like a candy shop where everything is free and you can just mix any bag of sweets from all the shelves. But as said, in the OSS world choices only happens if somebody wants to work on such choices. And for various reasons, few are willing to work on alternatives to systemd.

It was pretty clear that in the purposes of this discussion  of my explaining why Arch wasn't about choice when someone asked the idea was explaning why Arch did not allow you very much to tailor your system to your own specific needs.I don't understand this post in relation to my comment.

What I'm saying is that your challenge was "How do I achieve this on runit while the system still runs as root" and my response is "By not running it as root, this is just how runit achieves what you want here". Unless you need to run it as root for some reason which I don't understand, the only reason I can see to ever run soemthing as root is to give it every right humanly possible. Which you didn't want already becuse you wanted to limit some things.I didn't invent the term "rodent" though I am quite fond of it.

It's just in general a way to refer to the mouse getting in your way because some random application which has no solid keyboard-only interface when there is no justification mandates it. You know, because the connotation of "rodent" is that it's a pest and mice are rodents. I quite like it.

Few things are as annoying as applications which otherwise do a decent thing force you to rodent for no apparent reason. I'm talking to you PlayOnLinux./r/linuxmasterrace:

\&gt;complaining about forced updates

\&gt;using Arch LinuxThat sentence is misphrased. It's not hard for them to make a mistake, but it's hard for that mistake to be forced onto you against your will or accidentally.

Slackware doesn't automate much, packages don't go fiddling with your system like on other distros.There is nothing "special needs that no one else has". Arch Linux is the most popular distro on this sub in the last poll.

Please don't act like GNOME troglodytes are the majority, they just venture into this thread because Cinnamon 2.8 news item. The majority of Unix users still have brain cells and steer far away from shit like that. But if Canonical can help it they'll all come streaming in with their rodent interfaces.If you ever want to install anything ever again yeah.

Officially, installing a package on arch without first doing a world update is unsupported.I don't, usually. I just got dragged into a discussion which started to be about something else.

Anyway, any inferior rodent user I can scare away with "waah waah linux elitism" is a win for the cause.No, it's not within Debian or Ubuntu which are "versioned releases", as in, it's fully supported that all packages within a specific "version" work together and don't break, but you can't combine packages from different versions.

Arch has no version, or rather, it has micro-versions, you can effectively see Arch as that every new update of the repos every 24 hours constitutes a new "version" so versions are basically tiny slices in Arch.

The reason why Debian and the lot need versions and can't just go rolling is because of the shared-object problem. The shared libraries that specific packages are compiled against, since they are compiled against specific versions of the libraries which generally can't just co-exist it has to be like that, when the version is upgraded the shared libraries can all be upgraded and all packages for the new version are compiled against the newer shared libraries.

Arch solves this problem by always compiling it against the latest shared libraries thus requiring that your shared libraries are always up to date to the latest, this is where `pacman -Syu` comes into play.

Debian is just "updating is nice because newer software (that is stable) is better. Arch is "If you don't always keep your shared libraries up to date then you get a linker error when trying to load the program and it won't run."

Source-based distros like Crux and Gentoo which were the first rolling distros solved it in an entirely different way. Since you compile your software locally on your system it is always compiled against whatever shared library is on your system. This also requires a recompile of all stuff compiled against specific libraries whenever a library is upgraded, I don't know about Crux but I know Gentoo handles this automatically.

The downside of the source-based approch is obviously long compile times. The upside is that it's extremely easy to mix and match old and stable with bleeding edge software. You can't keep an Arch system frozen while keeping a single package up to date and bleeding edge. With Gentoo this is not a problem. Within Debian this can only be done within a specific version.RHEL is targeted at those users?

Doesn't that like ship with GNOME by default?&gt; Arch perfectly allow you to tailor your system including using Upstart/SysVinit/OpenRC whatever. It is just that people don't care to do so.

No, it does not, because the packages:

- assume systemd exists and depend on many of its interfaces
- are compiled against glibc
- are compiled against OpenSSL

You can't just swap any of those things out on Arch and expect stuff to still work. I'm sure not all are but for the most part when systemd's d-bus exports are missing on Arch applications will complain and/or crash because they're compiled to expect them.

&gt; Another meta-distro, Gentoo, works the same way: it only has one default init-system, OpenRC, and that is the only officially supported init-system. It is entirely up to the systemd "herd" to maintain their software stack so they can use systemd as their init system. In short, the do they work so choice exist, and if the systemd "herd" stops maintaining systemd in Gentoo, it will disappear as a choice too.

No, Gentoo has two "offically supported" init systems. sysvinit/OpenRC and systemd. Note the contrast, virtually no one who uses Gentoo uses systemd but it's there and officially supported because Gentoo _is_ committed to choice.

Now, "officially supported" in Gentoo means little more than that init scripts/unit files for either respectively are provided by the packages. As Gentoo is a source-based distro and not a binary distro, stuff is compiled locally on your system and will thus not crash on any pid1/service manager. The downside is however that for any service manager other than OpenRC/systemd you're going to have to roll your own service definitions.

systemd in Gentoo is officially supported by the devs, not the community. There are systemd-profiles selectable at install which will automate setting the appropriate use-flags and properly compile a fully functional systemd.

&gt; Arch Linux is all about choice, including the choice of using only one default program because all the Arch developers agrees that is the best and nobody bothers to make an alternative.

No, Arch is the antithesis of choice. Like I said, other distros offer you a choice in different libc's, different SSL implementations, different kernels, different sysloggers, cron daemons and what have you. Arch offers exactly _one_ of all of these.

&gt; Again, no work, no choice.

Yes, the devs do not put in work to enable choice, devs of other distros do. You can run Musl on Void Linux, it's officially supported and the devs are commited to keep it work.To rid Unix of all the rodent-lovers and restore it to its rightful glory of course.

I shall found a glorious Unix state where managing files with rodents is punishable on pain of death.Exherbo obviously if you just do it to try something wild.

That or NixOS because it works totally differently.Most of them are death anyway already.

But if they were alive, they'd be deadened once more to serve as an example that no one shall manage files with rodents and get away with it.&gt; No, only OpenRC is the officially supported default init-system. It is entirely up to the systemd/runit/whatever "herd" to maintain their stack. If people stop working on systemd, the Gentoo project is under no obligation to fix problems or still maintaining it.

No, it's not. Systemd is fully supported by the Gentoo team with a default profile and shipped unit files. Every ebuild in the default gentoo repository comes with an accompanying unit file.

https://wiki.gentoo.org/wiki/Systemd

&gt; And you are wrong about Gentoo people not using systemd to any significant degree, and I thoroughly expect them to switch over to use systemd as default when they are finished making the infrastructure necessary to allow make the switch in a streamlined way.

You have never set foot on the Gentoo forums have you?

Virtually everyone there and on the IRC channel _dispises_ systemd.

You don't know what you're talking about and in general have a tendency to have a ridiculously biased and rose-coloured view on systemd. Systemd is fully supported in Gentoo as an init system and used by about 10% of the users or something.

&gt; All this is entirely made by those who wants systemd when using Gentoo. If the systemd "herd" disappears, so does the systemd support, simply because other Gentoo developers have no obligation at all to take over the support. They would have if they had a "commitment" to choice; then they would have to support systemd whether they liked or not.

No, it isn't. _every_ package in Gentoo regarldess the maintainer must ship with a systemd unit file which is literally the _only_ extend systemd support in Gentoo goes to. Gentoo, being a sourced-based distro, having an rc supported means nothing more than a service description file being shipped with the packages. At the moment this happens for OpenRC and systemd and no others. _every_ package in Gentoo must be shipped with systemd unit files, that's a guarantee they make at this point, and that is all the support entails. There is no further development needed because Gentoo is a source-based distro with USE flags that keeps packages very close to upstream. Upstream has compile-time options for systemd, or it doesn't. This contrasts a binary distro like Arch where those options are enabled, then the binaries are transported into the repos.

&gt; That would be because Arch Linux developer choose not to work on any such alternative.

And because Arch developers tend to choose to not work on such alternatives Arch is not about choice. Debian, Void and Gentoo developers do.

&gt; Besides, Arch Linux have at least 3 different syslog implementations and last I checked they had several different libc implementations including eglibc, dietlibc, musl.

Source? There is nothing on the Archwiki on Musl and as far as I know Archlinux does not support it.

&gt; They also have both OpenSSL and LibreSSL, but since the latter conflicts with the first, and little software supports LibreSSL (not OpenSSL compatible), they have to use statically linked packages. LibreSSL simply can't coexist with OpenSLL so they have no other choice.

Void Linux is a binary distro which supports both Open- and LibreSSL, they simply provide two binaries, they compile it twice against either.

&gt; They also provide OpenRC and other initsystems, they just aren't officially supported.

THey don't provide it, it's in the AUR but it won't work with any package which is compiled against systemd expecting systemd to be there.

&gt; So choices exist in abundance in Arch Linux. Not sure where you got the idea that they didn't.

That there is absolutely nothing to be found about it on google or on the Archwiki, no page on the website whatsoever that explains how you can run Arch with Musl.&gt; \#DO NOT EDIT WILL BE OVERWRITTEN

This is typically the syndrome of distros setting up automated stuff that overwrites this. If you want to absolutely avoid this, go Slackware. But for the most part you can disable this stuff I guess.

I'm personally not a fan of automaticlaly generated config files.The catch is that you don't have to move to the mouse to select a file first.

Also, oldname is tab completed of course.&gt; If you\u2019re __a software developer, laptop or home user, hobbyist, enthusiast, or student__, Fedora Workstation is perfect for you. Fedora Workstation includes the newest release of the __GNOME desktop__,

lel.Will be the same if successful, whatever differences exist will likely be not noticeable.

This is under the assumption that it's successful. These things purely exist because believe it or not, Unix is infested with aneuploidic wastes of meiosis who seriously lack the intelligence to install a piece of software. This probably being the driving force behind the success of GNOME in and of itself. Quite. These things seriously spreading the impression that the "DE" is not anything more than a program that is installed like any other. Can be changed without a reboot or if you're fancy, keep both at the same time running besides each other.Live kernel patching is like one of the most misunderstood overhyped things ever.

Also, I'm sure you can compile your own kernel and turn it on again if you want it. I'm sure Fedora has the sources of their kernel around some-where. It's just a standard thing you can turn on or off in the kernel.&gt; Yeah, but I don't make the mistake of confusing a small group of toxic systemd haters on Gentoo chat with the Gentoo community that also include systemd developers with commit access.
It is a classic mistake for the systemd-opponents that they make themselves believe they are more people than they really are; it is just a small group of people endlessly posting anti-systemd posts. They are all talk an no code, so developers are simply ignoring them, preferring to code systemd support instead of refuting a constant stream of wrong info or wacky conspiracy theories.
So some people are in for a rude surprise when Gentoo changes to systemd as default init because the majority of Gentoo developers want that. They won't give up on OpenRC, but it just won't be default anymore.

So how on earth have you managed to turn a discussion on Arch offering choice or not into one your typical systemd adoption crusades?

&gt; See the package here: https://www.archlinux.org/packages/community/x86_64/musl/

... that's to build busybox which is used inside initramfs. That doesn't replace your standard c library.

You can't just install a a libc and expect it to work, you do know that every single package has to be compiled _against_ a specific libc right for it to work or you get linker errors?Yes, it's kind of annoying how those comments sometimes don't put that there, sometimes they do though.

But if you want to be completely free from this shit, go Slackware. Slackware is a venerable bastion of Unix, it's so Unix it grows filthy messy beard hairs across its filesystem.\u00ddou do know that microkernel and small resource consumption are completely unrelated thing, right?If there was a way to check the boxes "correctly" the boxes would not exist.

The boxes exist because they're subjective choices.It never existed?

People like to act like these things used to be better, come one.&gt; insert some Ray Kurzweil statement about how we're going to be robots in 10 years.

I think it's more like that the people who come with the sensationalist claims tend to _become_ famous because of them.

Can't speak too mich about Kurzwell, but take Carl Sagan as an example, he really hasn't done that much in Astrophyistics but his continued pushing of boyhood space programme dreams have sort of _made_ him famous.I've been on and off running rootless X for a while now on Gentoo which just enables it with a USE flag, the problems are for me:

- I do not use any form of seat/session management since I live alone, don't have any kids and am pretty much the only person using this computer. This means that in theory I could remotely snoop on my own input or someone gaining a hold of my account which is in the "input" group to enable this. Not a disastrous thing since I'm in the audio and video group without sessions and seats anyway.
- Weirdly enough, I cannot open a window with root privileges while running X as nonroot. This is sometimes kind of annoying and the real reason I often switch back to running it as root.
-  for some reason running X as nonroot requires that the X session be started at the vt it was started from. The usual shtick is to `startx` at vt1 and have the X session appear at vt7. If you do that now it won't fly, it has to start at vt1 which is annoying  at times because you can't just `mod4+f1` to go to vt1 and see your error output. Since I hack around a lot with my stuff doing things like running Xorg as nonroot unsupportedly, it's kind of nice to see that.&gt; Well, that depends. If I have downloaded software that guarantees that every choice uses Gnome integration, then there is only one definition for correct behaviour: use Gnome choices. Vice versa with KDE. It is clear cut what is meant by right and wrong there.

Not really, sometimes you don't want to support certain parts of GNOME because you don't use them or certain parts of KDE.

Like in your kernel, they put everything on under the idea of "Better for something to be there they don't use then something to not be there they do want.", resources aren't finite and in the end even people who say "But modern computers have so many cycles and so much RAM" sometimes still feel lag due to occupied schedules. They wouldn't have felt that if they slimmed down their profile.

&gt; That's why installing a DE by hand will not be as tightly unified as downloading a spin.

Tightly unified isn't a good thing per se, only if you use the unification.

I went yesterday from enabling d-bus on EVERYTHING to "only enabling d-bus in the cases where I use it". The result is night and day:

- packages that could be removed: dconf, phonon-vlc, good riddance to dconf anyway, it's a bloody registry that seemingly only existed because cheese had dbus on which I never use.
- dbus daemon went from ~400 Kib ram to ~200 KiB ram.
- overall system went from ~900 MiB ram to ~700 MiB ram in idle after having my default applications started.

That's a pretty massive difference, no?We have the technology to create anything that can theoretically be made within a week provided someone pays enough.

The more money you pump into it, the more you accelerate resource. The only cap is the total number of people on the planet, but even that can probably be circumvented by first inventing the technology to clone shit or do some AI stuff or whatever provided someone is willing to pay enough.

There's probably not enough money on the planet though, so it's purely a theoretical thing.Yes, that is True. It's annoying.

A lot of these terms are confusing though, like "running whatever as user" is often understood as "as user without special rights" but within kernel land it means that it's run in user-space rather than kernel-space which can still be as root user.

Edit: Interestingly enough, for me googling "rootless X" results into a page on Ubuntu's official documentation on how to run X without root rights.I never got how people cite "Never having to re-install" as an advantage of rolling distros. Like, you never have to re-install in versioned distros either, they all have a system like this.The sole reason to install Linux is to free yourself from the idiots that infest inferior platforms. Unfortunately for the Linux user community, distributions like Ubuntu have made it too easy for your mom to get a working Linux box -- so they are all running in horror.

Installing a working Linux box used to require over 550 man hours, learning a Nordic language, sacrificing a goat, wading through hundreds of pages of (purposely) inscrutable help files, and in some cases programming a new driver in UNIVAC SLEUTH II assembly code using nothing but punch cards while walking miles through the snow barefoot on the wrong side of the tracks and uphill both ways. Today, Linux distros are so idiot-proof that you can put their install CDs into the floppy drive upside-down and the fucker will still work.

Old-school Linux users were desperate to find a new way to feel superior. Some migrated to versions of BSD, others gave into baroque feats of self-torture like multi-booting 4 different operating systems from one USB drive. But it didn't have the same appeal as abusing other operating systems for their lack of 1337n355.


In this dark hour there was a new hope: __Gentoo Linux__, a distribution designed for users possessing that delicate combination of insecurity and masochism that results in an obsession with obscurity, optimization, and huge dollops of pain and frustration. Gentoo has sated all of these urges.


Enter the idea of a "hemorrhaging edge" distro: Gentoo. It is the exemplar of the term "hemorrhaging edge" -- there is no piece of software too advanced, too experimental, or too downright dangerous for the main tree. In fact, if the users don't crash their box at least once a week due to new and untested software they will swarm onto the forums and accuse Gentoo of "going all Debian" on them. After the separate Stable and Unstable branches were created, every user switched immediately to Unstable which became the new de-facto Stable. As a response, the Gentoo developers invented a new Super-Unstable overlay system and made it as hard and annoying to use as possible in order to keep the stupid masses out, thus cementing their own position at the top of the hobbyist heap. This has worked, to a point, but a group of developers has formed in order to create a Gentoo offshoot, Exherbo ("Cannabis Withdrawal") where the system tools are in erudite Latin instead of plain English and normal users are instructed on the web page to stay far away for fear of spoiling the 1337.Might as well be called "What is new in GNOME".

I fondly remember the days when we got to laugh at Windows users when every new windows release purely focussed on interface rather than actual substantial things. Sadly "Year of the Linux desktop" has taken all our well-deserved elitism away.Quite right, Fedora treats its users like complete idiots and GNOME is no exception.

Well, there's a thing to be said, users of both are of course complete idiots. But that's only because of the former.&gt; You don't want to add yourself to input group because not everything that runs under your name is trusted by you, e.g. file:///dev/input/event0.

I'm not sure what you mean with this, why is it not trusted by me

&gt; Should not happen. And does not happen for me.

I periodically ask around and can't find a lot about it. What happens is that the windows respond to input perfectly but the windows themselves that are generated display only one colour. The colour they display however seems to some-how be linked to the toolkit theme they use. Otherwise there's nothing inside the window. This happens on two different machines.

Edit: Fixed it now, it was a Qt thing, all the windows I tested with just happened to be Qt windows by coincidence. (I use Qt over GTK when I can). A simple setting change in Qt fixed it.

&gt; It's kind of a feature because when you lock your X session, someone else can't just ctrl-alt-f1 and ctrl-c to restart your X session.

the better way in that case would be a way to lock that too in some way. Clear the buffer and make it no longer respond to input.

In any case, I don't screen lock since hey, single user computer. If I had use for locking X I probably had use for sessions and seats.About as long as it'll take people here to see the light and stop using mobile phones or stream?

Turns out people are willing to sacrifice whatever privacy if it's a product they simply can't do without. Mobiles phones are _way worse_ than Windows:

- they can track your position, Windows cannot.
- the way they work means that phone companies can record and track your every conversation, there is no encryption scheme that stops this.
- [someone snooping at the airwaves can even track your conversations.](http://arstechnica.com/gadgets/2010/12/15-phone-3-minutes-all-thats-needed-to-eavesdrop-on-gsm-call/)

Seriously, people who are high and mighty about privacy and for not using Windows but still use cell phones, urgh. Cell phones are _way_ worse.

But as I said, people won't give it up when it's a product they can't really live without.

Also, you use google?&gt; The problem is, he doesn't understand whatsoever how to switch from developing proprietary software to open-source software. The person interviewing him said, "... So you're saying that it's more important that I make open-source software than feed my kids?". Stallman replied, "Absolutely, Stallman replied, "Open-source software benefits everyone, while it's acutally a harm to the environment to have kids [because of the quality of life in America]."

This is a fallacy of Stallman's part. He basically makes the jump from "Not having kids" to "not feeding them".

While you can argue that not having kids might be more ethical than having them. I think few would argue that once you have them, letting them starve to death is ethical.There most certainly isn't, I never argued against GUI's.

I mean, you think I'm running without X server or something?

I have nothing against GUI's, I have something against slowness.

Turns out that playing an FPS with the mouse goes a lot better and nets you quicker headshots than trying to do it with keyboard-only.

For file manipulation however, a commandline is king. Note that a commandline isn't the same as terminal. Command __line__ being the operative part. Things like Midnight Commander are not command lines and just as slow as nautilus in the end. Especially when it involves batch renaming according to a pattern of course. Like I said, things like backing up every file in a dir `rename '(.*)' '\1.bkp *'So tell me, how did you manage to switch from BSD init to systemd like Arch forced you without a reboot?When have these people ever been about "saving lives", with the exception of One at the start, all these people have mostly just been okay with killing in the name of profit and war and none has gone out of their ways to save lives.

I'm not sure how the show is trying to make you think they are good people. A lot of people say they are "reformed" criminals, I never saw evidence of that on screen, they're just criminals.

I honestly get the impression that people think these guys are "reformed" because they're the main characters and it's hard to believe that we're pretty much following career criminals around, but that's what we are. Even Five, she started out as a thief sneaking on board, and she remains a thief. She's a little girl horrified having to watch 2 butcher a bunch of casino thugs, but she's fine with stealing stuff, clearly.

What I think is going on is that people are confused because they aren't Disney villains, they don't have stereotypical evil laughs or are overly sadistic even, like most criminals, they kill because they have to, they don't take evil pleasure out of it, they might even be reluctant to do so without a real need. But in the end, they still do it if the job pays well. Most shows don't portray criminals as human beings, this one does.

Edit, also:

&gt; Murders everyone in the room except the girl.

This is what bothers me the most to be honest. Especially his deduction on that she was Draves: "Yeah, you have short nails and you're too pretty to be that guys girlfriend, you are clearly the True boss, my logic is infallible.", and for some reason he's right.

Besides, if she is secretly Draves. Why not shoot her?

Just in general, this show does not like to portray a man shooting a woman while men shoot men and women women women and women men all the time. But hey, after the angry mob managed to get GTA V pulled because the game lets you kill 2 women alongside 999 men for "encouraging violence against women" I can understand the producers like to not offend certain 'special interest groups'.I don't get what you mean with that.That depends on what you mean with "my own operating system"

Do you mean really designing and programming your own one. Or do you mean simply making your own linux distro?Well, I now fixed it (I always find it funny how you always get more motivated to ind a fix for stuff you've been dealing with for like half a year after you posted it in a forum thread:

It's purely a Qt problem and caused by the QT mitshim extension. To solve it, either make sure the process itself gets the environment var `QT_X11_NO_MITSHM=1`. Id est something like `kdesudo env QT_X11_NO_MITSHM=1 &lt;your_app&gt;`

Or more simply, add `QT_X11_NO_MITSHM=1` to `/etc/environment`

So here we are, x as non root on a single user machine. No logind, nothing fancy and probably a security loss rather than a security gain but we'll see how it goes.

By the way, it just displaces the problem, now logind runs as root so logind now has the attack vector. And a lot of security vulnerabilities are often found in systemd. Probably because the focus a lot on adding new features rather than auditing their old. Which isn't a bad thing per se, I share Linus' opinion that "security" is a feature like any other. But just a head's up to people I guess.I'm inclined to agree. As I said in the displacing part. Which is also one of the, albeit not really big reasons, why I don't use sessions and seats and polkit since I don't need them. Unlike MACs they work by granting extra privileges to unprivileged things rather than taking away privileges of privileged things thus creating extra attack vectors..

The age old thing with security is of course: the simpler your permission model, the less troubles with security you're going to have. The classical Linux security model of owner, group, others with rwx permissions is rock solid, battle tested and unlikely to have any hole in any kernel right now. But it's also just too simple for a lot of common use cases.

I can totally understand the need for sessions and seats in companies and on "family computers", people just need that kind of flexibility there. They need things like only giving certain permissions when someone has a seat.

The thing I do not agree with though is that these things are also used to enable "just works" things. Putting a USB drive into a computer and automatically mounting it, this isn't to give fine-tuned permissions, this is to spare people about learning about the mount command. Same with fine-tuned shutdown and what-not permissions.

Polkit policies are turing complete, they're Javascript. Infinitely flexible, far more than the sudoers file. But a lot more can go wrong if the policy isn't carefully crafted by a system administrator. `sudo` is also simple and rock solid as a consequence. I seriously doubt there's something people have overlooked in it that can allow someone to gain escalation. There was a fuzz a while back that the default Ubuntu policy had something someone overlooked which basically meant that the system could be considered to have an infinite sudo timeout that survived reboots. If a user had used sudo _once_ ever there was a way for another person who did not know his or her password to use sudo and gain root rights because the overcomplex polkit policy left that vector open.Well, I didn't write it:

http://uncyclopedia.wikia.com/wiki/Gentoo#Motivation_for_yet_another_Linux_distro

The command to install Gentoo is wrong by the way, the careful reader will notice `chroot ... &amp;&amp; ...` at some point. The part after the `&amp;&amp;` is of course only executed after the chroot exists, not _inside_ the chroot.The victory condition is largely arbitrary in fact, except for the few cases you mentioned, the real condition is pretty much "be so far ahead that you can do whatever you want and your opponent can't stop you any more."

99% of games would basically be the same if the victory condition was something absurd like "make a 200/200 army of pure workers" or "cover the entire map in creep". "destroy all enemy buildings" for the most part serves as a tangible definition of "Be so far ahead you can do whatever you want and your opponent can't stop you.", except for those very few games which do come down to the last building.

I remember a reddit post that argued that the victory condition should be changed to "bank 10 000 minerals / 10 000 gas" or "have the largest bank if all resources are gone". The argument was that for 99% of games it would not make a difference but it would essentially stop swarmhost vs swarmhost stalemates as you would be forced to actually secure terrain and resource nodes in such a scenario. It kind of makes sense in my brain.

Same rules for ties as always apply.The films are not meant to appeal to "Star Trek fans", which isn't a bad thing in and of itself though.

I think the problem is in fact the opposite. For some reason, in Star Trek and a lot of other things people are obsessed with keeping this One True Canon and even these films which basically tried to be a reboot still tried to keep that by making a diverging timeline shtick, bad mistake in my opinion.

Comic books have long realized the advantages of just letting multiple canons co-exist. Marvel even gives them all numbers. The "Marvel Cinematic Universe" is perfectly fine with changing things up like making Jarvis an AI called J.A.R.V.I.S. all of the sudden, making Nick Fury bald and black. And I think that's completely fine.

But here we are in Star Trek: Into Darkness. Where the Indian Khan is canonically still the same guy as he was born before the Timeline diverged, but with no explanation offered we suddenly have a white British guy. I'd be completely fine if they didn't attach the timeline with making Khan a Caucasian British man. Hell, they could've made him a woman and spice things up a bit. But they didn't and now explain how that all fits into the timeline.

Trying to keep everything canon with each other after 50 years is doomed to fail. The Original Series was made in a different time with outdated knowledge of technology and social politics. I mean in TOS there are still people walking around who think it strange that a woman is an XO, come oooon. That might have seemed conceivable in the 60's but come on. Hell, even Sisko's ideas of his 14 year old son being too young to have a girlfriend are already considered frightfully conservative.

So just detach it completely and reboot it, call it  "an adaptation of a cult 1960's sci-fi series", it's done so often. In that way you can perfectly justify the more advanced and sleek technology and the new look of the Enterprise.It kind of reads like: "What quickly becomes obvious is that _The Witcher_ is very much a PC exclusive game, which are typically designed to be as complex and unintuitive as possible so that those dirty console playing peasants don't ruin it for the glorious PC Gaming Master Race"winemine obviously.

Minesweeper is the greatest thing MS ever invented, nay the greatest piece of software to ever exist.&gt; well-this-blew-up edit: People, please stop insulting OP's parents. It's not productive. Also, keep in mind that OP isn't insulting OP's parents.

If OP isn't, why shouldn't we?

OP is obviously biased because selfish genes make kid love parents. Shit parents are shit parents the way I see it from this story.So when I was 15 years old and still living at home. My mother "gave" me a bunch of doors for my room, basically they were sliding doors you can install inside a room on rails to turn 20 cm of your room into a closet. She had them installed as a surprise while I was away and said she "gave" them to me. They annoyed me so at one point I just got too frustrated with them serving absolutely no function and took them out and during transport one of them broke.

She got mad when she found out and demanded that I repayed them because they were "her doors" and just because they were in my room which was in her house did not mean they were my property. I just asked her what she thought the sentence "I'm giving you these as a praesent." meant to her, because to me it entails a transfer of property, might be wrong though.On that note. Does anyone else find that it often happens that something that seemed ridiculously daunting and complicated 5 days back is now just kind of really easy?

It's kind of funny how stuff that seems extremely advanced before your read about it always actually turns out quite easy to understand in the end.Giving your kid expensive material gifts has little to do with how good a parent you are.

I subscribe to the idea of largely giving children liquid goods like money. In fact, if I had kids I'd make their allowance simply depend on choirs at home and effectively employ them to teach them the value of labour. Don't want to clean your room? Your choice but I'm not going to pay you for your own work. Not only does it teach them the value of labour, but it gives them liquid currency to spend however they please thus:

- They learn how to allocate currency and learn the benefits of saving once in a while.
- They can spend it however _they_ please and make their own choices and mistakes to learn from.

I find that parents try to protect kids too much from making mistakes, like not letting them do things like building their own PC because they feel it'll go wrong, but really:

- In the event it'll not go wrong, then you held your kid back based on your own understimation of him or her.
- In the event it will go wrong, kid learnt from his or her mistake (hopefully).

I subscribe to letting kids make their own mistakes at their own time and let them learn from it.

Besides, I gain the distinct impression that "protecting people from mistakes" is really just an excuse for being a control freak most of the time.I subscribe to the philosophy that it is morally wrong for people to have a different opinion than I.

If you disagree with that, that would be morally wrong.It's pretty obvious there's brigading going on with anything that concerns this subject. You're often hit by a downvote bomb. Like boom, suddenly 20+ downvotes in the spawn of a short time of one of your post which then slowly climbs again over the course of the day.There's nothing wrong with a bit of social terrorism. I do it every day, whenever I find a  "social rule" which I think is dumb I purposefully go the other route. That's social terrorism in a nutshell.&gt; My point was that they did everything BUT reset the story.

Then it's not a reboot, that's sort the only thing that's required to call it a reboot.

Hell, if you reset the story but keep the entire aesthetic and cast and special effects the same then it's still a reboot.

Reboot speaks purely about disconnecting past canon.But that's what I'm doing.

My political goal is "gee, this social rule is really stupid" and I'm just basically trying to get at them. Or as Linus said it "I like offending people because I think people who get offended should get offended."If GNOME wasn't GNOME all these things would be settings and easily changed to your liking, not only that, they would be stored in a non binary format.

But since the GNOME devs are basically binary clones of Ben Brode and Steve Jobs, they live in the idea that "settings" confuse the hell out of their users whose intelligence barely exceeds that of a common chimpanzee with morning coffee.

Also "beautiful", you must think white boxes with round edges are the cr\u00e8me de la cr\u00e8me of "design".Pretty much.

This supposed connexion between tumblr and people who advocate positive-discrimination. I have never seen it.

Tumblr is basically porn, artsy pics of cats, fanftics and some angsty teens, very little politics, a lot of pictures.They make official written policies which differentiate the sexes with a serious face?As in, a super small part you have to look really hard for to find?&gt; In a twisted sense, administrators were correct to find John Doe guilty. He was accused of sexual assault, and he couldn't prove the encounter was consensual. Imagine if he had accused her of sexual assault as well\u2014__the panel might very well have concluded that they raped each other.__

This part always amuses me of "having sex with a drunk person == rape", what if both people are drunk?

Edit: Anyway, I actually took the liberity to do my own research on:

&gt; are so committed to the "rape culture" fantasy that they will expel a man who passed out in a bed, because a woman performed oral sex on him and regretted it two years later[3] , saying "being intoxicated or impaired by drugs or alcohol is never an excuse (for laying still while a woman performs oral sex on you - thus raping the woman)."

That article you linked abut it was basically bogus namely and omitted a few key details, the way it looks from other news articles it's still a grave miscarriage of justice, but the result of a mistake:

- At the time the guy was expelled the court did not _know_ it was consentual. _her_ claim was that he forced her, _his_ claim was that he was so drunk he could not remember anything, given that he could not dispute her claim they gave her the praeponderance of evidence.
- LATER evidence was found in the text messages she sent where the messages she sent implied something else happened, he blacked out, she proceeded, while inebriated to perform oral sex and when she came to her senses was disgusted with herself. But this evidence only surfaced after being expelled.

So yes, most likely looking at it she lied and the burden of proof is low. But it certainly wasn't as bad as that article made it out to be that the board expelled him knowing that he blacked out and had no part in it all. That's not what they thought at the time at all. She gave a different story and he could not contest it since he was too drunk to remember.

https://www.bostonglobe.com/metro/2015/05/29/amherst/4t6JtKmaz7vlYSrQk5NDyJ/story.html

http://www.gazettenet.com/news/townbytown/amherst/17179365-95/lawsuit-against-amherst-college-from-expelled-student-offers-window-into-sexual-misconduct-investiga

Anyway, it goes to show how you can create a very distorted image by omitting key details. I don't trust any news that is sufficiently outrageous like that, if you google the events you often find a more objective version of events which is kind enough to provide details that nuance the situation more.If anything, this just shows, like many things, that "left" and "right" are dumb fucking labels for political alignments.

Whenever people ask me to place myself or something along the line of "left" and "right" in politics I just feel like telling them they can forcibly insert the politics-line exercise cards into their anus.A poster with names that one can't verify does not an argument make.

Find me an actual court case where it went like this.

Especially because no one is going to get "charged" the next day, are you shitting me. Justice isn't that speedy.&gt; All these things are changeable.

Then why didn't OP?

&gt; If Gnome wasn't Gnome it would be KDE and nobody wants that except KDE users.

\&gt;implying that GNOME and KDE somehow are the only two things that can possibly exist.

For the record, I think both GNOME and KDE suck balls, KDE less so. But any filthy rodent-infested GUI sucks balls in my opinion.

GNOME is just the scum of the earth because of binary config files.Probably because I once defended RMS' defence of bestiality and called the whole deal with bestiality emotional moralism and you are an emotional moralist.&gt; So there is an extralegal "justice" system in universities that will punish people without due process.

Yes, like on any school, you can be expelled for something that is not illegal enough to actually face criminal justice for.

At university for me, someone once got suspended because he refused to be quiet during the lecture and eventually insulted the lecturer. Not severe enough to face legal problems and not illegal, but the university can suspend or expell people for that.

&gt; They even recognized conduct that fits the description of sexual attack (It ruled that while Doe likely was \u201cblacked out\u201d during the oral sex, \u201c[b]eing intoxicated or impaired by drugs or alcohol is never an excuse.\u201d), but punished the victim!

The problem here is purely insufficient fact-finding, they didn't know he was the victim, when they punished him they were led to believe that he coerced her when he was intoxicated. He was too intoxicated to remember what happened to contest her version of events so they basically just believed what she claimed which was a lie it turned out.True, that's a valid point I guess, I did not consider that.It's not a criminal legal system, it works on the praeponderance of evidence, like in civil law.

Your guilt most not be demonstrated beyond a reasonable doubt, it must be "more likely that you are guity, than that you are innocent.", it basically works on the 50.1% rule.

This is, one assumes, information that is all available to you before you start at that university, that you can get expelled based on the 50.1% rule.Then no civilized country exists.

All civilized countries use the "praeponderance of evidence" rule for civil cases which basically means "whoever is more likely to be right wins", the 50.1% rule. This isn't criminal law.

If you sue a company or whatever the 50.1% rule is also applied. The "beyond a reasonable doubt" standard is only applied to criminal cases because the punishment there is incarceration and in some cases where the punishment is only a fine the burden of proof is actually lower in various jurisdictions.

This is a university hearing, not a criminal legal system. This is settling a dispute between two people, arbitration if you will, the reason they can do this is because when you sign up for the university you basically sign an arbitration contract. I'm sure the rules were made clear to both when they signed up that the result of such hearings was binding and they signed it.

A university or company or whatever simply does not hae the means to prove anything beyond a reasonable doubt so internal things like that virtually always rely on the 50.1% rule. And civil cases going through official legal systems go as well.

The guy is now suing the university civilly for this. And guess what, that's also going to go by the 50.1% rule. If the court/jury finds 50.1% chance that the university was at fault then he'll win. Beyond a reasonable doubt is not required in civil cases.Yeah, the  "all enemy units" is something AoE did, you actually had to kill every last one. So what do people do, they hide their units to BM. (lol flying buildings)

All buildings was chosen in BW most likely to avoid this situatin. SC2 further added the "reveal" thing when you loose all town halls to further speed it up.Ah yes, that's the big trick, not make it an actual rule, or make the rule sufficiently vague, as to scare people into actually following it but not leave yourself open to discrimination lawsuits.

Don't you love it when people purposefully make vague rules to scare people into not knowing what exactly their rights are so they can't fight back.

My favourite one is when IRC ops make some super vague ambiguous gesture where they requaest op from chanserv as a show of power but not say anything to scare you into backing off while not saying exactly what the consequences are so you can't attack them on not following the strict published channel policies.I do not, as far as I know, maybe I'm wrong though, the Xfwm does not have an option to as much as disable the title bars and reduce the window border to either nothing or a 1 pixel one.

Fluxbox is my choice of window manager. No bullshit, easy to configure hotkey file and easily to remove useless crap like title bars that only serve to placate the people who love to surround themselves in a rodent pest.It's a good idea on the assumption that your users are idiots who can't operate grep or sed.

Oh wait, that's exactly the market GNOME and Windows are trying to dive into. What did Torvalds say again about GNOME? "If you treat your users like idiots your users will become idiots"? or something like that?

Anyway, there are certainly some marginal performance benefits to binary config. But come on, config is read once on program launch and is insignificant. Furthermore binary files suffer far more heavily from file corruption. Binary configuration is better only when you can safely assume that your users will _never_ want to edit the configuration either by hand or with some other tool than you provided. Which is exactly the assumption windows and GNOME makes about their users.

Really now, what is faster, changing hotkeys with some GUI manually for a couple of applications when you want to change the common hotkey for closing things consistently or:

    sed -ir 's/C-q :close/C-z :close/g' ~/.config/*/hotkeys

Nobody went to jail.

This is an expulsion of a private university, not a criminal case. He was expelled, that was it.&gt; It's fundamentally unfair to have someone using such mechanism to expel someone and fuck with their life and not suffer any consequence for this. It's also unfair that he wasn't admitted back or received any remedy. This isn't an isolated incident.

Turns out that any arbitration or justice system is unfair due to the imperfection of finding evidence. Arbitration tends to go with "however is more likely to be right" because there is no "defendant" both are considered aequal parties. If the burden was higher for the person spawning the case and had to actually prove guilt beyond a reasonable doubt then the one spawning would never win and people would get away with everything.

The state has a very high burden on the logic that the state is a very powerful entity that shuld be able to have the resources to prove guilt beyond a reasonable doubt, a civil party simply has no such resources.

As in, the system isn't perfect, quite bad actually, but do you have a better solution? If your guilt had to be proven with the same standard as a criminal case then people would continually get away with harassing, bullying, pestering and what-not their fellow students because a simple student lacks the ability to prove anything beyond a reasonable doubt.

&gt; About the case itself, it's absurd to rule that the guy was likely was "blacked out" during the oral sex but still rule that he coerced her. It's not just inadequate fact-finding, it's seeing white snow and concluding it's red. Having sex with someone incapacitated is rape.

He wasn't ruled to be blacked out. He said he was so drunk he could not remember, the blacked out part, as in, being actually unconscious only surfaced later.

Basically "I was so drunk I can't remember" is a convenient way often to avoid things, so the tend to ignore it. Given the evidence at the time, they acted in accordance with the rules. It's not like the hearing board has the capacity to change the rules, their job is to rule who has the praeponderance of evidence, simply whose story is more _likely_ to be True. Which was the case for the story of the accuser here.

The fault they made was not re-opening the case when new evidence surfaced, and that was the _only_ fault the hearing board made.

You can argue the rules aren't appropriate and a higher standard of proof is required, but that's not in the power of the hearing board to change.Okay, bomb shell, what if it's not to assume it's a male and female?

How do your sexist pricks deal with two men or two women, hmm?&gt; Depends on the argument. In this case, the only argument I endeavor to support is, "there exist people who are part of this ideology (SJW) who feel this policy (the man is always guilty) is rational."

Well yes, then you are right, of course there exists at least one.

And the poster doesn't even prove that, since the poster is obviously satire to prove the opposite.&gt; Linux is at least partially an alternative to Windows. Perhaps not all software works, but browsers and most games work.

No, browsers do except MS Edge, most games don't.

Linux has less than 20% of the games of MS Windows, you do know that right?&gt; The daemon (or anything it forks) can never gain privileges beyond what it got at start (no sudo, no su, no suid-binaries, etc.), it has /etc and /usr read-only, it has a private /tmp directory that only it sees, it does not see any real devices in /dev, does not get any capabilities and of course runs as its own user/group.

Runit offers no native facilities for this basically, you're going to have to script it manually if you want it as it's not portable across Unixen. I know the Linux kernel nowadays via advanced stuff can do this stuff but many people consider it problematic. In particular, I'm talking about the "no sudo, no su, no suid binaries" part.

Basically, the Linux kernel enables a situation where "root is no longer root", which in theory is nice security but the fear of these things and relying on it is that security becomes too hard to understand. You get many layers of "first giving all privileges, then revoking them again, then giving them again then revoking them again in certain places" that it becomes extremely difficult to reason about what the rights of a program exactly are. Which is probably why Theo de Raadt and the OpenBSD groups deplore this and simply say "Make a user with the specific rights and don't run it as root and if setuid binaries on your system form a risk they shouldn't exist at all."

But yeah, I can certainly see some people might want to use these kinds of security features, and those are probably the kind of people that like systemd. But  runit is designed on the principle of "Good security comes from keeping the security model simple and easy to understand."So [this](http://cdn0.dailydot.com/uploaded/images/original/2015/7/16/ccu_cares_poster.jpg) is the new one.

So the "sober" part in particular, that still asks the quaestion, if both are drunk, are both then assaulting each other? Also, this means you have some kind of responsibility to ask if someone is sober or check for it in some way?

It's not always obvious whether someone is sober or not. That's why the police lets you blow. And asking "are you sober" is a bit of a mood kill.

I don't buy the sober argument, you made a decision to take alcohol when you were sober at one point, obviously someone feeding you alcohol without your knowledge is another matter. But you should be held responsible for your actions when you're drunk, and if you don't like that, don't get drunk.

Alcohol is a hard drug, and while I'm completely fine with hard drugs and think people should determine for themselves whether they want to accept the risks, they should definitely also be held responsible once they accepted them and "but I was drunk, I didn't know what I was doing" is no excuse, then don't _get_ drunk.

People say the same things about cocaine so I don't see why alcohol should be any different.

Edit: also, lol "enthusiastic". I guess I've only been raped in my life I guess, I haven't been "enthusiastic" since I was a 6 year old kid or something.No, I'm saying praeponderance of evidence.

This is just how it works, I don't have to prove int his case I'm not a rapist, I just have to make it seem more likely that I am not than that I am. Since most people are not rapists, simply no evidence either way already makes it more likely that I am not.

This isn't criminal law, this is civil arbitration, civil arbitration and civil law is always done on the praeponderance of evidence, the 50.1% rule.Yes, it works for you because most of your games just happen to work on it, if most of the software you used didn't you'd stil be on windows, so don't act all high and might.

I don't own a mobile phone, simply because I don't have a need for one. It's easy to be "free" when you don't need any proprietary stuff.Then again, having sex with someone you don't know as Assange is probably pretty dumb. You know they are out to get you, don't forget to tell your big guy about the prime directive.SELinux then again isn't meant for normal standard desktops. The article complains the default is too insanely paranoid secure. But that's what SELinux is meant for, for people who need insane paranoid security.It comes across as a typical BS fallacy of assuming that "If X that provides Y didn't exist, then Y would not be provided for at all."

What rather will happen is that something else than X would provide Y. It basically makes about as much sense as assuming that people who drive a Ford would not own a card if Ford didn't exist, no, they would just get another car.

It's ridiculous BS propaganda.Or how much idiots hate face hunter, who knows?It typically doesn't benefit you much as an end user when whomever you're dealing with has a financial interest.

The only reason I see to ever deal with RHEL is if that support contract is actually useful for you. Otherwise you're probably better off with a non profit distro.

And apart from that, then there's the fact that Gentoo is actually a super solid distro that gives you the tools to make your own decisions and whose development largely centres around making tools that allow you to be in charge over your own system, rather than other distros whose development involves writing very little software and making  more subjective choices for its users.

The point about "support" is that it necessitates a largely homogeneous base. It's harder to offer support when you give people the tools, freedom, and instructions to modify their system to their own use case.That is such inverted software design philosophy.

The top bar itself should _be_ an extension.

An extension to remove functionality boggles my mind.And the first word of the article is "Me" as a subject, and the first verb is "has" instead of "have".

Don't you just want to shoot people who say "Me and John have done this." or something like that.How about [this one](https://www.kernel.org/)So I read your story, and decided to actually Google, given your amount of upvotes, I'm left to conclude most people reading it did not bother to find out what happened because your story here is a _gross_ misappropriation of events:

http://techcrunch.com/2013/03/21/a-dongle-joke-that-spiraled-way-out-of-control/

tl;dr:

- She was sitting in front of some guy making a joke she didn't like.
- She made a tweet about it how she didn't like the joke, and did use the usual BS of "unwelcoming to women", as if women some-how inhaerently can't take a joke or whatever
- Then, without asking her, the guy got fired for it.
- Then she went on record saying that she never wanted the guy fired and that she thinks getting fired for something like that was completely excessive
- Then both the guy, and she, get attacked by massive shitstorms from opposites both, both being put words into their mouth and a lot of people claiming on reddit either did things they never did.

So no, she never tried to get him fired, she just took offence at his joke and came to his defence when he got fired for it.That the GNOME et al. devs are volunteers changes nothing, they're ruining my Unix by letting too many idiots in. I'm not complaining about the quality of the code but their direction, it's a wide open door that says "Yo you, Miss Idiot that has no motivation to learn about the system you're using, yes, come here, Linux is for idiots now too. Come in and go ruin it for the others with your idiocy."

And before you say "You can just ignore it, it doesn't hurt or affect you.", that's not True at all. The problem is that when a program X exists that fulfilles use case Y but has an interface with idiots in mind then people are less motivated to write a program Z that does the same thing because something already exists even though the interface is intended for idiots. So something that fulfils use case Y without an annoying interface aimed at retards will never exist.

You see a _frightfully_ large number of programs nowadays who are written opposite of what you would expect, in True Windows Fashion they were GUI programs from the start, they weren't first command line tools on top of which a GUI was later built which calls the CLI, which is a _bad_ idea. You should first make the "lower level" CLI. In fact, you should go in this direction:

1. first make the shared library
2. then make the cl interface to that library. Separate interface from logic, please.
3. then make, or let someone else make, the GUI if there is a need.

Why? Because a GUI can always call a CLI but having a CLI call a GUI is considerably more cumbersome and wasteful.&gt; I mean polished, GUI tools, easy to understand instructions for the typical end-user.
I mean READY.

What you call "ready" then I call "invaded by idiots". Quite frankly, even if  the choice of CLI were to do \*nothing* but keep the GUI users out, that in itself would be a huge reason to use a CLI.I have no answer to any of that, but to say "she got two guys fired" implies a significantly different turn of events than what actually happened and it most definitely implies the opposite of that she stood up for him and said he should not be fired.&gt; Don't like Gnome? Don't use it. Endlessly doing online whines about a piece of software you don't use is bad for the Linux community and reflects badly on you too.

This just shows you havne't read my post at all.&gt; Yes I did. It changes nothing. Don't like it, don't use it. I ignored your feeble argumentation that attacking projects you don't use is valid, because it isn't.

You ignored it without as much as arguing why the argument is invalid. Below the part you quoted is a part that directly addresses "don't like it, then don't use it" and you failed to as much as respond to it.No, the CLI is because it's faster and just generally more efficient.

It's like saying you should take a kick scooter to work instead of a bike because the kick scooter is a newer invention despite the bike being faster.So you want to make Linux more attractive for proprietary software? Got it.

This whole "More users means more supported software" really only extends to proprietary software. Every single open piece of FOSS software is already supported.

Having a couple extra proprietary apps is not worth being constantly frustrated by retarded interfaces that just seem to make things more difficult for you. And if you like such interfaces and don't care about software freedom, then you might as well use Windows. Like, what's the point of using a FOSS unixlike OS if it's going to behave like Windows and have proprietary software on it anyway? The point of it is to not have to deal with retarded interfaces and software freedom, if you throw that away you might as well stick to Windows.Used to, now does a Chromebook Pixel, both with Fedora

I would not use Torvalds as an argument of doing proper research to buy the best for the lowest price though. He pretty much does the opposite. He also claims he's too dumb to install Debian and claims that all he really understands about OS'es are kernels and anything on top of that is too complicated for him. He also claims to know fuck all about hardware.If you use Chrom{e,ium} OS you basically use Gentoo, fun fact.

Also, given that, and that it uses upstart, that basically makes upstart the most popular service management far exceeding systemd and makes Gentoo probably the most popular distro.

Chrome OS is essentially Gentoo + custom forked repo (that you can add as a overlay in mainline gentoo if you want) + fancy DE.`systemd-windowsd` incoming. Unconditional dependency for `systemd-spywared`A better analogy would be being careless with fire near a pile of hey and setting the hey on fire by accident and then trying to put it out and say "I didn't mean to."

You can accuse her of being careless, but there is no evidence that she actually actively _sought_ to have him fired which is what the post I was replying to very much implied.Maybe you shouldn't pick a distro that enables things by default you don't like any actually do more research than "ohh, this GUI looks pretty, let's pick this one."

I take the greatest pleasure from laughing at people who want "just works" stuff only to figure out how much it bites them in the butt as it "just worked" alright, just in a way they didn't want to.

Luckily I researched what SELinux was and elected to disable all support for it both in kernel and userland. I can certainly see its use case, but I don't really need it.

Plebs who don't research properly what they do and don't need and just randomly pick something deserve their own misfortune.True, but then again, I didn't say "she made a tweet about it", I said: "She made a tweet about it how she didn't like the joke, and did use the usual BS of "unwelcoming to women", as if women some-how inhaerently can't take a joke or whatever"Well, to be fair, a lot of people do make it super personal with Poettering. What I find interesting about the whole systemd debate is that systemd proponents can roughly be placed into two groups:

- those who show how systemd solved many issues that existed before
- those who attack people who dislike systemd

Whereas systemd detractors can be roughly put into two groups

- those who show what is wrong with the architecture of systemd and possible problems with its possible feature scope-creep
- those who attack Lennart Poettering

Like, it's never even Kay Sievers, it's always Poettering.

Then again, Poettering makes it about as personal in return:

&gt; Also note that at that point we intend to move udev onto kdbus as transport, and get rid of the userspace-to-userspace netlink-based tranport udev used so far. Unless the systemd-haters prepare another kdbus userspace until then this will effectively also mean that we will not support non-systemd systems with udev anymore starting at that point. __Gentoo folks__, this is your wakeup call.

For some random reason he out of no-where singles out "Gentoo folks", and make no mistake, on the Gentoo fora Lennart is basically put on a pedestal of vitriol that towers above Hitler and Satan.

Edit: Also, Lennart Poettering posted a rebuttal to some of the common arguments called "biggest myths" (showing he at least tries to listen). Which was about:

- 1/3 debunking flagrant and incorrect myths about systemd that are just objectively False
- 1/3 calling things myths which aren't myths but just saying "it's not so bad and your concerns are overblown", sometimes reasonably so.
- 1/3 playing language games and making arguments which hinge on definitions and semanticsThe vast majority of arguments against anything are complete BS, and in fact the vast majority of arguments in favour of anything, including systemd are also BS.

Edit: That is to say, systemd actually does legitimately solve a lot of issues with sysvinit and other things and in fact solves a couple of things that no other init/service-manager/login-tracker solves. But here's the thing, all the other modern managers like Upstart, runit, OpenRC _also_ solve a variety of things that systemd does not necessarily solve. Virtually any advocacy of systemd compares it to sysvinit, it's like comparing Linux to Windows to make it look good rather than to FreeBSD. And yes, even if you compare systemd to say runit you can point out a lot of things that it does, that runit doesn't, and in reverse if you compare runit to systemd you can also point out similar advantages.

So what are we left with? That different things work best for different use cases, and they have all been designed for different use cases so that's no surprise. The problem with systemd is that unlike all the other options, systemd's design, _possibly intentionally_ won't leave the others alone. Upstart, runit, OpenRC, BSD-style init, sysvinit, they leave people alone who don't want it, systemd's design grows tentacles, that it happens is not some conspiracy theory, that it happens is an observed fact, what remains conjecture is whether this is intentional and given that Red-Hat has a vested commercial interest into making the Linux oecosystem more homogenous and is definitely well served with the same pid1, service management and login management existing on all the Linuxboxen. That this is by design is not something you can just dismiss as tinfoil nonsense. A lot of parts of systemd certainly do not actually need to be so tightly tied to its pid1 to function in theory as they are.

Take Chrome OS, a fun little factlet is that Chrome OS is basically Gentoo + Upstart + Fancy GUI. If you open a Terminal in Chrome OS you find pretty much the entire Gentoo stack sitting there. They decided that Upstart suited their needs best. A Fedora dev and systemd advocate actually contacted them publicly to make a case to switch to systemd but they told him or her that they were not interested and saw no reason at the moment for systemd. I have _never_ quite in opensource seem something quite like that and it happens quite often that certain interest groups advocate the adoption of systemd at places where it's not yet there. Lennart Poettering basically personally asked and convinced the GNOME devs that depending on logind was a good idea. There are certain political forces at work that push the mass adoption of systemd and they seem to mostly originate from Red-Hat, in that light I find it quite convenient that the architecture of systemd just happens to be conducive to growing tentacles.Yes, I was wrong about that.

I first took the poster as actually being satire about the whole "men can't be raped" culture. Turns out it was actually serious and didn't at all consider just how much a ridiculous dual standard it portrays.

But hey, it was removed quicly enough.And KDE, unlike GNOME, stores that info in a plain text and consistent format across its applications in a consistent place.

I run a variety of KDE apps though not the window manager and I don't run `systemsettings`, no need KDE's text editor is a simple enough tool to edit all the settings in KDE.

KDE tools honestly strike a nice balance of giving you the option to use some weird insane GUI and just doing it simple by editing very simple ini-like files that store the settings. For extremely marginal performance benefits, and I say this as a Gentoo user, GNOME has locked you out of the latter.

Whatever marignal performance you're going to get from reading settings you loose infinitely by the extra time needed to change one.&gt; anti lgbt

He donated to support prop 8. That makes him anti lgb at best.

I never got why the "t" is so often grouped with the lgb (or why the l and g got their own gender). It like has _nothing_ to do with each other. You can even see it has nothing to do with the other three because anyone can be only one of L, G, or B but you can be for instance both L and T or both B and T.

Both groups have like completely unrelated issues to deal with and completely unrelated causes to fight for, there's about zero overlap. I don't think the problem of ridiculous requirements for HRT while you can get a breast enhancement within 5 days notice affects the LGB that much.I feel totally sexually violated by how much your swearing turns me on.After the guy raged so much at SuSE for requiring a authentication as administrative user to add a printer or wireless network, id est a setting that can trivially be changed in the polkit policy. I'm inclined to believe that he knows as little about how a modern unixlike OS is structured above the kernel as he claims.He wasn't punished for "rape", maybe you should read the article.

The school simply has a code of conduct about inappropriate behaviour, a lot of it not being illegal and expels you based on the praeponderance of evidence.

It's like being expelled for saying racially insensitive shit or whatever, which is not a crime as well but something that is in the rules of the college before you sign up.

No one was punished for any crime. I mean, Dr. Phil got his licence revoked by the clinical psychologist association because he was "inappropriate with his assistant", what he did wasn't a crime but there are rules in that organization apparently that you can't do that with an inferior due to some balance of power, I don't know. It's not a criminal thing, its a civil thing.

Universities, companies, work associations and what-not are free within certain limits to set their own rules and codes of conduct about behaviour and expell people who don't follow them.Is this like some kind of satire or what? Because this wasn't about that at all.If security is your number one priority, probably.

But security is feature like any other.Who is this "we" of which you speak.

I learnt half an hour ago or something that Eich donated to Prop 8 and was no longer with Mozilla.Then your problem isn't SELinux, then your problem is whoever hired you.

This is like bitching at Ruby because someone decided you had to write a microkernel in it and Ruby is uniquely unfit for that task.I don't know, I just always think it's amusing to see people insult me, especially how I look.

Just in general, I love hearing all the bad things people think about me.Of course Gentoo is. Certainly one expects that Gentoo offers you the _choice_ to run systemd.

The thing about the "Gentoo folks" who hate Lennart so much is that most still feel that whoever wants to run systemd should be given the choice to do so. They're just cynical about the choice to not run systemd being encroached and taken away.The promise was "for a very long time", but I think we can agree that 2 years is not a "very long time".

But yes, that's one of the oft-cited cases of systemd devs breaking promises and encroaching stuff, udev is older than systemd. It just happened that one of the devs of udev and the only active one still really remaining was also one of the main devs of systemd.&gt; It gets attributed to people wanting to make themselves feel superior because there aren't many good explanations

Yes there are:

- Venting frustration with having a bad day
- having some prior history of dislike against that person
- Just getting really pissed of from bad code
- Having different standards of civility than you. There is some merit to Linus' saying that it's a cultural thing. I hang around with Finns a lot and they're basically all like that for the most part. When you do something wrong they'll flame you but half an hour later they've already forgotten and aren't angry any more. Finns are very good at getting really angry for short periods and then acting like nothing happened half an hour later.I'm just glad someone noticed my little reference.&gt; Sounds like this is a much a community problem as it is a systemd problem.

Well, udev was started by Kroah-Hartman and Sievers, eventually Kroah-Hartman went to do other things and Poettering took over. So udev and systemd happened to have the same two lead devs so they decided to move it in at that point.

Of course then all alarm bells went off of "OMAGAD GUYS, SYSTEMD IS ABSORBING SHIT NOW THAT EXISTED BEFORE SYSTEMD" and then they said "It's purely a code management thing, you will be free to build udev without the rest" and now they indicated they will go back on this promise the moment they can depend on kdbus.That that seems to be systemd/GNOME/Fedora's way of thinking "Why bother supporting the 20% if we can just force them into using something that may not suit their use case"&gt; Require dconf

kindly die in a fucking fire.For the same reason you would probably care if it was something you really disagreed with. 

Would you care if he made comments supporting turning the US into an Apartheid state? Seriously asking.Yes, that's what praeponderance of evidence means.

Did you know that civil law cases are solved like that around the world, did you now that copyright cases are solved like that, or arbitration cases? Ever seen The People's Court on TV?

The "beyond reasonable doubt" principle only applies when you're up against the state on the logic that the state is so powerful that they should have the means to prove the guilt of the guilty beyond a reasonable doubt, two private citizens simply do not have the means to do that of one another so the dispute is settled based on "Who is more likely to be right."

If you thought that university expulsion hearings required proof beyond a reasonable doubt and did not use the 50.1% rule up to now you've probably never read the flyer and rules of the university you went to. There are no lawyers, no rules of evidence, it's a  civil hearing, not a legal court case.

Was the guilt of the kid who was expelled from school for nasty stuff when you were in the 7th grade proven beyond a reasonable doubt? No, not really.&gt; You do not seem to understand that accusations are not considered as evidence even in civil court. The accuser has to do a lot more than just make a claim.

Not really, if you make a claim in a civil case and the other party makes no no effort whatsoever to defend it you probably win it.

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Legal_burden_of_proof#Preponderance_of_the_evidence

It's simply a case of "more probably than not", if person A accuses person B and person B does not as much make the effort to contest the claim in any way then the chance is probably higher than 50% that B is guilty right? If B were to offer a different accounting of events then obviously there's more reasoning involved.&gt; Maybe if you don't show up, at all. And only because that's considered non-contesting.

No, not really, you seem to live in the idea that accuser here has a higher burden than the defendant, this isn't True. The burden is exactly the same, if the accuser makes a statement but the accuser doesn't. Unless the statement is implausible and discredits the accuser, the accuser has basically already won. The burden isn't higher and the accuser has done more to satisfy it.

To put it like this: If someone tells you "I was forced to perform fellatio upon someone while being drunk." and when you ask that someone that someone says "uhh, I don't know what happened then, don't really remember.", and you were forced to bet your life savings on if the defendant was guilty, would you bet guilty or innocent?

All it takes is 0.01% more likely to be guilty than innocent. You can disagree with that that is the burden, but that's not the possibility of the hearing committee to change. They have to respect the burden given to them. And looking at the evidence _at the time_, with one party giving an account and the other just saying "I don't remember", they did their job.

What they _did_ do wrongly was not re-open the issue when new evidence was surfaced.

And guess what, the guy is suing the school now civilly and the same burden applies now, he just has to make it 50.01% chance likely that they should've re-opened the case after new evidence to win.It's a binary configuration format. Basically a registry, requires specialized tools to edit and is not human-readable.

I love how everywhere you read on the internet that the advantages of "linux" are that no registry exists and configuration is just stored as plaintext files on the file system which can be edited in whatever way you please, sed, a text editor, through the GUI provided with the program. But then projects like GNOME exist which want to make Linux as frustrating and annoying as Windows and _force_ you to only be able to edit the configuration in the way _they_ wanted you to, not in your own time with your own tools in your own way.

Contrasting KDE and everything else Unix except Enlightenment which just stores its configuration in plain text files allowing you to edit it how you please.&gt; That's non-contesting. Also, I assume that you meant "accused", as in "if the accuser makes a statement, but the accused doesn't".

Non conesting is actually not showing up or showing upa nd claiming to non contest verbally.

In this case, he showed up, but said "I don't remember", that makes it, however small, more likely that the accuser is right and the accus__ed__ isn't. yes. Thus the accuser wins.

&gt; And none of this really applies to the kangaroo Title IX courts. They go out of their way to prevent people (men) from defending themselves. You literally are assumed guilty until proven innocent.

Possibly, I haven't read about that, I'm just talking about this specific case where looking at the only thing you can fault the hearing committee over is that they refused to re-open when new evidence was shown.
I'm pretty sure that's not what he means, especially because eudev doesn't need to change based on that, they just don't need to encorporate the change that switches to kdbus. "wake up call" implies something else.

I'm pretty sure he meant to say 'You people are the last to not use systemd, wake up and get with the times."I it can be turned off there is nothing wrong with it, if it's hardcoded it might be a problem.ITT: People discussing irrelevant GUI's which can be switched with a flip of the button. I ran Mint with Fluxbox for years.

They're not identical under the hood. The reasons I will pick Mint over Ubuntu any day and why I will in general pick Mint over any binary distro:

- Mint has more proprietary codecs and makes it easier to obtain them, including better Flash support.
- Ubuntu has a number of kernel patches which seem to serve no real purpose but to enable Wayland and Unity better which Mint does not include.
- Mint kernel packages do not automatically run `update-grub2`, Ubuntu and Debian's do as far as I know which rapes your `/boot` partition, maybe they have a way to disable it but I don't know it.

In any case, picking a distro over its "default settings" is asinine and dumb and if you do so you should feel ashamed of your existence.An interesting contrast is how individual contributors to the Linux kernel actually retain full copyright of their code. As in _they_ are the copyright holders, not the Linux kernel, you don't transfer copyright.

It simply won't get merged into the kernel unless your copyright is GPLv2 compatible for obvious reasons. But they don't require you to transfer copyright to them at all.aDepends, there are definitely distros that are basically "anoher distro with different default options you can easily change', I talked to a Xubuntu dev here who claimed that he or she wasn't sure what, if any, the differences between Xubuntu and Ubuntu + Xcfe installed really were. It's just a different default setting.

Some distros actually do bring something new to the able though and arose because nothing else filled that need at the time.GNOME 2 used gconf which is still bad but at least had a human readable xml database.

I also don't like how kde apps put all their shit into this `~/.kde` folder. Just make a `${XDG_CONFIG_HOME-~/.config}/&lt;appname&gt;` folder for each really.

XML is also gratuitously overcomplicated for something when simply putting `&lt;key&gt; = &lt;value&gt;` on their own lines suffices. There are definitely some cases where XML is superior for configuration though when it gets exceedingly complex.&gt; familiar [to Windows users]

That's pretty much it.

Fun fact, the first Windows interface was a primitive tiling Window Manager. It could only open four Windows at one time I believe and they would automatically tile and splitscreen.

Obviously that's a hilariously bad tiling window manager, so I can see why they switched to the stacking model and their task bar and start menu shit.Basically, a security developer things that security is more important than all the other things, hence becoming a security developer.

I subscribe to Linus' philosophy of security being a feature like any other and security bugs being bugs like any other, not more important than the other ones.I got Shadowbanned a couple of times. I wonder if it has to do with that I never upvoted and downvote, maybe the system flags users who comment but don't vote or in reverse as probable bots,

I really wonder what the process is for determining whether to shadowban.Don't see a problem with "game hopping", is there some rule people cna only play one video game?

The problem with DJWheat though is like he acts it's not what it is. Like, he was asked in an interview what he thought about players and casters leaving SC2 and with a straight face he said something like "They're not leaving, they're just playing different games now."

Well, I thought that sort of implied leaving, but hey.It's systemd's fault if these settings can't be changed. That's why they usually can do go as far as you can to secure against physical access.

I may hope they can be changed, a real use case would be people inside a company having no physical access to the power button, just a keyboard and a screen with a cable going into the wall. Unless they break the wall they cannot physically reach the computer behind it which can only be opened via lock and key. They do not have the administrative right to shut down or reboot the computer and it could be the case that many screens are connected to the same computer.

They should not be able to bypass this with this shortcut so one may indeed hope that it can be disabled.That's not as trivial as you make it seem with future updates and what not. It just doesn't work like that, maintaining a patch-set is less than trivial and with each update certain things need to be made sure to ensure the patch continues to work with the new update.

If it's a setting in a configuration the developers themselves guarantee the setting file continues to work and that the new version is backwards compatible with settings files written for the old one.No, just to Windows users.

If you never used a system with a"task bar", "systray" and "start menu" it'll all be quite alien to you what it is and what it does.

Real life example I encountered, my grandmother was actually one of the first people who worked with computers in companies but had no touched them for like 30 years until she got one. She still remembered directories and commands used to navigate them but did not understand properly how to open folders with pictograms and did not even recognize that those familiar yellow "directory pictograms" stand for directories and when we told her to click on it she right clicked once instead of double left clicking like everyone is used to.

These things are hardly innate to human beings, an interface like that has to be taught like any other.Read further than the first paragraph of the posts you reply to.Mods can't shadowban, only admins.

Shadowbans are always site-wide, hence that.You know, whenever I act like that and someone just admits "Yes, I should've read the whole thing" and makes no excuses I always feel so guilty.

Anyway, wanna fuck?&gt; Binary configs offer waaay higher performance though.

Indeed they do, but the reading of a configuration file is like 0.0001% of the startup time of an application.

&gt; Same goes for binary executables versus interpreted languages.

The difference is that a program is constantly running here. If it were executing a program once at startup the difference would be about as consequential. (hence init scripts during your boot process are interpreted, the interpretation of the script is pretty much insignificant if it has to happen only once rather than continuously)

Basically, even if reading a binary config would be 500 times as fast it wouly only mean that instead of 500 nanoseconds at startup wasted now only 1 was. You do not ever notice the difference unless you indeed have a use case where you are _constantly_ reading the configuration.

THat's why databases serving web servers do not store in plain text becuase they are indeed making many, many reads per second.And other bugs lead to planes crashing and people dying and a "bug" the result of imperial versus metric has actually lead to stuff exploding in the past.Lennart is definitely the public face of systemd. But the dislike for Lennart on the Gentoo fora probably goes further a bit than systemd. His public design philosophy of ignoring portability, modularity and those things stand in stark contrast to what a typical Gentoo user is searching for.You know, this reminds of the mistake novice players make when they're playing deckbuilding card games and they put in every single good card into their deck and think more good cards automatically makes the deck better.

The fallacy is that the larger the deck, the more it reduces the chance of drawing each card. An experienced player will often say "yes, this is a good card, but is it _better_ than these other options here?" Basically, consider the size of your deck as time, the more good cards you put into it, the less time you can allocate to each of them (the chance to draw it).

In this sense, the article demonstrates that security is important, but doesn't demonstrate it is _more important_ than all the other important things, time is finite in the end and manpower is limited.A lot of bugs, like memory leaks do more than bite you once in a blue moon though.

Or bugs that just cause the whole machine to crash which is a kernel thing.It has nothing to do with "accidental", it has to do with "on purpose"

Imagine an internet caf\u00e9 where the computers are sitting inside a cabinet behind lock and key, out of the cabinet come wires connecting to a screen, mouse and keyboard, obviously the users behind those computers do not have administrative rights to reset a computer.

I'm pretty sure that whoever runs that caf\u00e9 would not be particularly pleased with not being able to turn this off.

The axiom of "once they have access to the keyboard they have access to all the physical hardware and can do anything anyway" simply is not True.No, I have no idea what that is.I never said it was like deckbuilding, I said it contained a similar fallacy. Where people want to include everything not realizing that if you include more, it means the other things will get less of a finite resourc,e in this case card draw and time.No, I felt obliged to comment "it is systemd's fault IF these settings can't be changed".

If you got from my post that I somehow accused systemd of anything you need a crashcourse in reading and conditional logic.Only when you configured it as such.Which is a supreme hindrance still for someone who runs an internet caf\u00e9 on a timetable where people are served to use a computer for X time. It's not good business if they get there and it's hanging on the boot screen waiting for a firmware password so they have to get an administrator.

But never fear, it turns out it can indeed be turned off.GNOME 2 pretty much copied the windows metaphor of "task bar, start menu, system tray" though.

There's no particular need for any of those. It's just there to be like Windows.Where did I ever imply that I can't be configured?I see your point but intuitively I find that the number of "trivial distros" seems to have increased, things like Xubuntu and Kubuntu of Funtoo vs Gentoo.I spoke to a Xubuntu ex dev here who claimed that he or she was not sure what, if any, the differences between Xubuntu and Ubuntu + Xfce are.

Maybe you did not install Xfce properly on Ubuntu?So you turned a discussion which was about whether the familiarity was inate or simply there because of Windows into whether ot not it was a good idea? Typical.

Nothing I said implied it was a bad or good idea.Weird thing is that they don't clal things like Debian unstable a different distro which is like legitimately a lot more different from normal Debian stable than Ubuntu is from Xubutnu.

Or the Debian GNU/kFreeBSD variants.Seems to me that you just didn't install it properly then.

There's indeed such a thing as enabling the proper services and installation instructions typically provide for documentation on how to.It only stays as [deleted] if someone actually comments on it to retain the comment tree and avoid reparenting the comment.It's not an "accusation", it's a statement of fact.

I "leave" my house every three days to do groceries and then I come back. 

I think people make the word "leave" more negative than it is.- Windows
- Arch Linux
- And now Battle.net

Forced updates wrecking your systemThen how on earth did I comment that it was systemd's fault?

__Edit: Massive rant incoming, read at your own risk__: Look [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/linux/comments/3rqoyh/til_systemd_has_a_feature_where_it_will_restart/cwqgwkk) I'm saying pretty much exactly the same thing in a top level comment, but there's it's upvoted, and here's it's downvoted. How can that be, the exact same comment making pretty much the same point.

Ostensibly what happened is quite obvious. I replied to someone who replied to someone who was being quite idiotic, thereby offering the illusion to people who can't read that I'm some-how taking the side of that idiot. I am not, I'm merely pointing out that there is a real use case for being able to turn this kind of functionality off and that the typical argument of "they can always just flip off your computer anyway" does not _always_ hold.

Now, then someone _replies_ to me _clearly_ indicating not having read more than the first paragrpah, when accused of such _admits_ it and apologizes. If people who reply do not read your entire post and admit at such, imagine the monkey who spam the voting buttons.

But hey voilla, that's how it goes, you can say the same thing in two different places, in one places people constantly put words into your mouth and claim you say things you never said and are angry at you, at another place they are not. Why? Simply because the context makes it superficially seem to idiots who can't read that you're coming to the aid of someone who says something stupid when you did no such thing.

Oh, and of course I had a discussin here a while back with people who claimed that the Linux community was smart enough that "praesentation doesn't matter", yeh right.\&gt;not using `sed -ri` to edit the image file directly

It's like you hate UNIX.Probably past history. I have a tendency to bitch at "gratuitous rodent usage" across r/linuxWell, if you'e not going to call that "trivial" which was the point, then what is trivial. Is there a distro which is more trivial than that?Is "is pretty" and "is ugly" seriously listed under serious bullet points? My god, platonic realists are everywhere these days.

But hey, people pay money to read the opinion of film critics.

Dumb review is dumb.

Howee rthis:

&gt; Nothing makes one look more like a unix greybeard than rolling own desktop.

Is obviously _objectively_ a good thing, I can dig. Elitism is always objectively good.I'm actually seriously thinking I just bought this for the single player campaign.

I felt that WoL -&gt; HotS was a downgrade but HotS -&gt; LotV is even worse, we'll see how much the HotS ladder is going to get deserted.You know you can just use whatever software you want together right? There's nothing stopping you from using Mate's calculator with Xfce?

I see you've fallen for their marketing trick where they try to fool you that you can't.As in, because you disagreed with his political opinions

Bigoted little homphobia and active support of the denial of rights of gay people happens to be a political opinion.

Did you know that the an opinion that all westernized Nations are breeding godless infidels who should be murdered in the name of Islam is also a political opinion?

I have no idea why people often seem to think that sufficiently extreme political opinions are some-how not political opinions any more. Extremism is politics and all you know.

Besides, bigoted little homophobia and active support of the denial of rights of gay people isn't even "extreme" in the US.Either is pretty silly, he should remain CEO as long as he's good at his job. But hey, people are so weird that they will stop buying the services of a company if they dislike what their CEO in person, not professionally, but privately did.

Their loss in the end though, denies them good products they otherwise would've wanted.

Especially beause they would not get angry if he was the CTO sort of shows how much slacktivism it really is, like, it doesn't even help their cause....what?He seeks to deny the rights of a specific group of people in society, like so many people in politics.

Would you think that someone who say wants to move up the pension age, thus diminishing the rights of the elderly is unfit to be CEO? Or how about someone who wants to up the time before you can become a naturalized citizen?

Or let me bring it _very_ close to this issue. How about someone who advocates that marriage remain between two people. Same sex marriage is nice and all, but as someone whom you can call "polyamorous", I find it amusing how you apparently still can't marry multiple people. I live in the country that had same sex marriage as the first country in the world, there are no tax benefits to marriage here or any benefits whatsoever, it is purely a ceremonial thing. There's no good reason to not allow people to marry multiple people here, yet it isn't done. So what would you think of a CEO who likes to keep marriage between two people and thus limits my rights?

And I can say that I don't particularly care as long as that person is a good CEO.The problem with HS is that like 60% of the strength of your game if not more is not your ingame decisions but how good "you" are at deckbuilding.

And the latter skill can easily be copied from a random site with no understanding of the thought process of whoever built the deck. All you have to do is to play it.

A terrible player with a top of the meta netdeck which he or she does not understand at all will probably go further on the ladder than a pro with a purposefully created terrible deck putting in all the trash-tier cards in the game.&gt; But he wasn't good at his job. His actions were causing a rift in the community around Mozilla, among voluntary devs working on the project, and even alienating employees.[1] It was also causing third parties and independent devs to back away from Mozilla.[2]

He wasn't good at his job _because_ people give a shit about what he does in his private life.

My point is, if people didn't give so many shits about that, the world would probably be a better place and we'd have a better Firefox.

&gt; So, I'll ask you the same question: Do you think it would be unacceptable to ask a CEO to resign over open financial support of a campaign to ban interracial marriage?

Absolutely not, a company has to do what a company has to do in the end. I do not blame companies for doing these things, I blame "society" for giving too many fucks about what "figureheads" do in their private life outside of their official functions.

For the record, even if he had killed someone, if he's done his time and is a competent CEO otherwise, I personally would not see a reason for people to get angry at that. But hey, the inevitable reality is that people do get angry.systemd stores its configuration in plain text. It logs to a binary format though.My point is that time and resources are finite, if you focus on security it means that you draw away focus from something else.

So the quaestion is not "is security important", but "is security more important than the other important things"

Which is the mistake a lot of novice players of deck building games make, they say "I put this card into my deck, because it is good." rather than asking themselves "Is it better than all the other good cards"Which is exactly why trying to get everything into the mainline kernel is a dumb thing. I'm perfectly fine with multiple variants and different patch-sets existing.

Those who want to sacrifice some compatibility for enhanced security should be free to do so, and they are by patching grsec.It buffs your opponent's Murloc Tidecaller, wisp doesn't.There's also the spiritwalker.Just like:

- performance
- hardware support
- stability

And a lot more things really. No one is going to care about security if your super secure system will simply not run on most of the hardware.You can just install something else on Ubuntu. You can install i3, Fluxbox, Enlightenment, Xfce, whatever you want on Ubuntu.I always wonder if these things shouldn't fall under Blizzard's refund policy on card changes.

I mean, you can argue this basically changes Murloc Knight.The default stages of Exherbo do not contain nano, only `vi`, I had to install nano when I installed that system.The thing with other languages than C is that they assume a kernel is there to make syscalls to.

You can't really have garbage collection without a kernel underneath it. Other languages assume that such a thing as "asking resources from the OS" exists.That doesn't make it more secure per se at all.

It makes it more stable (in theory), but a security hole in any of the servers can just as well penetrate the system. The thing is that one of the servers crashing can't bring the entire system down.

As far as security goes, there's the maxim of "spectacular failure", it's better for a program to spectacularly fail and immediately make any bug visible than to try to recover itself as far as security goes.&gt; Programming languages no longer require programmers to manage memory because new programmers can't be bothered or their bosses don't give them time to do so. And we have 4gigs of ram to run a simple UI as a testament to this decline.

Ehh, manual memory management was already dying out when C was invented. C was based on a language B, which was based on another language which had automatic memory management.

C does not lack these features becuase it's, "old", it lacks these features because it was intended as "slightly better than assembly".

At the time C was invented it was considered a bad idea to do anything but systems programming in C. C was intended to replace assembly, it was never intended to actually replace legitimate high level languages like ALGOL and Pascal. It was considered extremely unsafe and walking on a razor when it was invented, it was just less so than assembly.Funnily enough, as someone who actually plays all three races at a similar level, I want to be able to at least turn this off I guess. I like to be able to use winrates to know when one of the races I play lags behind and needs some further training.&gt; Yea, most things can be made to work. How do you think OpenBSD manages to work on x86 and run most of the things you can run on Debian?

And look where OpenBSD is now compared to GNU/Linux and the Linux kernel in general? Clearly in the eyes of most people hardware supportis a more important feature.

&gt; I'd take 50% performance penalty any day. Sadly for most web services it's only a matter of time before they expose my data because of some completely preventable fuckup somewhere in the toolchain.

Then like the security developer. You think security is a more important feature than all the others, which is fine. Most just don't share your opinion, which is also fine. But grsec is there for you to patch in.

     emerge -av sys-kernel/hardened-sourcesThis whole "getting vim-style keybindings per application" stuff seems cumbersome to me.

You can just set your key map to consider four shift states. What I have done is made left shift, altgr and right shift different shift states with caps mapping to left shift. Left shift is as you imagine switching my keyboard to "vim-style", usually I in fact hold down left-shift with it but sometimes I just press caps and leave it at that and my home row becomes directional keys and so forth.I always find it so amusing how the people who stress "decency" and "morality" and "good behaviour" invariably get so angry and insulting in discussions when others disagree.This so well demonstrates my dislike for "conferences and praesentations"

All this info could've just been given in written form, far more convenient to assimilate. This could've no doubt been interesting, but I gave up fairly quickly since spoken things like this are just too inconvenient to assimilate.For some reason, I see a lot of people do this:

    cp /path/to/file /pat/to/file.bkp

instead of 

    cp /path/to/file{,.bkp}&gt; They've already forked it

Came here to post this.

Maintaining a patch-set is simply forking it

Also, the article has nothing to do with this.

&gt; what they should now do is merge again!

Came here to disagree with this. Forks are good, means that people who want grsecurity can get it and those who aren't willing to pay the performance and compatibility problems don't.And even if he does come back, you think he's going to be good?

The reason he stopped is because others got better than he. Not just "Meh, I'm at the top of my game, let's retire to go study engineering with all ze money I took to ze bank."\&gt; nerd beard

Nah-ah [girlriend](https://www.google.com/search?tbm=isch&amp;q=unix+beard)&gt; Have you seen package list? It runs most everything. It's not limited by its design, it's limited by the fact that the core group is 20-50 people volunteers, not thousands sponsored by the corporations like IBM and Red Hat.

Hardly, a lot of hardware is simply not supported by OBSD at this point that Linux does support.

&gt; Most people are fucking idiots.

Ohhh, ad hominem.

&gt; Respecting privacy of your customers is the most important feature of server OS. If it can't hold my data private then it's shit

I'm pretty being able to run is just slightly more important. But hey you have a point, an OS that does not run at all can't leak your data via a remote hole.

&gt; And I'm fine with people fucking themselves by their own idiocy, I'm not fine when you harm others. To make a short detour with an analogy, you could have the most perfect car, it would be still shit car if it had welded a knife on the steering wheel pointed at you. It's fine for people to fuck themselves with Android, it's fine if you run Linux on air gapped supercomputers, it's not fine that every couple of months you have a preventable, big, billion dollar breaches where hundreds of thousands of people are affected. There is no due diligence in this industry whatsoever.

And if a server is not performant and people have to wait too long to get served web pages they get fucked just as well. People as it stands don't like to wait.

Of course, the server not _running_ and their _never_ getting served annoys them even more.

&gt; Lal gentoo, the distro where they don't veto maintainers enough who then go on adding harmful modification to upstream code. See Bitcoin and LukeJr bs.

That was an overlay. Anyone can maintain an overlay, they're community repositories that obviously need to be taken with the due scepticism if you don't trust them. 
It follows from standard brace expansion, it's not a "trick" at all.They come with a tradeoff is the problem. They lower performance and break some compatibility.&gt; Please for the love of all that is good in this world, use 2 spaces as indentations in shell scripts. Not 4, and not &lt;Indent&gt;.

Why? This is pretty personal isn't it?Right, so is there another reason than "everyone else is doing it"?

Sounds like more of a case of "the first person to wrote an influential project in the language subjectively decided upon this and others copied like brainless monkeys".

Also, I happen to know for a fact that the Gentoo ebuild style guides mandate tabs for indentation.&gt; Gentoo can be whatever special-snowflake they want to be. That doesn't change the fact that the majority of projects use 2 spaces for indentation.

So you claim, yet you have provided no example and I have.

&gt; This is a strawman, and has little to do with the fact that most projects use 2-space indents for shell scripts.

Yes, so again, I restate the quaestion you didn't answer: "Is there another reason than 'everyone else is doing it'?"&gt; No, but that is the definition of 'standard'

And you will find that no body has ever seriously tried to standardize coding styles opposed to protocols, programming languages and other machine-interfaces. And why is that? Obviously because following each other there is a necessary thing or your stuff simply won't _run_. In the case of coding styles it has nothing to do with it.

I find it quaint at best that the top four bullet points which is legitimate practical advice for a _reason_ is phrased so neutrally but the thing at the bottom which by your own admission is nothing more than "everyone else is doing it" has "for the love of all that is good" attached to it. Interesting priorities.

Anyway: http://unix.stackexchange.com/questions/39210/whats-the-standard-for-indentation-in-shell-scripts

This page seems to have a consensus that there is no universally agreed upon practice and every project has a different one.

Simply googling "shell style indentation guide" also basically produces 4 different project guides in the top 8 results each with a different mandate. Ranging from 2 spaces, 4 spaces, 8 spaces (!) and a tab. So I'm sceptical it's as universal as you claim, and even if it were, that would still be a particularly weak reason. Especially because there are strong arguments that can be made for tabs in that everyone can set it to the width they find most comfortable themselves and shell scripts do not require fancy alignments that make spaces a necessiry.Yes, we should, use what you like.

"Everyone else is doing it" is a dumb-ass reason. Are you seriously advocating that "for the love of all that is good" we should do something for the _sole reason_ that everyone else is doing it?

My god, you must've sat at the cool table.On both an aesthetic and functional level, I can not condone it.

As well as on the level of "client-side decorations are garbage and don't use them"What is "the other thread"?Except when the directory you want to create is say named `-e`.

You do need `mkdir -p -- "$1" ; cd -- "$1"`Why not?

I always find it humorous how people suddenly randomly find situations where "because everyone else is doing it" is suddenly acceptable.

Especially that whole "language = use" stuff, suddenly it's acceptable then to do something _purely_ because eveyone else is and it's not acceptable to do something purely because no one else is, but then it's suddenly okay.Taksbars are a symptom of a poorly organized workflow any way.

It's a Windows metaphor that was necessary there because of no virtual workspaces. It's pretty useless if you organize your stuff well and have a mental memory capacity larger than what's left of 16GB Ram after GNOME got its hands on it.Of course I believe it. GNOME is built to attracts idiots and everyone knows and agrees on it.

The only difference of opinion really is what to call "idiots", they praefer the term "less technically inclined users" or "new users", call it what you like. Whatever you call it, I want them out of my Unix and have them stop ruining it for people who aren't as dumb as they.

And the reason they praefer terms like that is because they're "nice" and "friendly" which is again a euphism for "telling people what they want to hear".Like I said, it depends on if interoperability is required.

The thing with standards for machine interfaces like protocols and programming languages is that it's a necessary evil, it simply won't work, machines have no fuzzy logic, they can't understand if it you deviate even slightly from the standard.

Human beings reading code will understand your code if you use 2 or 4 spaces so use what you like.The problem is not what I use. That's more or less, but not completely fine. The problem is that these things existing invite idiots who then ruin it for everyone by existing and making certain practises more and more acceptable.

Take a program like playonlinux, in theory what it does is nice. It automatically manages different wine drives and versions and allows you to easily install different wine versions alongside each other, it contains scripts with known settings that work for certain applications to set them up. All very nice.

_Except the interface is made for idiots_, it's so windows-like it even annoys you with "Are you sure you want to close PlayOnLinux" in a popup.

But because it _exists_, others are less motivated to make a tool that does something similar with a sane interface. that does not involve constantly spawning new windows and annoying you and demanding that you infest your workplace with rodents.

This is just one of many examples how letting in idiots , ehh, I mean "human beings" ultimately hurts everyone.Which is only relevant if you're writing a script rather than using it as a command line interpreter, and if you're actually writing a script in shell instead of something better like Python you're probably doing something wronglyInteresting enough, ever noticed that whenever these kind of youtube links are posted virtually no one comments but when it's a written article the comment section is crawling with people debating the comments?

It's almost like everyone is like "Nigga I ain't got no time for this shit"So link me?&gt; Calling me an idiot because my computer is a tool to get things done is stupid 

Indeed it is. But I don't call you an idiot because you use it as a tool to get things done, I call you an idiot because you use it as a tool to get things done _in an idiotic way_.

&gt; And let's not talk about the fact you want to kill people for having a different view on UX than you.

And now I call you an idiot for not understanding that "should be shot" is obviously not literal .I'm pretty sure you have me mistaken for someone else, we never had that conversation and I don't delete comments.&gt; The type of people who don't want GNU/Linux to be popular

If popularity necessitates bringing in idiots, then no.

&gt; and also don't want new users to GNU/Linux just because they think that they don't know to use GNU/Linux properly

Newness has nothing to do with it. I don't much care about Linux vs Windows, I care about idiotic usage versus non idiotic usage.

You can use Windows like a non-idiot too it turns out, powershell is legitimately pretty good. Unlike most people here I don't much care about "Linux" or "GNU" or "software freedom", it just happens that Unix has the most mature environment for a sane interface that does not involve clicking around like a retard wasting time. But there is certainly some capacity for it in Windows as well.

&gt; I'm just letting you know though that your thinking contradicts heavily with Richard Matthew Stallman

RMS and I don't see eye to eye on many things.

Is that some kind of argument? RMS disagrees with me, thus I must be wrong?

FOSS to me is a feature like any other. I see only two advantages of it:

- It's basically a limitless configuration file, the source code that is, you can in theory given enough effort make any configuration you desire with it.
- It means it can be compiled from source and thus optimized for your specific architecture and typically comes with compile-time options.

Those two are the only advantages I see in FOSS, I don't much care for this whole moral/privacy debate at all. If I do not edit the source or compile it from source myself it might as well be proprietary  as far as I'm concerned. GNOME is free softawre yes, but it has an unusable interface that is clearly designed with retarded idiots in mind.THat's under the assumption that you know the shell and not python.

I became capable in writing scripts in python way before I got capable of doing the same in Bash.Because "most modern distros" work on the idea of "better to include stuff people may not use than not include stuff they may use", this is because "most modern distros" are geared towards incompetent pieces of filth who don't understand anything about their own system or computers yet some-how aren't banned by the state from operating one and they want their stuff to "just work". The modern aequivalent of someone who imports every single header at the top of a C program because he or she doesn't know in which one the needed functions are.

In fact, it's even worse than that, as any modern C compiler will not generate any worse code from that but your pleb binary distro will run like garbage because every fucking single thing you may or may not use is turned on at compile time and every daemon they could possibly find is cranked into it because you're too idiotic to know what you may or may not need.&gt; Well you should considering proprietary operating system nowadays have spyware installed and are generally not designed for passion but rather for money which shows in the way the OS is structured.

"generally" is a praejudice. I will use whatever software is good.

As it stands, few proprietary software is good because it caters to idiots _even more_ than free software in general.

Hard to make money from smart people I guess.

&gt; Having an attitude that a computer illiterate person should not use UNIX is literally poison and I hope that you are smart enough to realize this.

Yes, it's poison to _them_ it keeps them out, which is good for me.

I have no interest in helping others, especially in helping dumb people who have inefficient workflows. I just want them to stop ruining my Unix with their rodent-based workflow.

&gt; Using FOSS software just for compiling stuff and configuration files is understating it's other advantages like allowing the user to modify the source code and to fork it if needed.These specifically are the type of things that are valuable freedoms that you shouldn't take for granted.

You misunderand my point about "configuration", I mean to say that being able to modify the program itself serves as the ultimate configuration file. As in, you can change any setting if you can edit the source code.The difference between "IDE" and "text editor" is about as dumb as that between "DE" and "window manager" and "mountain" and "hill"And as you can see, I made an error in the top one, accidentally `/pat/to/file` which couldn't have happened with the second one, so puh-leaseInstalled BBlean on a Windows machine and I liked the interface more and I fell in love with this concept of editing settings by editing simple text files.

Also, at the time my secondary school was switching to Linux. Don't think that contributed much though.

And I still use Fluxbox now.

I'm not sure how I got the idea of installing BBlean on a windows machine, I think it was some theme I found on DeviantART and I asked the author on how he or she had done that.And no doubt in 10 years you find it ugly.

Apple is the master of "temporal design", everything they have ever done looks ridiculous and wrong 5 years later.

It's also hilarious how close the design of the first Windows comes to Windows 10:

[extremely amusing](http://www.picatyou.com/Qlbn6g.)I'm like the most [popular girl in school](http://i.imgur.com/CWzCLpU.png)

The trick is to once in a while regurgitate 5 paragraphs of the problems with systemd while making it sound like you're objective and also point out some of its merits and also point out that some of the criticism is overblown and you get 500 comment karma on one reply to subsidize that all your other replies are deeply in the negative for making people angry.That's because the completion script basically needs to support braces itself for it to work, and few do.

How bash completion works is:

the first argument is completed by bash itself, this is simply done based on all builtins, defined functions and executable files inside the `$PATH`.

if the first argument argument matches something that is registered as a to-be-completed name with bash. It executes a function bound to that name, that function is executed in an environment which sets two variables:

`COMP_WORDS` is an array which sort of contains the current argvector as is of the current commandline the moment you press tab. Except that escapes and weird things are retained as is. So if you have 

    ls -ld ~/Pictures/Naked\ Pictures\ Of\ My\ Mother/mum_hot_tits.j

And then press tab, then the array will be: 

    ('ls'  '-ld' '~/Pictures/Naked\ Pictures\ Of\ My\ Mother/mum_hot_tits.j')`

Note how the slashes appear even though bash themselves deletes them because they escape the next character. So it's the duty of the bash completion script to actually parse them.

The other argument it gets is `COMP_CWORD`, this is simply the current argument number where the cursor is when you press tab, the command itself is 0, the first argument is 1.

When the function is executed, it is expected to assign to the array named `COMPREPLY`, all the entries inside that array are considered for completion by bash.

So if you do `cp /path/to/file.{old,ne` then the array inside `COMP_WORDS` is `( 'cp' '/path/to/file.{old,ne}' )`, the completion function itself has to be smart enough to deal with that, almost no one writes completion functions that are that smart.

Apart from that, there are a bunch of library completion functions available like `_filedir` which automatically handle filename completion which you can use inside your completion function. One can argue that function at least should be smart enough to handle brace expansion, but it is not at the moment.&gt; because it always worked as expected.

Good thing you're not in charge of kernel security, I guess.Yeh, I'm pretty sure I'e been hit by a downvote bomb once or twice.

How you sdudenly get like +100 downvotes ut of nowhere within a super short timespan and after that it slowly cimbs back up, it's weird. Either brigading or a botnet.It looks great because temporal fashion is often cyclic, it will look bad to you again in 7 years when your idiot monkey brain has acquired a different taste in aesthetics because it has observe the idiot monkey brains of other idiot monkeys to have a different taste as well&gt; He was a top performer in Math 55, the hardest math course at Harvard.

Vague statement "a top performer" can mean a lot of things

&gt; He started the GNU Project. The project which is responsible for the only operating system developed for its users, not for commercial or technical reasons.

This is just completely False


Je typt als een holbewoner, mijn god, "kzat". Maar goed, als je je indenkt dat het met een zachte-g is wordt alles wel prima.

Zijn er nog plannen om die Franstaligen af te snijden en weer terug te komen bij papa. Als er een gevecht om Brussel ontstaat gewoon een kernbom en/of Islamitische zelfmoordterrorist er op loslaten en niemand geeft meer om die puinhoop.

Kom terug, we missen jullie en niemand verdient het om in \u00e9\u00e9n land met Franstaligen te moeten wonen.\&gt; gets insulsted

\&gt; just admits the insult like it's nothing

Okay, I like you, let's make babies, I can live with that monkey brain of yours when it's so reflective and doesn't hide it.&gt; Ik woon niet in belgie.

Zonder zachte-g zijn er geen excuses meer.

&gt; Ik ga er gewoon niet vanuit dat er kernbommen komen of islamietjes tekeer gaan. Lijkt te werken tot nu toe.

Och, ongelukken gebeuren als het de overheid goed uitkomt, kijk maar naar 9/11.

&gt; mweh, als het het idee over krijgt vind ik het goed genoeg. Plus punten voor de extras.

Laat me raden, je vond een 9.5 acceptabel op school.Didn't you read github's rules?

You can't just e-hug racial and sexual minorities like that. It's _oppressive_.Of course I'm not overthinking it. If you suddenly get hit by 50+ downvotes in one minute on a post that otherwise got nothing that's probably a botnet someone fired at it by someone who got offended by it or something.That's my nigger.

Github won't get me for saying nigger because I'm a person of colour. If I were white I would be breaking all the rules.Yes, this is pretty silly, the point is, getting offended at dumb stuff is a waste of dumb stuff, finding it hilarious and with it all the drama makes it serve a far better use.

There is no use for dumb people and stupid mistakes but to feel superior, remember that.&gt; Hmmm, difference between DE and WM is huge. Desktop environment basis is providing functional desktop, while window manager... well, manages windows.

Then no window manager exists. Find me a single application that does nothing more than managing windows, I challenge you.

&gt; Same as IDE is expected to carry usual programming features, while text editor requirement is just editing of text.

Then Vim, Emacs and even nano are IDE's.Yes, but they never diminish the identity of a racial or sexual minority.

If TB was claled "Genna's husband" they would be fine with it. But Genna is a Woman. Sexual minority and all.&gt; bspwm does nothing more than manage windows as far as i know. it doesn't provide any other applications.

You know wrongly, bspwm has integrated border drawing as well as a capability to set wallpapers built in.

&gt; A desktop environment is a collection of applications that make up an environment, including a window manager.

And how many extra applications are needed except for pure window management is as vague as the difference between "mountain" and "hill".

Besides, we all know that what people seemingly mean with "Desktop environment" is "GUI that works primarily with the mouse" in practice for whatever reason. People like to call it a "window manager" when it mostly operates by keyboard control and feels more "unix-y" in its configuration style.Please, thou who understandest it, define for me the difference between them then. Give me a defined test that enables me with objectivity to see the difference between them.I never got how this is in any way worse than:

    git clone &lt;whatever&gt;
    cd &lt;whatever&gt;
    ./configure
    make
    sudo make install

"sudo make install" can in fact execute arbitrary commands.And then you have to trust the package maintainer about as much as you have to trust the writer of the script.Quite right, like I said, I don't call you an idiot because you do it different than I do. I call you an idiot because you do it in an idiotic way.

Also, I called you an idiot for earnestly seeming to think that "should be shot" actually literally means that.The True master of forcing mistakes is obviously Goody.

No idea how he does it, but when Goody plays it suddenly looks like _both_ players are suddenly playing at platinum league level."only" is the word I object to, implying there are no other operating systems developed for its users, not for commerical or technical reasonsNeeded to execute a file like that.

How the shell works is that if its first argument contains a slash it is treated as the path to a file to execute. `.` is a special reserved name in Unix for "the current directory". So `./file` is a way to get a slash into it and execute a file in the current directory.

Just doing `file` searches for the filename in `$PATH` instead which is a list of directories which contain executable files.&gt; New cards are only exciting if you can make use of them - does anybody really believe that a match will last long enough to draw golden monkey?

Even if you draw and play it, you can argue that a 6/6 with taunt for 4 isn't worth making your entire deck and hand worthless.

Turning cards into random minions, _especially_ into legendaries tends to be terrible in constructed.

Ever seen TB's "deck of legends" in action? It's pretty bad.That does not in any way explain a comment that is obscure, no one sees, has no votes on it and is suddenly hit with 50 downvotes out of no-where in the span of a minute.

That's brigading or a botnet and you're pretty dumb if you can't see that.What was that Win10 logo you saw all the time anyway?

Googling Windows 10 DVR it's some kind of capture tool.

They really put the logo there of a capture tool they used?

Or is it some watermark they in all embarassment did not remove?You can always argue with bandwagoning that there is value in consistency.Hence a symptom of a poorly organized workflow?&gt; Een holbewoner kan helemaal niet typen man, waar heb je het over? 

Dat is een metafoor.

&gt; "Kzat" is 100% acceptabel op interwebz, tenzij dan mss voor regelneukende taalnazis

Je gaat vast om met inferieure lieden die geen regelneukende taalnazis zijn.

&gt; Doch enige tolerantie voor onze tongval is wel nodig van jullie kant of het gaat helemaal nergens heen. Da verstaat ge toch.

Dat hangt er vanaf, dat hele "Nederlands en Vlaams zijn verschillende talen" gebeuren hangt er vanaf of men Standaard-Nederlands of een locaal dialect praat.

Ik kan mensen die "Plat Haags" praten ook bijna niet volgen. Maar iedereen die in Nederland of Nederlands-Belgi\u00eb de basisschool heeft afgerond moet toch in staat zijn redelijk Standaard-Nederlands te produceren. In welk geval het prima te volgen is met een herkenbaar accent.Every single BSD system except Gentoo FreeBSD treats its users like idiots and continues to make choices for them is the problem.

Not that most Linux systems don't, there are just a few that don't.\&gt; SSD

\&gt; not cold booting in under a second

You must not have a custom kernel, enjoy living the pleb life much?Yes, thank you for enabling the sharing of pleb distros. Want a biscuit for it?About as insecure as their using Linux instead of OpenBSD.Regardless, Linux systems that do not use GNU but use Busybox/uClibc are probably more popular than those that use GNU.All men are fucking colour deficient. It's bordeaux goddamnit.&gt; Besides, OpenBSD wants to be very simple, to avoid bugs. PaX and GrSecurity are the opposite approach to security: security in layers, which complicate the code so that a problem in one part is caught by other. Having more parts is key and something OpenBSD avoids.

Pretty much, I honestly like OBSD's approach more to security though I'm definitely not an expert.

grsecurity does not "fix bugs", it makes bugs harder to be exploited by effectively adding a complicated in-kernel firewall that makes it harder, but not theoretically impossible to exploit such hypothetical bugs where grsecurity itself is complex enough to possibly contain bugs that can be exploited.

Obviously +grsecurity is more secure (probably) than -grsecurity but it's a bandaid.No one denies that SC2 hasn't grown as much as some of the other games. It has also grown more than some others (HoN anyone?)

The discussion is always wherher or not it has done so absolutely.Because he actually attacks and stuff.

Despite people claiming that macro games are so much better, the viewer numbers hardly seem to reflect it. The most memorable games where all-innish for the most part.How ironic, since the game bugs out on Windows 10 and has known performance issues.

Anyway, Install Gentoo.Yes? And systems where Buysbox/uClibc is installed on instead of GNU Coreutils/glibc are probably still way more used.

Chances are the former is inside your router, television and a variety of appliances inside your house.Surely we can agree that the sentence "Charles is the only person with black hair on the planet" is "completely False" if there are other people with black hair on the planet?Just in general don't use Fedora. It's a nanny-distro that constantly makes choices for their users and drags them along.

Note the difference:

- Debian switches to systemd as default but continues to support the old init for those that still want it.
- Fedora switches to systemd dropping any and all support for the old system overnight, trying to get the old system back in results into severe breakage.

- Debian invents aptitude to replace apt-get, apt-cache and dpkg but does not force anyone to use it and lets the community decide whether or not they will adopt it.
- Fedora switches from yum to dnf, makes yum a symlink to dnf and drops any and all yum support practically overnight.

To use Fedora is to say this kind of BS is acceptable. "Linux is all about choice", yeah, except when you use nanny-distros like Fedora or Arch that constantly change their system tools and libraries, offer no real transition period let alone a choice to continue to use the old tools indefinitely and force all their users to go along with it.Yeh, I don't see you saying the same thing when people tell others to be free and use Linux while the argument applies just as much.Yet I'm not seeing you comment against people who _do_ do that on this sub and they are aplenty and everywhere and I never saw you comment the same thing you do here on any of them.

Unless of course you can provide me an example where you did.&gt; There are too many! This has crossed the line. Like, I'm not stopping anyone, but sit for a while and think about it before you make another one. Choice is a good thing, but like everything, it has to be balanced. Don't make another one just because you want to make a new desktop environment or want to add a few packages.

Yes, I think "trivial distros" like Xubuntu or Kubuntu are retarded, rather, just make an installer frontend or something which gives you "Ubuntu with KDE" or "Ubuntu with Xfce". However as far as actual choice goes, there can never be too much.

&gt; Why don't you just offer the user to choose the desktop environment in the installation? This is much easier than downloading 5 different images. Sadly, very few distributions do it.

Yeh, I think this is pretty dumb, but the reason is simple, people are actually too dumb for this and intimidated by choice. The distros that do this try to appeal to the lowest pieces of retarded stupid filth that are really intimidated by a selection menu of what GUI they want with a brief explanation of benefits and downsides.

If you want to make Linux more popular, which they want, not I, then I can see why they do this.

There are seriously people out there, quite a lot, who first run Kubuntu, and then install Xubuntu after formatting their drive because simply isntalling Xfce from inside Kubuntu is too difficult, or rather daunting, for them.

&gt; - Don't release new versions every few months.
&gt; - Make upgrades easier. Reinstalling is not really a solution.

Virtually any distribution will allow you to upgrade without re-installing. New versions every few months are completely ine when you do this.

&gt; Why is there a need to have so many? At least they are less than the number of distributions, but why for example do we need LXDE, LXQT, XFCE and MATE, when they are very very similar from what I've seen?

If you think they are similar you have a very superficial knowledge of them. LXDE and LXQT are designed to be extremely light on system resources. LXQT uses the QT library which has pros and cons versus what LXDE uses (it's a fork)

&gt; Question about Gnome/Unity and similar environments - why limit and hide settings/customization? Leave the choice to the user, don't make people create another fork.

Because those two are designed for ~~fucking retards~~ less technically advanced users who find settings to be legtimately daunting.

"GNOME treating its users like idiots" is a common criticism on it however. Linus Torvalds has gone on record that it does exactly that.

&gt; Why do we need 10 window managers, which results in missing functionality, incompatible themes and more of that? A lot of people don't know and don't want to know which window manager or which framework is used or which version of those, so that they can check if the theme they want to use is compatible or even if it covers all of the elements, like icons or task bar or title bar.
Programs

Because they all have their strengths and weaknesses, I used like 10 different window managers and I don't truly like any of them. Even with all this choice I have still not found one I really like. I use Fluxbox because I dislike it the least, I would hate for their to be even less choice.

&gt; Too many ways of installing software. Terminal, deb, rpm, synaptic, software centers, tars, source, ppa... This is not really needed. I have a suggestion at the bottom.

These things you list a lot of the times aren't "different ways", you list protocols, package formats and package repositories alongside each other.

Anyway, different package formats and package managers all have their advantages and disadvantages:

- Pacman: Very simple to use and write packages from, very fast, but lacks flexibility as a downside
- Dpkg: Very flexible, some-what slower than pacman, has a lot of features and can encode far more metadata
- Portage: Extremely complex to operate but extremely flexible and allows you to install parts of packages in effect, but is very slow because it needs to compile from source to enable this.

I personally use Portage, I would _hate_ to use Pacman, I don't think the speed is worth the inflexibility and bloated system it results into. A pacman user in general would hate to use portage and thinks the overengeineering and overcomplicated configuration files of Portage are not worth the in his or her eyes minimal gains from slimming down the system and further control of it.

&gt; Broken packages. I don't know a solution, because I don't understand this enough, but make one! The current way of downloading additional needed packages is cool, but I see this too often: * Hey user, this package requires this fhaowhfoaw, do you want to install

Broken software will always exist, it's a bug, a broken package exists because somewhere someone made a mistake, it's inevittable and a bug.

&gt; Too many programs with poor interface or no interface, made to be configured manually and run in terminal. I wouldn't be comlaining if there were good GUI alternatives for everything.

In general people don't care about GUI interfaces because they're slow, unwieldy, obnoxious, inflexible, can't be called from shell scripts and all around a pain in the ass.

The only things that have them are things designed with "less technically inclined users" in mind and for most software no one bothers to write it because almost no one will use it.

&gt; Separate programs from desktop environments - This is bothering me a lot. Why do you need to integrate a program with a certain environment, when you know that not all users are using it and they will have to install unnecessary packages or have problems with it. Example: Krita. Integrated with KDE, have to install half of it when I need only Krita, and still, I can't change the language, even though I've installed the necessary stuff.

You don't have to at all, I never got where this myth comes from. Apart from some minimal shared libraries all these programs can exist independently.

&gt; I may get a lot of hate for this, but seriously - stop making the terminal the only solution to any problem or need. Some of you love it, I get it, and I don't really care. You can go install Arch or don't use any desktop environment, again, I don't care. I'm not stopping you and I'm not hating on you. But a lot of people don't want to bother with it, they don't want to learn commands and type them, they just prefer clicking 2-3 buttons with the mouse on a nice looking interface.

And some people for some reason like to browse the web with a controller because that's what they're used to on Xbox. No one honestly cares about people who want to be inefficient simply because that's what they're used to. Some projects like GNOME attempt to make the "transition" easy but like I said, they're treated with scepticism because people feel they treat their users like idiots concordantly.

Basically, no one is interested in making these GUI's because virtually no one will use them and those that will use them will only use them for 2 months until they realize the terminal is much faster and then they won't ever touch them again, it's software purely made to ease transitions.

&gt; It's very um.. frightening or just bothersome to ask a question and be greeted with 50 lines of code that you have to paste in the console. I don't understand that. I don't trust it. I don't trust myself with it. I don't want to bother with it. I don't want it to possibly create even more problems.

You trust randomly clicking buttons when you don't know what it does any more?

&gt; This will also get me some hate. But yea, give me the choice to use my system without any passwords. At least for installing and removing software, copying themes to the system theme folder and other general things. The password can remain for messing with the kernel and any core files. It's my system, I know what sites I'm visiting and what files I'm downloading. I don't want to be able to type my password while asleep. Sudo visudo does this only halfway.

There is a way, you can give your normal user full read/write rights on `/` if you want to. Add yourself to the `root` group and you have that right.

&gt; AMD drivers are horrible.

No argument here, not something the community can fix. The thing with closed-source firmware is that _they_ supply the drivers or they don't, the hardware is purposefully left undocumented by them so we can't make the drivers ourselves.

&gt; Features from drivers are missing - Nvidia adaptive vsync and more, the whole control panel and normalization feature of Realtek.

Again, no one here really cares about control panel GUI's, it's like an Xbox user switching to PC gaming complaining he or she can't browse the web with a controller any more. No one implements those features because it's considered extremely slow and cumbersome.

&gt; A lot of games don't support Linux and don't run well enough in Wine.

No argument with that again, and not something we can fix again.

&gt; Unified framework for developing applications. This is very important.

IT's actually there in Windows too, it's just that no one uses it and all the companies use their own stuff so your desktop looks like an inconsistent mess. And those same companies coming to Linux like Valve with their steam do the same thing here and your Linux Steam client looks horribly out of place. Why? Because those companies don't give a shit about their users, that's the only reason.

The problem isn't Windows there, the problem is that surprise surprise commercial companies love to run their users under the bus.

&gt; offline download of a .deb type file that contains all of the dependencies. I really like this in Windows, because literaly every programs has .exe file, which 99% of the time just works and is available to install when and where I need it, even if I don't have internet connection.

Ubuntu is doing that with Snappy and everyone hates it. People disliek having dependencies baked into the software.Ehh, that's not what "custom kernel" means.

You use the kernel your distro offers, they typically make patches that are needed to make it work with some of their stuff. You just configure it to your own liking.

I use the kernel my distro offers, I've just configured it to not include extraenous shit and support for hardware I don't use, cgroups, live patching, hardware clock, filesystems I don't use, various debugging tools and all the other stuff I don't need. Result:  From grub to login in a quarter of a second.

Edit: To be fair, I do also use the Gentoo-ck kernel with Exherbo sometimes simply because Exherbo does not roll a distributed kernel so I figured it would probably work and it seems to.&gt; En dat van mij was sarcasme ;)

Dat is geen sarcasme, sarcasme is het omgekeerde zeggen van wat je bedoelt. Het is maximaal een grap.

&gt; Haha ben jij een Objectivist of zo?

Nee, ik ben vrij epistemologisch nihilistisch. Ik geloof niet echt in "objectieve realiteit".

&gt; Uiteraard. Maar dit is reddit. Een informeel discussieforum vol deink miems weet je wel? Over een lettertje meer of minder maalt men hier toch niet, zolang wat er staat prima te volgen is ondanks het (geschreven) accent.

Nee, daar ben ik het niet mee eens. Het enige wat het acceptabel maakt is zo'n geile zachte-g.

Ik bedoel, sommige mensen vinden moord en verkrachting onacceptabel, dat vind ik allemaal prima en het grappig om mensen uit te lachen die verkracht zijn. Maar imperfecte grammatica, dat kan ik niet accepteren.&gt; I think they are complementary, not opposites.

Isn't like every complement an opposite by definition?I will address the dependencies baked into the software thing here because my post got too long:

Basically, by compiling the dependecies statically into the software:

- It cannot share memory any more with other software that use the same dependency. If you use libpng dynamically linked to 4 different executables at the time, it exists in RAM only once.
-  When it is updated to fix a security issue, it is fixed in _all_ software that is dynamically linked to it. If it's statically baked into it, all have to be updated to get the fix.
- uses more disk space.

The only real advantage of static linking is:

- faster startup time, like, by an irrelevant margin you will never notice because it doesn't have to be linked. But startup times are faster again if the library is already in memory because another program is using it.
- you don't actually have to provide a mechanism to get the dependencies in some way.

All in all, no one likes static linking.&gt; Das gewoon een welbepaalde vorm van sarcasme. Sarcasme is bijtende spot toch? Maar yep, echt bijtend was het niet, eerder gewoon een grapjeuh.

De humor ontging me, waarschijnlijk relevant aan het feit dat er nog minder aanwezig in is dan in _Friends_ zonder laughing-track.

&gt; Je klonk wat als iemand die The Fountainhead iets te vaak had herlezen, vandaar mijn vraag.

_Fountainhead_, wat ik \u00e9\u00e9n keer heb gelezen heeft weinig met Objectivisme te maken. Rand begon daarna pas dat te defini\u00ebren voor zover ik weet.

Het is gewoon een boekje over een architect die moeilijk aan werk kan komen. Het is fictie, geen filosofie.

&gt; Ha, dat hoor ik je eigenlijk best graag zeggen. In mijn ervaring vinden Nederlanders mijn zachte-g hilarisch en dom klinken, terwijl ik stiekem op hun diftongen zit te geilen..

Ja, die diftongen zijn wel interessant en lastig te reproduceren, toevallig doet een vriendin van me een promotieonderzoek in dat fenomeen.

Het zijn niet alleen diftongen trouwens, alle  lange-klanken in het Noordelijk-Nederlands lijken op een ronding te eindigen. "Zee" ook.

In mijn ervaring vindt bijna iedereen zowel in Belgi\u00eb, Nederland en elk gedeelte van de wereld de Noordelijke-g reden voor doorverwijzing naar de keelarts.

&gt; Ha! Ik wist dat er een hardnekkige 4chan troll achter je nazi fa\u00e7ade schuilde ;)

Dat is een misvatting, 4channers zijn poseurs die het niet echt doen.&gt; Het is fictie die bedoeld was om haar filosofie te verspreiden. Ik ben geen fan hoor, maar voor Rand zelf was het ongetwijfeld filosofie.

Nederlanders zijn "direct" of zo.

&gt; Het is fictie die bedoeld was om haar filosofie te verspreiden. Ik ben geen fan hoor, maar voor Rand zelf was het ongetwijfeld filosofie.

In welke zin verspreid het objectivisme?

Het ging toch vrij over subjectieve smaak?

&gt; Is dat geen diftong dan? Ik ben serieus nu, ik dacht dat elke lange klinker die in een andere klinker uitmondt een diftong was?

Dat hangt er vanaf of je de ronding een ander foneem will beschouwen. 

Het probleem van fonetiek en wel meer inexacte wetenschappen is de noodzaak om een continuum te classificeren voor administratie. Klinkers zijn inherent een continuum maar men geeft klinkers graag  namen en symbolen voor makkelijk redeneren wat een beetje problemen geeft.

Het filosofische gedeelte is "hoeveel ronding van de lippen is nodig om het een andere klinker te beschouwen?"

IPA zelf noteert alleen "gerond" en "ongerond" waar natuurlijk nogal een continuum tussen zit. Ze zijn "ee" in Noordelijk Nederlands is in ieder geval fonemisch geen diftongen en er zijn geen minimale paren verder. Er zijn ook door leenwoorden ware lange klanken ge\u00efntroduceerd in het Nederlands die niet iedereen "erkent" omdat ze enorm zeldzaam zijn maar ze lijken wel woorden te kunnen onderscheiden verder.

"zonnebank" en "zonebank" zijn duidelijk oraal van elkaar te onderscheiden, het enige verschil is klinkerlengte ondanks dat je in vrij veel serieuze academische literatuur zal lezen dat klinkerlengte niet fonemisch is in het Nederlands omdat het vrij zeldzaam is en alleen in leenwoorden.About as hard as to avoid Windows.

I find the sense of superiority of people here who at the same time:

- use mobile phones
- use google
- use steam
- use youtube

To be flagrantly hilarious.

Mobile phones are probably the biggest violation of privacy you can dream off, it dwarghs Windows. Any idiot with 2 minutes of time can actually crack the pitiful cypher used in that archaic technology and snoop on your conversation by being close enough.&gt; The sole reason to install Linux is to free yourself from the idiots that infest inferior platforms. Unfortunately for the Linux user community, distributions like Ubuntu have made it too easy for your mom to get a working Linux box -- so they are all running in horror.

&gt; Installing a working Linux box used to require over 550 man hours, learning a Nordic language, sacrificing a goat, wading through hundreds of pages of (purposely) inscrutable help files, and in some cases programming a new driver in UNIVAC SLEUTH II assembly code using nothing but punch cards while walking miles through the snow barefoot on the wrong side of the tracks and uphill both ways. Today, Linux distros are so idiot-proof that you can put their install CDs into the floppy drive upside-down and the fucker will still work.

&gt; Old-school Linux users were desperate to find a new way to feel superior. Some migrated to versions of BSD, others gave into baroque feats of self-torture like multi-booting 4 different operating systems from one USB drive. But it didn't have the same appeal as abusing other operating systems for their lack of 1337n355.

&gt; In this dark hour there was a new hope: Gentoo Linux, a distribution designed for users possessing that delicate combination of insecurity and masochism that results in an obsession with obscurity, optimization, and huge dollops of pain and frustration. Gentoo has sated all of these urges.

&gt; Enter the idea of a "hemorrhaging edge" distro: Gentoo. It is the exemplar of the term "hemorrhaging edge" -- there is no piece of software too advanced, too experimental, or too downright dangerous for the main tree. In fact, if the users don't crash their box at least once a week due to new and untested software they will swarm onto the forums and accuse Gentoo of "going all Debian" on them. After the separate Stable and Unstable branches were created, every user switched immediately to Unstable which became the new de-facto Stable. As a response, the Gentoo developers invented a new Super-Unstable overlay system and made it as hard and annoying to use as possible in order to keep the stupid masses out, thus cementing their own position at the top of the hobbyist heap. This has worked, to a point, but a group of developers has formed in order to create a Gentoo offshoot, Exherbo ("Cannabis Withdrawal") where the system tools are in erudite Latin instead of plain English and normal users are instructed on the web page to stay far away for fear of spoiling the 1337.

That part.&gt; Het ging ook over de integriteit en de genialiteit van de individuele "Man as a creator" tegenover de tirannie van de middelmaat, uitgaande van een collectieve consensus of zo? Ik ben geen Objectivist en vond Fountainhead maar drollig maar ik zie wel enigszins in hoe rand zelf en sommige anderen het als filosofisch werk beschouwen. I guess.

Nou ja, het was een kritiek op de maatschappij en een beetje zelfmasturbatie klinkend. Maar objectivisme niet per se. Het was meer van "de domme massa snapt min geniale smaak niet".

Little known fact is dat oprichter van Wikipedia nogal een fan van objectivisme en alles-Rand is.

&gt; TIL.

Je hebt toch wel ergens door mag ik hopen dat vrij veel wetenschappen constant voor administratieve redenen het afraffelen en een continuum in een stel discrete hokjes plaatsen onder het mom van "goed genoeg, geen zin in lastig doen"?&gt; You are dealing with a pantheon of operating systems as if they are the same as the Windows monoculture.

This is often overlooked. "Linux" is not one operating system. It's a kernel that can be put into many things.

Debian GNU/kFreeBSD is obviously closer to Debian GNU/Linux than Android is to whatever the fuck they put into my router that runs that kernel.&gt; I'm curious, why don't you want Linux to be more popular?

It does nothing for me? What use it for me really?

Do you care about other people using the same chair as you?

Some people care about making Linux more popular because that means more support by certain commercial vendors . But I don't care about any of that software, I don't much care about those video games or steam. There is _one_ video game I pay, quite a lot actually. StarCraft II, which runs flawlessly in Wine for me so I really do not care at all about it getting a native port which will probably run worse and fight with my window manager.

&gt; I read that LXDE may be discontinued, so only LXQT will receive the new stuff. I indeed haven't used them much, but on first glance they seem very similar. And all of those are trying to be the lightweight environment of Linux.

There are many more lightweight environments, the Fluxbox I use is very lightweight as well but tries to do something entirely diferent than LX{DE,QT}.

&gt; I think I'm in the middle. But using the terminal vs interface for a lot of people is not about speed, it's about what is easier for them and with what they feel more comfortable. Interfaces would never exist if the terminal was superior in eveything.

Well, I think most people agree that browsing the web with a controller or plying a first person shooter with one is asinine and ridiculous, yet it exists for god knows what reason.

Some things are invented purely for the novelty factor. Like the Wiimote or the Kinect, after the buzz died out most people were like "This is actually a really awkward way to control a video game.". The mouse-driven interface might just be purely invented as a marketing gimmick novelty thing that some-how stuck and now people are used to it.

&gt; I don't mean buttons, I mean that I am one of those people that is not that comfortable with the terminal, and in order to understand what all commands and lines do, I have to have an extensive knowledge of the internals.

Well, you have to have knowledge of whatever interface you use in the end.

&gt; How would you go about making a profile about a certain game, switching on or off adaptive vsync or SLI? Because you don't need it, doesn't mean other people don't. Considered slow by who? If there was no need to develop it, nobody would do it.

Well, and like you said, it's not developed.

I'm sure there are _some_ people that like it. But generally very obscure and not often requaested options are not developed.

For the same reason there isn't really a PC web browser that is designed to work with a controller, I'm sure there are _some_ people out there some-where who like that, but it's such an obscure use case that no one is willing to put the time into making it for them. Especially because they stand to lose clients. People in general are more willing to write software for people that will keep using them rather than when it's purely a thing that they expect to be transitional that people will drop the moment they realize something better and faster exists.Most likely not if you'll dive further into it.

The thing is, most non-nanny distros are "hard" and most nanny distros are "easy", Arch is unique in that it's the only distro that I know that is both "hard" and "nanny". Most people confuse the two but they are distinct.

Nanny does not mean "providing you with a GUI or relying on you to have no inside knowledge of the system" though both very much tend to correlate, there is no reason why they should and Arch serves as an example. They probably correlate so heavily because the inverse is True. In order to be easy you probably have to be a bit "nanny" though Debian does an admirable job of being as easy as it can get without being nanny.

Basically, Fedora is a Nanny distro that tells you "I will clean your room for you, don't have any say in it, you can't live in an unorderly room, your room has to look how I want, but I will do all the work for you."

Arch is like "Go clean your room, you figure out how to clean it but you better clean it when I get back and if you don't I will kick you out of this house" (your software will stop working properly).

The reason Arch is a "nanny" distro is because Arch packages make certain assumptions about the state of your system and if it's not in that state they will probably break:

- systemd
- glibc
- OpenSSL
- polkit
- PAM
- dbus

And whatever other libraries in specific versions need to be there. While the software doesn't stop you per se in trying to figure out some unholy way of getting something else, it's nigh on impossible as all packages are compiled with the assumption that the system meets certain criteria. This wouldn't be bad per se if those criteria were fixed and known before you installed Arch, in which case you basically choose that system anyway. The problem is that those criteria constantly _change_ and how they are going to change in the future you don't know. Arch might suddenly decide to drop OpenSSL for LibreSSL, you as Arch user then have to go along or virtually any piece of software that uses the internet will stop working as it assumes LibreSSL is there now.

Arch in fact is considerably more Nanny than even Ubuntu which, when it switches to something new tends to keep supporting the old stuff for at least a long time allowing you to at least comortably transition and often will continue to support the old stuff indefinitely. Ubuntu is looking to for instance switch to Snappy by default but they have said they will continue to support dpkg for those that want it.But Arch is a nanny distro just as much as Fedora...

It's not like Arch kept the option to use their old init alive when they switched to systemd. Hell, what Arch did was worse. They first _prominently_ advertised using a BSD-style init everywhere, attracting a lot of people who like that, then they switched to systemd which is the _polar opposite_ of a BSD-style init with no real option to keep the old system.

So everyone who went to Arch because they liked BSD-style init were massively shit over and had to migrate their system to another distro now. Which is not what you want to do if you say run a server. It's massive bait and switch and shit like this why I find it hard to take Arch seriously as any serious distro. You can't just first prominently advertise that you use X as a selling point, attracting people who want it, and then overnight with a transition period of 2 months completely abandon X.

Anyone who say ran a server on Arch for the explicit motivation of using BSD-style init which is a very good choice for a server was massively shit over by this move. Fedora jumped from Upstart to Systemd  forcing its users along yes. But they didn't prominently advertise everywhere on their site "We use upstart, if you like upstart, pick us".Can you read?

This has nothing to do with breaking or not. This has to do with Arch forcing its users along a railroad track and making choices for them.The sole reason to install Linux is to free yourself from the idiots that infest inferior platforms. Unfortunately for the Linux user community, distributions like Ubuntu have made it too easy for your mom to get a working Linux box -- so they are all running in horror.

Installing a working Linux box used to require over 550 man hours, learning a Nordic language, sacrificing a goat, wading through hundreds of pages of (purposely) inscrutable help files, and in some cases programming a new driver in UNIVAC SLEUTH II assembly code using nothing but punch cards while walking miles through the snow barefoot on the wrong side of the tracks and uphill both ways. Today, Linux distros are so idiot-proof that you can put their install CDs into the floppy drive upside-down and the fucker will still work.

Old-school Linux users were desperate to find a new way to feel superior. Some migrated to versions of BSD, others gave into baroque feats of self-torture like multi-booting 4 different operating systems from one USB drive. But it didn't have the same appeal as abusing other operating systems for their lack of 1337n355.

In this dark hour there was a new hope: __Gentoo Linux__, a distribution designed for users possessing that delicate combination of insecurity and masochism that results in an obsession with obscurity, optimization, and huge dollops of pain and frustration. Gentoo has sated all of these urges.

Enter the idea of a "hemorrhaging edge" distro: Gentoo. It is the exemplar of the term "hemorrhaging edge" -- there is no piece of software too advanced, too experimental, or too downright dangerous for the main tree. In fact, if the users don't crash their box at least once a week due to new and untested software they will swarm onto the forums and accuse Gentoo of "going all Debian" on them. After the separate Stable and Unstable branches were created, every user switched immediately to Unstable which became the new de-facto Stable. As a response, the Gentoo developers invented a new Super-Unstable overlay system and made it as hard and annoying to use as possible in order to keep the stupid masses out, thus cementing their own position at the top of the hobbyist heap. This has worked, to a point, but a group of developers has formed in order to create a Gentoo offshoot, Exherbo ("Cannabis Withdrawal") where the system tools are in erudite Latin instead of plain English and normal users are instructed on the web page to stay far away for fear of spoiling the 1337.
Why would you think that?

That's just wrong to think that about people's spelling man. You're sick in your head.

I could sort of see it if it was about grammar, but spelling? Who cares about that.Dumb reason, nothing stops you from not using Unity on Ubuntu.

Canonical hates your privacy and freedom though.

Other reasons to dislike Canonical/Ubuntu:

- Snappy
- systemd
- Mir
- ridiculous agreements contributors have to sign
- retarded social contract which asks people to "be nice" rather than to "make good code"
- works on the single goal of inviting more idiots over into Unix rather than scaring them away.Upstart is completely portable across stuff, it was used by Fedora, was an alternative in Debian and is currently used in Chrome OS which is basically Gentoo + Upstart + fancy GUI.Well, that would explain how on earth I get like +1.5k karma on /r/linux.

That's pretty much what I do, like everything I post is downvoted but once in a while I get like 500 upvotes because I explain in detail some concept about some kernel procedure to some newbie which gets massively upvoted because "long, didn't read, is long, probably accurate, is long, let's upvote, didn't read"

All the other shit is just downvoted to "omg, called something idiotic that I do, downvote, downvote, I'm not an idiot am I, he or she must be wrong, my self esteem can't take this shit"I'm curious, why would you want to be left bereft of choice of continuing to use the old system when they switch, like, what'sthe advatnage?I don't see how caring about tone is not being ruled by emotion.

Like, that's pretty much the definition of being ruled by emotion.

Besides, anyone who upvotes or downvotes has the civility of a caveman. You must as well call that alone a single-required criterion to class people as clinically retarded. The need to increase or decrease the visibility of posts you like or dislike respectively. My god it's dumb.Because EB is pretty bad. It's actually less reliable than Wikipedia and certainly has less content:

http://blog.wikimedia.org/2012/08/02/seven-years-after-nature-pilot-study-compares-wikipedia-favorably-to-other-encyclopedias-in-three-languages/Of course it's a double standard

I just said what they do, I didn't say I defended it or that I was fine with it.

Yes, congratulations, you found out that SJW's have massive double standards.Stay baus, stay baus.That article was actually the reason I gave Gentoo a try, I just stuck because I sort of like how it works.\&gt; for smart geeks

     cat /var/log/messages | less

lol.&gt; Choosing a distro is placing significant time investment and trust into that distro. I trust people who make these decisions are not insane. Things like stability and feature parity will be remain the same for me, which has been True.

If it was a matter of "knowing better", then why do they all have different inits and why do the developers of all these distros constantly argue with each other about stuff?

The truth of the matter is that a "good choice for init" is very subjective and heavily depends on your use case, there is no such thing as a "good choice for init" in the general case. The problem with Arch switching from BSD-style to systemd is that they first attracted people who had a strong use case for BSD-style and then shit all over them.

&gt; Can I ask what you do with init that is so important? I would never switch my infrastructure to a different distro based on init, as this would be an absolute mammoth undertaking and it's been much easier to adapt to systemd.

There are good reasons to run BSD-style init. Basically, systemd is almost useless for servers, it was pretty much developed for the "Linux desktop", 99% of its functionality has no use for servers.

BSD-style init is old and most of all _battle tested_, sysvinit and BSD-style have one thing going for them and that is that they have been used so long by now that we know they most likely will not have any gaping holes. Furthermore, BSD-style init is kept extremely simple in its architecture which further keeps things simpler. It basically makes the chance of your system having a vulnerability very small which is excellent for servers. First rule of security: Don't make things more complicated than you need. And BSD-style init is very uncomplicated.

I can definitely see someone being very pissed some-where having set up an Arch webserver on the implied promise of BSD-style init which is excellent for servers being forced to switch to systemd, once you've already set up your infrastructure like that you probably don't want to switch to another distro which would be even more downtime than the reboot required to get systemd.&gt; I do my own battle testing before something is put into production. For me, systemd is 'battle tested' for my usage scenarios.

Well surely you can't yourself check for every security hole, they just pop up because people try.

&gt; I am intrigued what a BSD-style init system offers your environment that would warrant distro hopping, as your initial comment implied? (This is curiosity, not being sarcastic here).

It's more performant than systemd, doesn't need all sorts of dependencies like dbus which were really designed for the Linux desktop and don't serve a real purpose on servers and like I said, less risk of there being a security hole in it.

A lot of servers also run on very old kernels with backported security fixes because that's more secure and they do not need to support new and fancy hardware because server harware in general is pretty plain. Systemd requires a fairly modern kernel because it depends on cgroups.

And even if your kernel does support cgroups in theory as well as a lot of other features systemd needs, again, servers tend to turn a lot of that stuff off at compile time because the more you turn off that you don't need, the more secure, and performant, your system becomes.&gt; Faster Pacing birthed the concept of starting with more workers. We wanted to remove periods of the game where players had little opportunity to exert their prowess, and the economic build-up time from 6 to 12 workers was a perfect example of that.


I can distinctly remember a talk DB gave about RTS design where he stressed that the low worker start with only 50 minerals of SC2 was a conscious design choice because it meant that you could see what your opponent was doing before committing to a tech route reading to less build order losses.

And I honestly exactly feel that LotV has increased that, especially ZvZ is just weird, even if you send an initial worker you can't any more see if your opponent went for some weird speedling/bane all in before you decide to go hatch first. But just in general it feels you have to commit far more to how greedy you want to open or not in LotV before you can really know what your opponent is doing, even if you send one of your initial workers , the wall is often complete before you can get into their base on some maps.This is an overview of init systems for comparions, not a list of init systems that actually work with Arch...

1/3 of them contain no link to Arch packages anywhere, 1/3 contain a "broken link" to the AUR as it says so on the wiki and 1/3 contain an actual link to the AUR which most likely will never work on Arch because packages are compiled to assume the existence of systemd, specifically logind.&gt; On one hand it makes the game more unique and funny, on the other it turns it into a less competitive game.

I disagree, sometimes RNG makes a game more competitive. Poker would be pretty uncompetitive and super easy if it contained no RNG and you knew before the round what cards would come out.

Also, mathematically speaking "hidden information" and "RNG" are the same thing. You might as well say that what Rag is going to hit or what totem you are going to get is deterministic, but it's simply hidden from you, you can argue that what the piloted shredder will drop might as well be determined the moment you play him, you just don't know it yet, after all, it's the pilot inside, right?

Hidden information and RNG create strategies that do not exist in completely open deterministic games like chess. Especially when visibility can be controlled by players, this means that the "perfect game" can no longer exist which can exist in chess.

But there needs to be a good balance, if RNG affects too much it starts to overtake it and it becomes too variant and makes the impact of skill lesser again.

StarCraft II by virtue of hidden information has "randomness", what your opponent is doing in the fog of war is essentially random from your perspective, but what makes it interesting is that the RNG is not an evenly distributed function which picks a random element from a set with each the same chance, the RNG is a human being with a human mind. Thus you can make educated guesses based on knowing your opponent which brings a whole new dimension where probability theory and psychology become intertwined.People actually use NetworkManager?

I just have a wpa_supplicant config and that's it.

There's a thing I don't get or don't like though. Basically `dhcpcd` automatically starts `wpa_supplicant` when you start the service. I don't like that stuff, it seems to autodetect you have a wireless card of some description turned on and starts it with no configuration some-where that it should do that.

I hate that kind of shit, what if I want to turn that off? What if I wanted to debug, that kind of auto stuff is horrible for debugging, if it can't detect my card I don't get an error that helps me, if I did that manually I would get one, luckily it just detects the card, but meh.Yes, but it's not powercreep, because Raptor is never played.

Just like all the other cards that were once played but are now no longer played because of power creep.Large maps make the problem of scouting even worse though.

And I thought #dreampool was the most fun I had playing SC2 in some time again. Seems like a way better way to start the action. This whole "forced FE" meta, I don't like it.Ehh, I run Gentoo. My Unix Beard exceeds yours grasshopper.

"Getting your hands dirty" is a ridiculous way to phrase "program will segfault on startup with linker error because shared library it expects is not there.", there's not a lot you can do about that except compile everything from source to eliminate that. At which point why the fuck would you still run Arch and not Gentoo?

You have never in your life tried get an init other than systemd to work on Arch have you? Most packages are compiled to target systemd, its DBUS exports and various dynamic libraries it provides, absence of those will produce a startup error, the only way to solve that is to recompile them without that stuff. Which the ABS does not do by the way so you're going to have to compile them manually outside of your package manager, at which point, again, why still run Arch, you're not even running Arch any more then, you're going completely outside of your package manager for every single thing you install.As in, something none of those countries who'd ever sign this would ever consider doing and if they would, they wouldn't sign this.My nigger. I have searched so long for this.

Even more interesting, these are actual scripts apparently that are located somewhere that can be edited after googling your line.

Seems like pretty inverted configuration though, you'd expect a "hook wpa_supplicant" if you do want it.Is it just I or like 50% of the times you see someone say "whooooosh" whomever they're addressing did not at all miss the joke.&gt; No, i don't need something different than systemd, so why would i care?

Right, so you have absolutely no idea what you are talking about, never tried it, but you still feel like you should have an opinion on this issue?

&gt; I mean, i don't even know why are you crying anymore, is it so people know that you are using Gentoo? that's childish.

You _never_ knew why I was crying, you saw I attacked your distro and you lashed out in self-defence about a subject you know absolutely nothing about clearly.

Like I said, the problem is that Arch first prominently advertised they used BSD-style init and then performed a bait-and-switch over night fucking over people who ran BSD-style init for a reason on Arch, those people were now forced to migrate their setup to another distro which is not something you want to do when you run a server, and guess what, BSD-style init is a very popular choice _for servers_.

Basically, a lot of people choose Arch because it offered a BSD-style init and prominently used it as a selling point to host a server and then they fucked over a significant portion of people who got on board because of that. It's like running a gym prominently advertising you have a certain machine there and the moment the people are in you suddenly remove the machine so they can't use it any more, but then they're already in, it's called bait-and-switch.I'm not a native speaker.

There's never an excuse for poor grammar.I remember the angry person's nickname. He or she in the past launched some weird tirade at me with barely intelligible grammar, I wasn't quite sure what he or she meant with it and it came out of no-where but it was pretty angry.This is basically the info I got from this "review":

- Fedora has a graphical installer
- Fedora has a tool which helps you find the right codecs
- Fedora has a package manager which isn't as fast as dpkg or Pacman, other than that no details are given
- Fedora uses systemd 222
- Fedora uses Kernel 4.2.3

Other than that, no actually useful information is given at all."Why are my parents so bad?"

Lemme guess, you're from the US?&gt; But seriously, this depends on how old you are and whether the machine is actually yours or theirs....

NOTHING IN THIS HOUSE IS YOURS, WE PAY FOR YOUR FOOD YOU ARE NOT LEGALLY ALLOWED TO PAY FOR YOURSELF AND DECIDED YOU HAD TO BE BORN WHICH YOU DIDN'T ASK FOR SO YOU DO AS WE SAY.It uses to be a legitimate choices back when it still had BSD-style init.

Arch in 2008 wasn't Arch today you know. Hence bait and switch.

A lot of people seem to not even remember how BSD-style init used to be one of the _defining_ things of Arch since Valve only got onto the Linux train after that.&gt; Then why use Arch on a server in the first place?

Because you might have used it _before_ they started to pull this shit?

Switching from BSD-style to systemd and forcing their users along was the first time they pulled one of those moves in my opinion, how could you know their track record before that?

&gt; i'm just talking about people's choices, but you don't seem to undestand that not everyone run a server/care about init, maybe because they have more important things to be worried about.

You don't seem to understand that some people _do_ and got massively fucked over by Arch.

You're basically saying "It doesn't matter that Arch and Fedora are nanny distros because I and my friends aren't sysadmins who need to give a fuck about these kinds of things for actual other reasons than using Linux other than reading email, playing video games and watching youtube.

If you actually set up any Linux project for any professional or remotely serious hobby project and you don't care about getting the best init for the particular job your boss does well to fire you.

&gt; You basically cried about choice, but it seems like that is not really your problem here, you just want BSD-style init and to not let people use the init system they like, just BSD-style init.

I _hate_ BSD style init and stay a mile clear from it.

My problem is that some people, for understandable reasons love it and Arch promised them that and then took it away from them.

If Arch first prominently promised systemd and then switch to BSD style the problem would be the same. The problem isn't from what to what they switched, the problem is _that_ they switched.

&gt; I don't know how much about efficiency you know, but it doesn't make sense to maintain different packages for multiple init systems, not in a bleeding edge distro, if you are in debian it might be ok.

It makes a lot of sense and any bleeding edge distro but Arch did it:

- When Void switched from systemd to runit as default they made sure systemd still worked for those who wanted it.
- When Gentoo swiched from sysvinit to sysvinit+openRC by default they made sure that using plain sysvinit still worked, when they later added systemd they made sure either still worked.
- Debian unstable of course switched to systemd before Debian Main and again, they made sure sysvinit still worked.

It's purely a matter of Arch developers getting exceedingly lazier over time and not willing to put in the effort to not fuck over their userbase.I don't struggle with a messy taskbar because I don't use a taskbar.

What's the use of a taskbar really? It seems to mostly be invented for Windows machines not having virtual workspaces to activate windows that are hidden behind layers of other Windows to gain some view into a mess.

The moment you find yourself needing a taskbar you probably need to organize your windows better anyway.

No taskbar, no systray, no titlebars here, that sweet, sweet screen real estate.How the hell is Arch a "binary Gentoo"?

They're like complete opposites except both feature a command-line install method.

Debian or Void Linux probably comes closer to being binary Gentoos.

Still, the concept of "Binary Gentoo" makes about as much sense as "alcohol-free beer".&gt; Ideological struggles as a supposed benefit of your favorite distro?

No, offering more choice is. What a way to spin things.

&gt; You're still unhappy over a change made over 5 years ago? If anything, you should credit the Fedora team as visionaries.

This is like saying you can't claim that the Iraq war was done based on shady reasons because it happened over 10 years ago.

That it happened a long time back doesn't mean it was bad practice to force something onto users.Of course not:

http://alt-usage-english.org/excerpts/fxitsmev.htmlWhat's honestly the use of doing this?

Honestly seems to me like some way to vent frustration with someone and be like "Aha, but now I got to wrote down some-where that you're an idiot, serves you."

If someone is truly that idiotic, no tag should be needed to remind you.Nope, switched to systemd in the latest version while still supporting upstart as an alternative.&gt; Sometimes they want to, you know, connect to different networks occasionally.

Which you can easily put inside your `wpa_supplicant.conf`.

You don't honestly think that before NetworkManager it wasn't possible to store the settings of more than one network, did you?&gt; This line was particularly telling, the author does not seem to be really with the times.

THere's a difference between disagreeing with currently popular shady practises and not being "with the times", though.&gt; date

Well, just the `date` command, also, it's printed in conky on my wallpaper as an extra but usually there'sa window over it.

&gt; chat status

I assume you mean messages on IRC and IM clients with this. I have a notification server for that I guess that pops up, but nothing permanent. If I want to check I can just go to the window.

&gt; etc

Some guess at what you mean with this as in some things I often see in there

- Network status: Well, I _notice_ when my network is down for whatever reason and just ping some random site to confirm it then.
- keyboard language selection: Just `setxkbmap`
- volume settings: just `amixer` or `pactl` when I need to set individual input sinks-
- battery status: I query it from the command line when I need to know it, and if it's &lt; 10% and not charging a notification pops up every 5 minutes reminding me to plug in a charger.

Apart from that, every single application seems to want to make its own systray icon now to fill it up with pretty useless stuff that I don't use.Well yeah, I was kind of "wow, doxxing much?" when the account name got linked. But saying someone got tagged probably doesn't fall under it.

There used to be a rule in the sidebar about that all ingame names must be censored in screenshots but no one followed that rule and no one enforced it so it was eventually dropped.

In fact this is still in the rules:

&gt; Conceal the names of players, where appropriate, to keep them anonymous. Do not post personal information in an attempt to raise negative sentiment against a specific person, witch-hunting. This is not a forum to call out specific people.


No idea what "where appropriate" is.

Over at /r/pcmasterrace at least they take their anonymity rule super seriously, no matter how much traction a thread has already gotten, even if it's at the top of the front page, if it does not censor out names it will be removed on sight.&gt; great, now i have to go to another app and type something when i could just move my eyes

You can say that about literally _any_ app you start to find something out instead of _always having it open_.

You can look up in Google whether it is going to rain today or always have it open taking up space, you can, in the latter case it'll well,, take up space.

If you want you can just permanently have a terminal at that spot even that runs `watch -tn1 date`. Which takes up less space than an entire taskbar with systray.

&gt; a notification that is easy to miss: you step away from the computer, you're focused on something else and either miss it completely or forgot about it, etc.

If you step away from the computer it does not disappear if there's no keyboard or mouse activity, it stays open for 5 seconds only if there's input activity.

It's really hard to miss a moving window that pops up. It's very easy to spot a change in peripheral vision, I can't remember a time that I seriously "missed" It.

It's a lot harder to miss some super small change in an icon anyway which you actually do have to move your eyes towards to see and won't notice in purely peripheral vision.

&gt; too much context switching imo, especially now that i need to remember to go check

You need to context switch and remember just as much whenever you move to the systray with your eyes to inspect the icons because, as I said, their change is too subtle to notice from peripheral vision, at least for me.

&gt; how long after it goes down? i personally find that i can go without noticing for hours simply because i don't go on reddit or search for things every few minutes

Pretty much instantly since I get a notification that IRC and IM services are disconnected and in the event that I'm not on IRC, IM services or actually use the network for anything else I notice failing I probably don't need the network at that moment.

In any case, the notification that pops up from IRC disconnecting is a lot more visible than a tiny change in a small systray icon.My name isn't Albert.

I'm not even a 'he'

I am stupid though

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=wHLJDs9jAvk

Did you have no childhood mate?More like the typical "I understand your problem and I've seen it before therefore you are _probably_ doing something wrong."

But hey r/linux reading skills, where a probability turns into a certainty with no justification.Quite, probably based on about as much real research as your conclusion that it's a "he" who wrote it.Surely that matters for being a sysadmin's "favourite" poet?

Jokes that don't add up are just less funny.

Not that this joke is a bastion of humour to begin with.It's virtually all mods and leaders and this sub is no exception.

People who want power are the worst people to actually have it. Kahless the Unforgettable once said: _Great men do not seek power, they have power trusted upon them_.You met dumb Mac users, of which there are plenty.

It's Apple's own marketing gimmick. By spreading the _illusion_ that they are some-how different from what people think of as "Windows machines" they can justify outrageous prices.

They are normal IBM compatible computers, there is absolutely nothing fundamentally different about the hardware. You can put in a Linux, Windows, FreeBSD or whatever live medium into it, it boots and you can install whatever OS you want on them.

It's just like Alienware basically, overpriced praebuild PC's, nothing more, nothing less.

Also, I love how this silly meme some-how uses the "exclusives" argument like it means something, I thought we were supposed to be above that, exclusives hurt everyone but big companies, it's nothing to be proud of.Because this whole "brand association" thing is fucking toxic to proper thought.

Ever noticed how often console gamers do not attack PC but attack the associated image of the user, and make no mistake, this bullshit happens here too of "ohh, console gamers are kids who eat Doritos".

Attack the hardware on its technical merits, not the association of the user using it.

Brands love to create some stupid "image" of some favourable hip person who users their stuff to give people the False impression that if they use their stuff they can suddenly be that guy. I got news for you, if you're an overweight unshaven guy getting whatever brand of personal computer won't change that, if you want to change that image, going to the gym will change that.So an ARM PC is no PC?

I'm pretty sure you can be PC with whatever processor architecture. Sparc workstations still exist.There is no such thing as "Windows-based hardware".You can also not use Bootcamp and just install Windows directly, no dual boot, no bootcamp abstraction layer, just directly like on any other hardware.

It's a normal IBM compatible PC.You make it do 1 damage to a random enemy on Deathrattle?

This whole idea of "basic cards need to be simple" is a cheap excuse from Blizzard to keep them bad.

You honestly think new players will get confused by a card dealing 1 damage to a random enemy on deathrattle?

It's a ploy by Blizzard to incentivise you to buy packs. They have to strike a balance, the game can't be _too_ P2W else not enough new people stick around, but if it's not P2W enough people don't buy enough money.

Blizzard is a company, making a fair game isn't their concern, making a game that makes money is. Obviously  game that is too unfair will just scare away the playerbase but so unfair that people can live with it and it incentivizes people to buy packs, that's exactly what they want.There are rules of the sub which say you should censor usernames "where appropriate" though, it doesn't say what "where appropriate" is.

I'd rather this rule is just made clear and enforced. It's _really_ easy to make someone look like a douchebag when you omit context. For all you know they had some prior history where OP did something shitty that provoked it. I've seen so many cases before where someone first looks like a total douche, then you add context and then it suddenly becomes far more reasonable.The hardware isn't "Windows based", it runs anything, it's not based on Windows.

Hardware isn't built to use Windows, Windows supports the hardware, or not.

Devices do not "run on Windows", windows runs on the device. When have you ever ran a processor on the software, the software runs on the procsesor.&gt; Where appropriate is where the primary intent of a post is to defame a specific person. 

How do you figure, that doesn't follow from _anything_ said there.

&gt; There is no excuse for being an anti-semitic douchebag.

Clearly you have not watched enough Fox news to know you can pretty much make anything that is otherwise acceptable into whatever twist as long as you omit the proper context.&gt; Tada. Maybe you need to read a book on simple logical reasoning :(

More like extremely creative interpretation of things to suit your few, that does not follow _at all_.

&gt; Really now. Provide me context in which calling your opponent a "dumb [...] jew [that needs] to be put down" is appropriate.

- A: "Well, I'm a Jew and I think you Germans are all horrible for what you did to us. Seriously, I would not ever let my children close to Germans, all of you are horrible, have fun praying to a statue of your sick F\u00fchrer kid."
- B: "Well, you're a dumb fucking Jew that needs to be put down."
- B: "Christ man, that was more than half a century ago, I wasn't even alive back then, how can you hold me responsible for that."

Bingo, put "You're a dumb fucking jew that needs to be put down" in a context where it suddenly makes sense.Shitty GUI filemanager is shitty GUI filemanager.

Oh wait, I forgot, an application that runs in a terminal can never be shitty according to some. MC has got to be the worst file manager in existence and "file managers" in general are total pieces of shit. But this featureless piece of crap that is super unwieldy to operate just gets a pass from being crap because it runs in a terminal. For some reason that gives shit software like this, Irssi and ncmpcpp a pass which everyone would consider awful if it did not run in a terminal.

Basically, people want something that runs in a terminal and for some reason only shit is available with that criterion. There is no good filemanager, IRC client or music player that runs in a GUI in a terminal right now. So they give it a pass since nothing better exists.I never said you needed to go for the gym to that as in _only_ going to the gym would fix that, I just said that going to the gym was one of the many ways that would fix that

Edit: Well, that's not True, my post does not imply it's one of the many ways, it just implies there is at least one, and that is the gym. There may be more than one, but my post does not imply either which way, but it certainly does not imply it's the only way either.I never said I dislike any of those. In fact, the only one I know of those are Weechat and htop really. Latter of which I often used.

I said I didn't like Irssi and MC.This whole myth of the average Linux user being a completely retarded idiot who actually likes GNOME is overblown. Note that even on this sub, which is probably filled with less technically inclined users than most places related to Linux, Arch is the most popular distro time and time again from polls.

I really doubt most Unix users actually use those "easy to transition from Windows tools" and when they do they have a tendency to give up on it quickly. There is some kernel of truth to the idea that people typically start with Ubuntu and then gravitate to other distros slowly but surely and start using those transitional tools but eventually realize that the Unix Way^(TM) of just editing a simple text file to configure this stuff is far more efficient.Sounds kinky.It's unisex.

https://en.wiktionary.org/wiki/Jesse#Proper_noun

Though the female form is sometimes, but not always spelt as "Jessie".Of course I don't use it, I think it's shitty. You're basically saying you can't criticize stuff, as it stands most people, surprise surprise, do not use the things they dislike.It hasn't a lot of basic features people have come to expect from a music player, maybe some of these exist but google sure hasn't shown them to me, some random examples of things which most music players have that ncmpcpp lacks:

- Equalizer, you have to go outside of it and either equalize in ALSA or in MPD directly
- ability to rate songs
- ability to search the database on metadata
- ability to do things like "Give me a playlist of tracks I played the least" and other such "colourful filters" that most music players seem to possess. I don't know if MPD stores that info, it probably does.True, but that doesn't mean it's not based on about as much real research.

It just means that that level of research is not required for this context.Qapla'!Don't most other file managers have that?

There's also `archivemount` though.http://www.thinkwiki.org/wiki/ACPI_action_script_for_battery_events

For instance

You can put whatever script you want in there that does whatever you want, you can just rig a bash script that fires a `notify-send` whenever battery gets low and state is discharging. The script gets executed every time a battery event is received.

edit: this post made me realize I found that too cumbersome, so here's my new script just added to my runlevels:

    #!/bin/bash
    
    set -u
    
    battery=BAT1
    threshold=10 # if the percentage is lower than this
    discharging=2 # and the state is this, then fire the event
    delay=120 # 2 minute delay for every mainloop call
    
    # helper function to query battery variables using dbus
    batquery () {
    	qdbus --system \
    		org.freedesktop.UPower \
    		/org/freedesktop/UPower/devices/battery_"$battery" \
    		org.freedesktop.UPower.Device."$1"
    }
    
    # the condition of the battery state
    condition () {
    	perc=$(batquery Percentage)
    	state=$(batquery State)
    	
    	[[ $perc -le $threshold &amp;&amp; $state = $discharging ]]
    }
    
    # this function is called when the conditions are met
    event () {
    	# make sure we loop over each logged in user to notify them all
    	while read -r line ; do
    		# each line should be of the form &lt;name&gt; &lt;tty&gt; &lt;date&gt; (&lt;display&gt;)
    		display=$(echo "$line" | sed -r 's/^.*\((.*)\)$/\1/') # extract the display
    		user=$(echo "$line" | awk '{print $1}') # extract the user
    		# we have run a notify-send instance for each user on each display
    		# everyone who runs an X session gets one, basically
    		sudo -u "$user" DISPLAY="$display" \
    			notify-send "Battery is getting low" \
    				"battey is getting low at $perc"
    			
    	done &lt; &lt;(who | egrep '\(*.:.*\.*.\)$')
    }
    
    # the main loop
    while True ; do
    	condition &amp;&amp; event # fire the event if the condition holds
    	
    	sleep "$delay"
    done

edit2: fuck this shit, this script and running it as root:

    #!/bin/bash
    conf=${XDG_CONFIG_HOME-~/.config}/batmond.conf
    
    [[ -f $conf ]] &amp;&amp; source "$conf"
    
    set -u # always wear a condom while coding.
    
    battery=${battery-BAT1}
    threshold=${threshold-10} # if the percentage is lower than this
    state=${state-2} # and the state is this, then fire the event
    delay=${delay-120} # 2 minute delay for every mainloop call
    
    # helper function to query battery variables using dbus
    batquery () {
    	qdbus --system \
    		org.freedesktop.UPower \
    		/org/freedesktop/UPower/devices/battery_"$battery" \
    		org.freedesktop.UPower.Device."$1"
    }
    
    # the main loop
    while True ; do
    	perc=$(batquery Percentage)
    	stat=$(batquery State)
    	
    	if [[ $perc -le $threshold &amp;&amp; $stat = $state ]] ; then
    		notify-send "Battery is getting low" \
    			"battey is getting low at ${perc}%"
    	fi
    	
    	sleep "$delay"
    done


Simply ran as user inside an X session now, it sends the notification to the running X-session instead of trying to fiddle with grep and all that stuff and finding out who is logged in behind what X sessionAhh, the "Photoshop syndrome" where new releases mean randomly re-arranging random UI elements to justify a new release.

Anyway, troglodyte garbage rodent UI is troglodyte garbage rodent UI.It's considered generic because Apple's view on "design" is omitting every possible curve and feature possible and distill it to the bare essence of "round corners rectangle"

At least, for the current 5-or-so years, then they'll invent a new temporal fad which every brainless monkey will jump upon and look back their current recalcitrant fads as "ohhh, that was soooo wrong".Same reason people buy Alienware I guess? Or Beats by Dr\u00e9?

Some people overpriced stuff for the brand and/or the deceptive ads that convinced them it was good.What is this shitfaced article having fuck all to do with live-patching.

I was looking forward to maybe _finally_ gain some greater insight into this mystified subject for which there is curiously very little literature out there but nooo, this is some stupid article about SuSE's fucking music videos.

Also, don't start your article using an inferior system of measurements that should've died out a long time ago. It's also "800 lbs" not "800 lb". It's almost like every other community where massive dual standards reign because people are suddenly willing to accept shit arguments when they serve their cause.More like arbitrary fads which cycle in and out of fashion which monkeys only like because they see other monkeys like it as well.Well, that would still fall into the "redemption" part. As in the idea that some people get that they are now past that, memory erasure, clean slate and all.

The first and second episode maybe made it seem like that with all of them being very much shocked with their past except for Three. But they never actually said they were going to change that and they made no real attempt, let's face it.

But, like I said, they aren't Disney villains with evil laughs. Like in real life, people judge, even on the big screen, it seems you more by how human you appear than by your actual actions. People have a hard time accepting that someone who "appears like a nice guy" could actually be a criminal.&gt; Well geez, it's almost like people have opinions about software. If you don't like it and it doesn't suit your needs, that's fine, but many people do like it and find that it fits their needs. Coming here to shit on a perfectly good program and make terrible generalizations is immature and counterproductive.

The point is, like I said, I'm pretty sure people only use MC because nothing better exists and the moment they come across one that is actually good they're like "Gee, MC was actually pretty bad."

I've seen that happen so many times. People thinking bad stuff is good just because better stuff does not exist. Hell, this morning I've seen someone go from "Arch is pretty good" to "Arch was shit all this time, I cannot believe I ever thought that garbage was good" after 4 hours of trying out Void Linux.

&gt; Also, what does "in a GUI in a terminal" mean? 

ncurses and similar stuff. Like MC, it uses the character grid to provide a graphical overview of stuff.

This contrasts tools like `mv` and `cp` which outside of their `--help` functions provide no graphical overview really.&gt; My point is that it's completely subjective and you are being overly negative. I've been using Arch Linux for 3 years now, and I've been very happy with it. I'm sure Void Linux has some very nice stuff in it, but Arch has been serving me well and I'm unwilling to put the effort into switching over to another distro. Arch simply does what I want it to and does it well.

And did you also think that it served your needs well of all the things you used before Arch of which you've now come to realize they weren't that good after all?

Well, at least here it kind of makes sense since to my knowledge Fedora provides for no easy mechanism to reject nonfree software automatically and allows it to sneak in by accident.

Sometimes these efforts are just weird though, apparently there's a totally free version of Gentoo out there, if you want a fully free Gentoo you just put `ACCEPT_LICENSE="-* @FREE"` in your `make.conf` and there's no chance of nonfree software sneaking in.

Same with gNewSense being a free Debian. Debian already makes it super easy to avoid any and all free software if you want.\&gt;soccer

BlasphemyThey really should just give the adventure bosses classes though to make a lot of spells and cards not weird against them.

Just invent something. Make Anub'rekhan a Rogue. Faerlina a Priest, Maexxna a Hunter, North a mage, like, that sort of makes sense because they use a lot of those cards and the theme.How?US English should be avoided on pain of death anyway.

To use US English is to basically condone the death penalty, racism, slavery, war crimes and hiphop music.I'm sorry, I can't hear you, your overweight US obesity is blocking the signal.

Have fun being spied on by your government in your "free nation" l-o-l.You bow to the ignorant Americans?By bowing to the ignorant Americans you implicitly condone homophobia, war crimes, slavery, racism and corporations having a stranglehold on citizens.&gt; older female friend

Great, details are always important. But you forgot to mention her zodiac sign and blood type.Why would you do that? They give +1/+1Thank god they don't. IP bans are super easy to circumvent and can get whole libraries and universities.Mac is the Mac of the PC world.

You remind me of people who think that humans aren't animals.Standard crippleware technique

You'll find that a lot of things which are sold as "weaker" and "better" are in fact technically the same product.

That a company can find such a strategy profitable shows there are some things wrong with the assumptions of the capitalist market.Maybe to do with Eich being forced out.

Turns out that you can still be a good homophobic CEO, who knew. Did you know that Hitler was also an animal lover?

Also, web browsers in general are pretty ugh software. I just wish these fuckers correctly respected my normal qt or gtk theme and looked consistent with all the other crap.No, go full Mary-Jane

Be like "Go get 'em, tiger."No, that's Apple machines with Windows installed on them.Doesn't Debian already do that for you if you don't enable the nonfree repos?I disagree, you correctly identify that each of these hero powers can help a lot, but the main point is you can't decide in advance which one it'll be, or even guarantee you'll draw Mrrgglton.

In the end, a deck has to be designed around its hero power. It's very hard to design an effective deck that works with all those in constructed. You have to really use your hero power with your deck.

For example, most warlock decks include zero card draw outside of their hero power. Actually putting in card draw would be a waste, so if you expect to get the warlock hero power you shouldn't put in card draw, which would kill you if you don't get it.&gt; What ui should we use

One that is designed to not require a rodent plague to operate.

&gt; and what makes this UI bad?

That it's designed to be operated by a rodent plague

Basically, keep your fingers on the home row at all times, do not use the mouse unless there's a good reason, in general be fast and don't be slow, edit configuration files with sed if the change is trivial enough to not have to open it up.&gt; Spend hours configuring it just to get what you want with what you already had with your "rodent ui"

More like spend a short time configuring it to get something that isn't as frustrating as a rodent UI which you spend hours upon hours trying to find documentation for because the entire interface makes no sense and then it still doesn't work

&gt; Have something you don't feel comfortable using, but hey, it's fast!

If you find using rodent UI's "comfortable" and find slowness "comfortable" you should consider putting a gun to your head or at least not procreating to stop littering the gene pool with people who slow everything down.

Slowness being "comfortable", my god, you must take long showers.

&gt; Spend even more time finding the WM that's just right for you out of dozens of dozens of choices. Great!

As opposed to spending an aeternity and never finding anything that is not horribly frustrated because they're all rodent UI's targeting people who can't type with ten fingers or something. Oh wait, I forgot, slowness is "comfortable".

Ever considered that if you work faster you get more done in less time? Just a random observation on how the laws of physics work.
Lol, that's some defence mechanism. This post contains like _no_ actual technical argument, it's a full on paragraph ad-hominem, what's more, it's an ad-hominem completely filled with made-up stuff. It's not even "Personal attack based on observed fact, therefore, you're wrong.", it's, "personal attack based on random made-up shit, therefore you're wrong."

Can you more transparently telegraph you have no actual argument left but are completely oozing with frustration and a need to still have some "rebuttal", you can't even find an _actual_ thing to ad-hominem about to vent your frustration so you have to make them up.

Please uninstall your life.I respectfully disagree with your subjective opinion.I disagree, I don't think Cairne and Harvest Golem were ever that good. People just overvalued them because of the psychological effect that they are "annoying" and thus appear better than they are. It feels really annoying and frustrating that a card comes back and you have to deal with stage 2 as well."value" is, and has always been a buzzword, it was always just a weird word people used in order to be able to use the "hearthstone jargon". "trades well" is a better term that is actually descriptive".

Or that time when Trump became determined to call every single thing "correct" or not, rather than a "good move", he would call things "correct" to the point of using words like "more correct" and "less correct", I'm pretty sure the word "correct" is not degreeable, it either is correct, or it isn't, it can't be more or less correct.So that file contains:

    [D-BUS Service]
    Name=org.freedesktop.Notifications
    Exec=/usr/bin/dunst

for me?

So what libnotify does is it goes through every file in `/usr/share/dbus-1/services/` until it seems one that has `Name=org.freedesktop.Notifications` then it runs whatever is in its  `Exec` field and waits until that process has claimed the dbus name and then sends the appropriate messages to the dbus name to fire the notifications?

Am I getting that process right?Ah, so if I make a file there which claims a name and has an Exec field which contains something silly like "rm  /home/user/test" I can basically hypothetically remove the test file by using qdbus to send whatever to that name because dbus will attempt to run whatever is in the Exec field so that it can claim the name?Most of the support is proprietary software and stuff, I don't much care for that to be honest.

I don't really care for Steam games and all that shit.&gt; In theory, yes.
But Dbus expects the launched program to speak to it in order to receive the message. If you start putting arbitrary commands in dbus' configuration then dbus might get confused, thinking that these processes are crashing before they can take the message or something like that. I am not responsible for any dbus abuse that you take part in. ;)

Yeah, I know, I was just curious about the process by which this all happened. I have no intention to actually abuse it like this. My point was I guess that dbus needs to execute the command first to decide whether it'll claim the bus because namedropping Rice's theorem.

&gt; Some people actually want to take this functionality out of dbus and give it to systemd (the program meant to launch other programs).

Why am I not surprised that some people want to move functionality into systemd...Where "default" means "listed as a higher download on the site"?

My god, who cares about "default". People care waaay too much about default, which the default is is irrelevant.&gt; In particular, some of the terms in the agreement are bad for software freedom and other social justice causes.

Free software is not a "social justice cause", come ooon.

Anyway, these legal terms always seem vague almost by design.&gt; If you think I need documentation for cinnamon or gnome or xfce, but don't with a tiling window manager then you should consider putting a gun to your head or at least not procreating to stop littering the gene pool with elitist assholes who think tiling wm's are for everybody

I have never used the word tiling window manager, I don't use a tiling window manager, where did "tiling window manager" come up?

And you need to consult documentation to make anything _useful_ out of it. Yeah, turns that with _any_ window manager you don't need documentation to keep it default, turns out you never need documentation to keep anything default, bravo.

&gt; Yup, why I use vim. Do I like vim? Yes. Do I think vim is for everybody? No. Am I going to say that nano sucks or nano is bad or nano is a "rodent text editor"? Absolutely not

I never said it was "for everybody". I said it was for people who wanted to be fast and efficient.

And again, I never mentioned "tiling window managers", no idea where you got that from. Tiling window managers are only fast if the objective is well... to tile. Arrange windows in a grid with no overlap. Which I personally do not find an optimal configuration, overlap can be efficient. The problem becomes so much overlap that you can't quickly find or select Windows any more.

Tiling window managers can also be used with rodents by the way, nothing stops you in most tiling window managers to select, move, and resize windows with the mouse by dragging the barrier with the mouse. Which _should_ exist as an option because sometimes it  _is_ faster like when you only have one hand free for whatever reason.I don't make recommendations, too persona and subjective, use what's fast for you, I personally use Fluxbox.

I'm just saying that Cinnamon is a very slow and inefficient UI, but if you have no problem with being slow, which I really can't understand why, then use it. But I'm pretty sure that's not the actual reason, the reason I feel is at hand is that people, as usual, undervalue the concept of investment. They aren't willing to pay something, time, now, in order to save more of it later. Just in general people seem to hate "future-me" and are unwilling to make a concession now for a greater gain later and then rationalize it. 

I think that's honestly what's going on here. People just aren't willing to learn a faster workflow even though in the end they would save time because it does require a temporary investment of time to learn something else.Well, I don't get how you can not "need" to be faster, time is the most valuable and scarce resource there is. The only way when you don't "need to be faster" is if you literally encounter moments in your day that you can find nothing to do. Which is very rare.

There is always something to do, there is never enough time to do anything you want, being faster at everything is imperative.

Especially when they say "I don't have time to configure stuff", that's just as shortsighted as being unwilling to make a monetary investment you _know_ will give you more money later. Take Linus Torvalds as an interesting example. He claimed he had "no time" to set up his desktop and wanted something to "just work", the result: He spent 4-5 years hopping desktop environment and distro until he found something whose default settings were acceptable to him. If he had just taken the time to configure the first one to his liking instead of believing that it should be to _his_ personal subjective liking by default he would've saved himself a lot of time. On top of that, he went on to flame DE's and distros on his blogs for basically having default settings that can easily be changed that he personally and subjectively did not like only for people to tell him "ehh, you can easily change this"Nonono, nuanced opinion, don't assume things, be calculated and objective.&gt; That's different from checking the date and time, though. When I'm working on something I want to be able to glance at the taskbar for a miliecond without having to stop typing. The taskbar stuff is there for things I want to be aware of without having to consciously check every now and then. It's distracting to not be able to keep an eye on the battery when I'm at a cafe

Well, if there are some pieces of information which you like have to watch every 5 minutes, then the space tradeof of permanently leaving them open is probably worth the time tradeof of it permanently taking up space yes.

In that case I would just get a massive systray without a taskbar though, which can also be thinner.&gt; But not everybody is linus torvalds

True, that it happened with him doesn't mean it happens everywhere, but I'm pretty sure that overall, in people's unwillingness to donate a small amount of time up front to configure stuff they are losing time overall, don't you?

&gt; and even if one uses a tiling wm they aren't going to use it fully, most desktop enviroments have basic tiling and workspaces 

There's that tiling wm stuff again.

There's nothing inhaerently efficient about tiling wms, what is efficient is keeping your fingers at the home row at all times and operating everything with that without having to move them.

&gt; and most people are satisfied with their "rodent ui"

people people are satisfied with being inefficient, that's their own thing, but that doesn't change what it is, being inefficient.Surely we can agree that if you are say typing something in window X and you need to activate window Y, then taking your fingers off the home row to click it instead of simply a simple hotkey to activate window Y is going to be _significantly_ faster?

I'm pretty sure that "IDE's" were invented to cope with rodent-based workflows, now you can link and compile your code with a single hotkey inside the IDE, which is fast. Just as a single hotkey to activate the terminal, then using bash history magic to enter the appropriate command and compile it for testing is. Integrating everything into one program to me seems to be born out of the frustration people had with trying having to activate another window with the mouse to compile and do their stuff.&gt; Alt-Tab seems pretty fast imo

The problem with alt-tab is that the window it goes to becomes unpraedictable so you sort of have to stop and think which one it's going to.

The hotkeys I have set up for window switching ar persistent, It's basically mod4+WASD keys to navigate to windows that are left/right/top/bottom. 

In any case alt-tab would be an example of _not_ using a rodent, surely we can agree? I think we can agree that alt-tab is way superior than clicking but even that can be faster.

&gt; Also please stop calling them "rodent' uis, it's annoying

Why?

&gt; Doing control + b is still faster than doing shift + enter to open a terminal, then searching your history, even in a terminal

It is, that's why I have a hotkey bound to common operations within my text editor like that.

The issue is with operations that are not common and require a some-what complex command to execute.&gt; One should not use the laws to create guarantees to special interests.

I'm pretty sure you'd not say this if a law was created to special interests that favour you and your agenda.&gt; but laws shouldn't be affected by such human weaknesses.

I don't understand what you mean with this.For chess yes, for a game with hidden information manipulated by human psyche, I'm not so sure you can speak of a mathematically optimal strategy any more.

The point is, in HS there's such a thing as "winning because you did something stupid" which does not exist in chess. The "correct play" in card games depends on your opponent and what you know of him or her. Not in chess.I got news for you, the vast majority of people don't give a shit about software freedom. But everyone here is always about how that should matter and stuff.

People suddenly care a a lot more about special interests when it's their own interests and then come all the arguments about why others should care more and that it's supposedly in their interest too while they really don't care.It raises a curious point, can you call pid1 a daemon?

Traditionally a daemon has a technical definition on Unix which means it must be a child of pid1 with some other technical qualities. Obviously pid1 is not a child of itself, so if you change the definition you would, it seems to me, always come to a situation where:

- pid1 is always a daemon
- pid1 is never a daemon

Yes?

Also, like many articles, but uniquely enough throwing upstart into it. It compares systemd again to purely sysvinit as if that's the only contender. A lot of arguments in favour of systemd seem to come down to "It's a lot better than the archaic sysvinit" instead of "It's a lot better than all the other modern things like runit, upstart, openRC and what-not".&gt; Not giving a shit about free software != free software being unimportant. Also, I think you're wrong: I think people care a great deal about intellectual property rights, which free software is just an aspect of.

I think you overestimate that because you care.  The vast majority of people alive do not know what free software even is and when you explain it to them would just shrug and say that they wouldn't know how to inspect or modify source code anyway so it doesn't matter to them.

&gt; Yes, this is exactly the point. This is the "human weakness" /u/dvdkon is talking about. Which is why in his opinion, and mine, we should set up systems that prevent parochial interests from dictating legislation.

Of which software freedom magically isn't one?

What I'm saying is, does this also involve safeguarding against your own special interests taking over?So I'm asking again, do you think those systems should also apply when you are trying to safeguard your own?

Because I've noticed people tend to only raise that point when it's the interests of others, not their own, taking over.Be careful sxourgeforge doesn't, they will just randomly dump adware, spyware and software that incorrectly refers to GNU/Linux as just "Linux" into it.

Also, I never got "Orthodox file managers", this stuff can't _possibly_ be faster than just using \u00fee olde, `mv`, `cp`, `rename` and what-not.Oh come on, you don't be, you know as well as I that typically when people say those things they mean "for all special interests but my own" and the number of people here who wish things like free software being a requirement for government dealings and other public sector things is evidence of those.Looks pretty horrible.Why do people always care so much about whom they are "associated' with...

Oh wait, I know why, because people are fucking idiots who will constantly judge people not by the people itself but by the actions of those whom they vaguely "remind" them off. You're basically already held accountable for something someone has done because he or she lives in the same country as you.You mean about the UI?

Too many bright colours and comic-sans esque fonts which look a bit too "childish" to me I guess is the word in general there are too many icons, icons always makes things look like a mismatch because they have widely conflicting shapes and colours that don't integrate well with the overall design. If you want to make an icon set, I feel you have to apply some trick like desaturate it towards a specific colour to at least make it look consistent, that, or create an entire theme around all colours of the rainbow. The theme here seems to go towards deep sea blue but the icons stand out like a the white, short, petite woman in the centre of the all black tall, muscular male group in a gangbang porn scene.I said it looked horrible, I never said it was inefficient. Would need a video of its operation for that.I don't understand what you mean.Ehh, any daemonized processes detaches from its parent and is reparented to pid-1, every daemon in the technical sense of Unix daemon is a child of pid1.

Most modern service managers which use supervision however do not daemonize their services. It used to be the case that _service_ and _daemon_ where pretty much the same thing since the only way to implement services was daemonizing them at the time. Since supervision became the main way of implementing them they are no longer daemons really for the most part. Even though they still carry names like "sshd" while the common way is to _not_ daemonize that service any more. Only OpenRC and sysvinit of any widely used service manager still daemonize really.&gt; Caring about software licensing is demonstrably a cause of interest to social justice because it enables the free sharing of ideas and thus opportunities and wealth. Under that definition it is a social justice cause.

This is not "demonstratable" this is conjecture and theory. This is hardly a scientific fact.

&gt; I take it therefore that you dislike it being labelled as a social justice cause because you disagree with other social justice causes.

Not at all, I just don't think free software has anything to do with social justice, or even justice.

But, even assuming that your conjecture was fact. Then the leading to greater social justice would only be incidental. Basically, it would be like saying that that investing into a stronger broadband internet structure is a "social justice cause" because it leads to better sharing of ideas. That's not the main cause of it, merely a nice unintended benefit.If the parent is not killed then they are not considered daemons.

Obviously this is all "definitions and semantics", but I'm pretty sure the technical definition of daemon which has been age old as well as the verb "to daemonize" very much implies forking, or often even double forking, and exiting the parents:

http://www.linfo.org/daemon.htmlYes, both can be correct, but one can't be "more correct" than the other. That's just what correct means, there are no degrees of correctness, something is either correct, or it isn't.&gt; I think the vast majority of people would care if you explained it to then well enough. It's not like OSS only benefits those who are capable of editing the code them self.

I think this is the idea you only get because you care honestly.

I'm also not convinced the impact of it is as big as say other causes like _real_ social justices causes.

I'd wager society as  whole is benefit more if all free software attentions are redirected to something simple like enabling aequal access education for the planet.

&gt; Sent from my android phone, which is based on Linux (amongst many other open source code bases)

It's also based on a lot of proprietary stuff.&gt; Government investment in rural broadband provision is absolutely about providing opportunities to people. SJW might be a 00/10s term, but social justice has existed since the 1840s.

I then again didn't say anything about rural places. I just said about increasing internet speeds as a whole.

Yes, it becomes a matter of social justice if you do it specifically to give to those who have less. But this wasn't about that, this was just about improving internet in general.&gt; But making software free is making the source code available period, not more available.

Hence it's not a social justice issue.

Hypothetically it would just lead to greater social justice yes, but that's both conjecture and if it happens, incidental.

&gt; I'm not sure your argument about broadband provision has any relevance at all to the open source software is a social justice concern debate.

I'm just listing an example of soemthing else that would incidentally, hypothetically as a conjecture also lead to greater social justice but is not a social justice thing.

Technological advancement in general does.No, not really, the optimal move in chess is the move that will force a win regardless what your opponent does, if your move depends on what your opponent does then it is incorrect.

In the event that a win cannot be forced (this is an open quaestion in chess), then the correct move is the move that will lead to a draw no matter what your opponent does.

In how many turns you can force the win is irrelevant because in chess you don't win "more" if you win earlier. It doesn't count to the eventual score.I would object to this one for the simple reason that it assumes a particular display is used. There is no guarantee you are running under `:0.0`.You can absolutely not add stats like that on death rattle to compare cards, you can't even add it on battlecry.

As an example. A 7/1 that spawns a 1/7 on deathrattle would be _way_ worse than an 8/8.

Likewise, a 2/3 that spawns a 2/1 on death is way worse than a 4/4.

edit: Bonus ridiculous example: a 8/0 that spawns a 0/8, you can't really call that an 8/8 can you?Chess is played with a clock that increaess the amount of time you have with each turn. (Something which hearthstone should do as well really to avoid making roping the optimal strategy). You have infinite time and no turn limit in chess. You just have a limited time for each turn and if you don't use the full time then that stacks to your next turn.That's your conjecture, ask Microsoft and they will argue that because free software is of inferior quality as it has no commercial incentive to perform well to its clients, it will be inferior for education and anything.

Both sides will always come with a conjectured argument like that that happens to suit their own interest, as always.I don't think their arguments stand well either, but since we both use FOSS, obviously neither of us is truly impartial.

They probably think ours don't stand well.I cannot possibly understand this decision, _surely_ just reading the configuration that is normally in `config.c` or whatever it is called from a file makes a lot more sense than hardcoding it and expecting people to recompile it.

Suckless in general has some weird design ideas.&gt; Cairne is a 4/5 that spawns a 4/5. We know the base value of a vanilla 4/5 is 4 mana, because of Yeti. Cairne costs 6 mana to give you, effectively, 2 Yetis at a 25% discount, wrapped up into a single card. Value.

That's not how you can reason about cards _at all_.

Why do you think Novice is a 1/1 and Loot Hoarder a 2/1? Because getting it later makes it worse. A 2 mana card that says "in 10 turns, spawn an 8/8" probably would not see play, you can't just  call that an 8/8 for 2, time is a resource.

And even just getting two 4/5's for 6 mana and a card is stil not the same as getting an 8/10, it's probably just worse. Silver Hand Knight is probably in general worse than Pit Fighter, even though the former gives you 6/6 of stats and the latter 5/6, you just cannot calculate stats like that to calculate the worth of a card.&gt; Wayland : better security and a future proof display server

I always felt Wayland was less future proof and makes more assumptions than X about what kind of desktop is going to be used.

Wayland doesn't let have a portable protocol to communicate with the compositor via say a command line tool similar to EWMH does it? It seems to basically say "Each compositor should implement their own" which is just asking for nonportability. Tools like `xdotool` or `wmctrl` can as far as I know not yet be portably written for Wayland.

EDit: I actually did not always feel htat, I only recently started feelin that after learning more about it.I did not know that, source? Tried googling, culdn't find anything.Yeah, I did, holy shit what a bunch of fucking idiots. I got my answer though after dancing around the issue.

Long story short, there's nothing actually stopping it, it's just not yet implemented. But of course, they're people who constantly have to deal with criticism so the moment you ask a quaestion they assume some kind of hostile intend and that you're there to start a "X is better than Wayland" debate that they probably had a thousand times before so they're purposefully not helpful then.

Apparently asking: "So what's up with there being some "security concern" to portable screenshot tools for Wayland, something like that I read?" is an 'unhelpful quaesetion' according to an op there. Holy fucking shit. But I guess if you had enough people ask you things just to start a shitwar you start to read that in anything.

Edit: Also, the reason is that Wayland isolates apps so that they can no longer read each other's buffers, X does not do this. So a screenshot tool can just read the buffer of other apps to make the screenshot like that.Well, explain what kind of operation would be faster with a twin panel then simply using the coreutils?ITT: The 6 people on the planet with an IQ over 60 that are using GNOME all in one place, magnificent, a unicum in Unix history right here.Yes, I am well aware of that. So my point is, there should be a standard to communicate with the compositor to ask it to move and resize and whatever Windows.

Which isn't there yet the internet seems to constantly imply.

There is no need for tools like xdotool to even be considered "clients" and to live inside the session basically. X treats them as such or rather that is how they are implemented but there is no need.More like, can be easily killed.

There are a tonne of cards who are ridiculous if they are not killed but are meh-to-bad simply beause how easy it is to kill them, this includes Illidan.The vast majority of languages use &lt;j&gt; to denote the [j] sound, hence it is written [j] in the International Phonetic Alphabet.

Surprise surprise, English' spelling is absolutely bonkers, you'll be surprised that speakers of most languages do not actually need to learn to spell and the "spelling bee" would make no sense there since it would be trivial anyway. I learnt how to read and write Finnish in 8 seconds.You can have any DE you want on any distro.

Again, "defaults" are irrelevant, just because Fedora comes with KDE or GNOME by default does not mean it's not trivial to uninstall it and install whatever else you want. i3, Fluxbox, Xfce and what-not, they are all waiting for you in the official Fedora repos.

Again, defaults are fucking irrelevant. It's a one time commitment to 2 extra seconds of time because instead of only installing Fluxbox, you now have to uninstall GNOME as well, or who knows, you might just keep it if you have enough disk space? It's not like the file indexing you pay is a huge.

The real advantages of Arch are indeed the rolling release and that it tries to be KISS which you can like or not like. The paradoxal thing of Arch however is that they traded their indeed very KISS old BSD-style init for the overengineered behemoth systemd. I can't understand how any distro who claims to be about kiss would want to be touch systemd with a 10-foot-laser-pole. Not that I think KISS is a good thing per se, but if you think it's good, I don't get how systemd fits into it at all.I'm just saying, Spanish isn't unique to use "j" for it, English is to use "y"Gee, read above it, my point is that most languages have a trivial spelling system that makes reading and writing it completely trivial.

My point is "it's shit easy to learn to read and write Finnish, every word is spelt exactly how it sounds", that should be obvious.

You too, can learn how to read and write Finnish in 8 seconds if you already know how to speak it.So first you agree that defaults are irrelevant and that's why you like Arch, but now they are suddenly not relevant? I don't follow.

&gt; I thought it was funny how Arch switched to systemd too, but I've learned to like it.

I kind of ehh, I don't know, I thought it was a terrible faux-pas to first advertise BSD-style init prominently as a selling point and then dump it for the polar opposite. One assumes a lot of people who specifically picked Arch for the BSD-style init were not pleased with this move.I can' because I'm way too ignorant to even now what that is or does let alone how to operate it.&gt; it's just that currently everyone is still experimenting so making those protocols standard at the moment would be very unwise.

They standardized a lot of things already, an API to as the compositor to do that isn't much different.

As for the security risk, of course the compositor can, and should be configurable to only allow specific processes to get whatever information.

One good thing of all of this though is that we finally have a hard stop to BS like what steam is doing trying to manage its own windows.Never was, never will be.&gt; To avoid the game becomeing stale,

And to line their own pockets&gt; those are windows names for partitions/devices

No they aren't, they're Windows names for nothing really.

You can mount a partition or drive under a folder in Windows, and you can mount a folder under a drive letter. They're basically nothing more than a restriction that your root folder can only contain folders which are one letter long at this point essentially.They went full flatfish

Never go full flatfish.It's not capitalism as it deals with intellectual property which is inhaerently anti capitalistic. It's a state-awarded monopoly. You can argue it increases creativity, but it's definitely not good for the free market.

The point is, the moment you "compete" directly with a product that is copyrighted you probably violated the copyright. So there can't be actual True competition in videogames like that. You can't just make someone's game, but better and cheaper, then you violate copyright.

You don't really violate copyright if you make the exact same bread but better and cheaper.

Someone else can't say make Battlefield but without DRM and shit and shat and prae-order shit and stuff like that.This is exactly why this "just works" BS is dumb, because when it doesn't work you get _zero_ error messages to help you along.

My advice is to not rely on a "mommy knows best" distro like Ubuntu that tries to shield you from making your own choices and consequently does nothing helpful when all of its fancy autodetect scripts don't work and just use Exherbo.

If the Exherbo install fails _you_ did something wrongly and you get tonnes of error messages telling you what:

https://exherbo.org/docs/install-guide.htmlWhat an unbelievably useless thing.

Make a .desktop application for each game, put it in the category "game" now they're all in one place, am I missing something?No, no one can remake the exact look and feel of BF but better.

If you like BF as a game you're stuck to the DRM. No one can clone BF _exactly_ but without the DRM.

People can do that with a variety of products. Two companies can produce the _exact_ same door but one being cheaper, which one would you buy?

Can't do this with IP. You can make the same genre, but that's how far it goes.&gt; And considering that these are retail consumer entertainment products, they exist pretty nicely in a capitalist system. At the end of the day these are products sold to consumers by corporations. Corporations that exist to make money for shareholders.

I beg to differ. It's clearly not working when games keep being released with so many things that people consider very undesirable about them. But they want to play that specific game so they have no other option.

If you want to play Far Cry 3: Blood Dragon, then some game "quite like it, but not the same" isn't enough, anything close enough for you to actually buy over FC3 if it's slighly cheaper is probably going to touch on some IP laws.Apparently that didn't work eh.

All the magic of trying to obscure people of some responsibility towards their own OS fails sooner or later and then they're stuck because you get zero error messages and you wouldn't even know what to do with them if you got them.

If Exherbo doesn't boot that's because _you_ made a mistake, not because some fancy autodetect whatever thing failed to correctly detect something.Pfah, define "habitable"

Habitable for human beings and earth-like life maybe.I'm just saying it's not to avoid the game from becoming stale, it's just to provide an incentive to keep buying cards.&gt; For a noob, there shouldn't be issues.

Clearly there were, it didn't work, no errors.

&gt; This is the first time I've heard of Exherbo, is it your distro?

Nahh,  I just pulled the name out of a hat. Never really used it.&gt; It sets up emulators, reads the steam database, etc.

Put the steam game into a .desktop application, I think steam does this automatically, and put the emulator into one as well.

&gt; In the future, it will show metadata specific for games, like genre, number of players, etc. This way it's possible to show FPS multiplayer, which can't be done easily with the directory metaphor.

Sure you can, the `Categories=` field is completely open, you can put anything in it you want.

&gt; This is a first step into better support for games, you can see in there they're talking about making joysticks/gamepads first class input devices for GNOME.

What is a "first class input device"?Huh, weird, works here

Try doing it with http instead of https I guess.

Anyway, it's the installation instruction of a random distro.I have no idea, there is no error message. This is the problem with trying to obscure all the inner workings to not be "daunting" what Ubuntu is trying to do. When it goes wrong you don't know what.

Exherbo might be a bit extreme but if you're confident in your ability to read and follow excellent instructions. You maybe should just try Arch as a first distro. Don't take it as an endorsement that Arch is a good daily driver, I think it's terrible but it's a ridiculously good choice to learn how a modern Unix works and how it's all built up as Arch' documentation is second to none.

https://wiki.archlinux.org/index.php/Beginners'_guide

Basically, installing Arch is like putting together an IKEA chair or building a PC. They will explain what all the parts do and more or less let you bolt it together yourself and give you some degree of flexibility to omit the parts you don't want.

Exherbo is that, except that they omit the quality documentation because they assume you already know it, so maybe that would be a bad choice yeah.Yeah I agree, that was dumb.

LFS is probably a better learning experience. Exherbo is kind of light on the documentation.

The big appeal of Gentoo, LFS and Arch isn't just that they force you to learn, but also that they have excellent documentation to enable you to do so.

Gentoo isn't elitist by the way, the users just are. Exherbo is actually a rare example where the distro itself is elitist and more or less on the site says "Don't try this shit if you're too dumb to follow instructions properly."

I actually once joined there channel and asked "So the idea is that if I switch from Exherbo i get to laugh at Gentoo users the same way Gentoo users get to laugh at Arch users right?" and they pretty much all agreed that that was an excellent reason to switch, funny bunch.There we go, that I can use.

Looking at it on google it seems to be a problem that sometimes occurs with apci. Some interface for the motherboard to communicate with the kernel. Apparently people report that just updating the firmware to the latest can fix it.

Otherwise you might want to look into your motherboard settings if you can disable apci for a while or maybe there are some other settings to it you can pick.

Also, in case your motherboard is using EFI, put the boot mode to "legacy" if it supports that."desktop environments" like "distros", do not exist, and that's a good thing, they would exist if they weren't composed of individually decouplable modules that can work with each other, or function alone.

Programs like Kate, or Konsole or Gedit exist. And it turns out there is no rule on the planet that you have to use Kate and Dolphin, you can also use Gedit and Dolphin or Kate and Nautilus if you want.

It would be kind of terrible if they did exist and that wasn't possible.Barbera Streissand effect unfolding before our eyes.I guess the point with Winter is that "the people in charge" keep saying his viewbotting guilt is not actually proven. Including TL. But they never share with us why they think that. My guess is that what's going on is that Twitch can demonstrate without any doubt that Winter is _being botted_, now, does he pay for the bots himself or not is the issue? He obviously denies the latter and how can they prove it really? So they can't ban him.

Now, you say "Just ban him, he's probably guilty, this isn't state action!", but if Twitch did that, then they'd send a message that you can just get someone banned from Twitch by paying 99 EUR for three months to viewbot someone whom you dislike. So they sort of can't.

And lastly, they can't communicate that this is the True reason they don't ban him. Because then they'd raise awareness to this gaping hole in their system and invite more viewbotters.

At least, that's my tinfoil hat theory on the matter.Money and lots of it.&gt; gambling is simply illegal

I wonder if stock investments are too.

The thing with laws regarding "gambling" is that they always have a ridiculous dual standard on what they consider "gambling" or not. Some-how the stock market despite repeated testimonials from statisticians who looked into the matter and asserted it is far more a game of chance than poker is continues to evade it.

The stock market is gambling on the success of a company the same way sports betting is gambling on the success of a player.I really dislike this "GNU/Linux" stuff that GNU is trying to sell. To call an entire OS "Linux" is flatly inaccurate yes. But to call it "GNU/Linux" is only marginally less inaccurate.

GNU's version of events is that there is such a thing as  the "GNU OS" which is missing _only_ a kernel and that Linux fills that last hole. That's _bullshit_. "GNU" is not an OS minus kernel. Not even close. The GNU project has created a variety of important tools that form parts of an OS but absolutely not enough to say it's an OS minus a kernel.

Then comes the point that many "GNU/Linux distributions" use alternatives to various GNU-written software. Some use musl instead of glibc. Some use Busybox instead of GNU coreutils, some use clang instead of GCC.

People are searching for the "ideal name" to group all these Unix-like systems that use the Linux kernel together. And you can't really go further than "A unixlike system that uses the Linux kernel", in fact, the Linux kernel isn't even relevant that much. Debian GNU/kFreeBSD is closer to Debian GNU/Linux than it is to FreeBSD or that Debian GNU/Linux is to Gentoo Linux. So just say "A unixlike OS" really, which is the only group that matters in the end.

There is no good name because these systems are widely divergent. That's sort of the product of free software isn't it? They are software distributions composed of software scraped together from a plethora of sources packaged together into a working Unixlike environment.

OpenWRT calls _itself_ "GNU/Linux", that's kind of weird for something that uses uClibc instead of glibc and busybox instead of GNU coreutils, like, what of GNU is still left therein?

So really, just say you use "Debian" or something like that. It's far more accurate. The "GNU OS" does not exist, they set out to write one, and so did others, and eventually _others_ realized that different organizations had written different parts of functional operating systems they could throw together to have something that can host itself. And GNU and Linux as hell aren't the only ones encorporated.

Hardly, Blizzard shut down a Chinese HS clone which stole no assets and had a different name but otherwise was _really_ similar mechanically to the point of the mechanics of many cards, with different artwork, just being copied.Why not just:

    pkill -STOP cat

?My expectation is that it'll be a dumb, hand holding stupid "mummy know's best" distro that will work against you making your own choices.

It'll still be better than Arch Linux, the king of "You are not allowed to make your own choices" because it'll most likely offer you at least a choice of init system.&gt; I used 1999 because I picture most arch users to be about 17 years old.

...and cue the random ageism.

I'm pretty sure there's no Unixlike system on the planet whose average or median age is at 17.&gt; roughly 10-40% depending on the distro

Apparently 9% of a modern Ubuntu system in lines of code is GNU, 8% is the kernel.

&gt; The key point however is calling it GNU/Linux forces the point of Free software.

If that's the case that would be a pretty silly reason for the GNU to tell people they are some-how "wrong" to not do so.

&gt; Minor note, GNU with a Kernel is an operating system - just not a very complete or very user friendly one. Everything on top make it a 'modern' OS but don't forget the roots it comes from.

GNU with a kernel will kernel panic at boot because it can't find an init system. In fact, it will not attempt to boot because it lacks the low level firmware.IT'S VULVA, NOT VAGINA.

The vagina is the tube leading to the womb, it's not visible.

The vulva is what is externally visible.

It's like calling a scrotum a prostate.Quite so, by spelling it like p\u00e6dantic.

P\u00e6dantic is like the _one_ word which deserves to be spelt like that, that and pr\u00e6tentious.Half of the OSL players boycotted it at the time simply because KeSPA did not let its players play in the GSL. It wasn't even "their fight" and the OSL didn't make the decision.

It was just the only thing they could do to hurt KeSPA so they took it. And sure enough KeSPA relented.Where "biggest competitive scene" is in this case a tournament with a total prize pool lower than what goes into the Ro16 of "WCS Non Korea" alone despite it being far easier. And on top of that it's super top heavy.

They don't lose that much money out of it.A lot of errors I spotted in this:

&gt; Your computer\u2019s startup or boot process begins with the BIOS (Basic Input / Output System) software on the motherboard.

Apparently Fedora does not support EFI? Doubt that's the case. EFI is not some kind of subform of BIOS. They are both a subform of firmware. This is as weird as calling kFreeBSD a subform of Linux.

Then again, someone over at /r/pcmasterrace shared the horror story of some IT teacher calling the Windows cmd.exe "Linux" and generally seemingly living in the idea that Linux is a name for "command line".

&gt; The init system is the first process started on Fedora after the kernel starts. In fact, the init system always gets the Process ID (PID) of 1 on a system. This process is always executed by the Linux kernel after the early stages of bootup are completed by the BIOS and bootloader (GRUB).

This is sort of a matter of semantics of "define init system", but hey if Fedora wants to define the init system as everything in pid1 so be it. _a lot_ of systemd exists outside of pid1 and as a separate process though, but have at it. Apparently for sake of this discussion, "init system" which is pretty vague, and pid1, which is extremely clear cut are the same thing.

&gt; The init system then must start all the necessary daemons, background processes and services required to make the operating system work.

The init system (defined as pid1 here apparently) "must" do no such thing, all it has to do is keep running forever and in the case it generates zombie processes reap them. A perfectly good init on most systems would be a file just containing `while True ; do sleep 1 ; done`.

If the first process started ever stops then the kernel panics, other than that it doesn't need to do much. To say that it must start all the necessary background processes is weird even in systemd since that already isn't done by pid1 any more. Pid1 is nothing more than an entry point for your operating system, the program that "gets things going and keeps running forever to collect the garbage of its descendants". The init itself doesn't have to start all the necessary daemons, the daemons don't even have to be started without user intervention. The init in practice starts another program that starts the necessary daemons on modern systems.

&gt; After initialization, the init system stays running, for as long as your system is running

I'm pretty sure the init system (again pid1 in this discussion) is shut down by the kernel before it itself is shut down, at after which the firmware (apparently called BIOS by this literature) is shut down.

Fun fact, the part of the system that I have that starts and monitors the necessary daemons is pid 2500 currently.  Not pid1. But hey, whatever floats your boat Fedora Magazine.__Couple of reasons why one might choose Arch over Ubuntu:__

- KISS principle. Arch likes to keep things as simple as possible, you can like it or not but that's what they do, tools that are not "overengineered" are often easier to understand and work faster and have less bugs. The downside is that they are not as featureful and have less options. It's fairly easy to learn how to make a pacman package compared to a dpkg .deb package. This means Pacman resolves dependencies slightly quicker than dpkg because the dependency system is not as complicated, conversely dpkg can handle more complex dependency logic than pacman which you _almost_ never need.

- Rolling release, this is different from bleeding edge, but Arch has no "versions", only the software in the repos.

- Arch is an additive distro, rather than removing what you don't need you add what you do to a minimal base. In practise this allows you to get the system you want more quickly I find. The downside is that you have to know what you need. Ubuntu mostly just throws everything you could possibly need to make sure you have what you need.

- AUR is centralized opposed to PPA's, meaning that there's one place to look rather than many so it's easier to find what you want, there are some arguments against centralization though.

- Arch as a policy keeps patching of upstream software to a minimum and only does it to avoid breakage. There are again arguments to be made for either direction.

__Couple of reasons why one might pick Ubuntu over Arch:__

- Lack of KISS principle, Ubuntu's solutions tend to be more engineered and cover obscure use cases more having Debian as their parent and inhaeriting most of their system tools.

- A versioned release cycle, this places certain guarantees that all packages within one version work well together. Arch being a rolling release binary distro is also more or less requiring users to always update their system at once rather than in parts to ensure it keeps working. Arch more or less requires you to perform an update of all your stuff before you install a new package to ensure it all works well as a rolling binary distro. As a versioned binary distro Ubuntu does not have this problem.

- Ubuntu is a subtractive distro, for the most part you remove what you don't. This guarantees that the system at least boots and more or less works before you start cutting into the fat. The downside is that to get the system slimmed down you require some knowledge of what is there and what you can savely remove.

- PPA's are not centralized, anyone can host their own. This means that names are not given out on a "first come  first served" basis. Since they are each just dpkg repos unlike AUR which hosts build scripts they are indistinguishable from other repos in the end. There are some arguments in favour of centralization though.

- Ubuntu's policy is to patch upstream software to improve it. There are arguments to be made in either direction for this though.

Yes, I did that on purpose.A lot of package managers are supported by `checkinstall`. Which is wrapped around it, so you do `# checkinstall sh autoinstall.sh` and whatever is installed by it is then automatically packaged via the package manager.That honestly sounds like something was wrong with your Debian or Fedora.

GNOME should not lag on 4GB of ram and a Core duo.

Maybe you had 32 bit on accident?That people actually think it's the DE that does this rather than calling something lower level is part of the problem.&gt; it

This part implies it is one single identifiable OS, it is not. It's a "family" of loosely related unixlike environments that are scraped together from different sources to the point that "Debian GNU/kFreeBSD" and "Alpine GNU/Linux" have almost no common components any more.

So basically, your praemise contains a Falsehood.&gt; GNU is ported to Linux, not the other way around. If anything it should be called Linux/GNU.

Yes the other way around. Linux was written from the start to host the GNU tools _by_ the GNU tools.

GNU was never ported to Linux, Linux could host GNU tools from the start because it was designed to. It was written as a kernel for the GNU.That depends on whether or not your bootloader is GRUB.

In any case, you need _a_ bootloader. So by your argument, you don't run Linux, you run whatever your bootloader is.&gt; GNU/Linux is certainly the correct name

Why?

Did you know that if you attempt to build an OS from only GNU and Linux parts it'll kernel panic you because it can't find an init?Ehh, not really. GNU is responsible for 9% of the code in a modern ubuntu, linux for 8%. Those two by far dwarf any other contributor, the next one is like 2%. GNU in Ubuntu is responsible for:

- The bootloader, GRUB
- The shell, Bash
- The CC, GCC
- The libc, glibc
- The coreutils such as sed, grep, ls etcI don't know all distros. Obviously something source based. Things like Gentoo, Exherbo, Funtoo, Crux etc.

Stuff is written and packaged on Gentoo and Exherbo with the expressed intend of nontight integration and platform agnosticism allowing you to more easily replace parts.&gt; arch gives you the literal minimum you need

Except of course a fully enabled systemd with all the bells and whistles turned on at compile time as well as its swath of heavy dependencies like dbus.Why is a makefile more praedictable?

Makefiles are Turing complete, I honestly never got the existence of Makefiles. If it was some non turing complete declarative language I could get it. But it's just another shell script-like language essentially.sshfs has got to be the simplest syntax I ever had to learn though.

     sshfs user@remote-host:/path/to/dir /local/path/to/mountpoint

Like I was actually genuinely surprised when I looked up how to use it how _simple_ it was. I was expecting all sorts of mount options I needed to set.It honestly keeps amazing me that those people who actually use GNOME and Cinnamon and all those fancy GUI applets actually exist on this sub. I always assumed that those efforts were for people who switched from Windows within the last 3 weeks and still needed a "familiar environment" or something like that.

Those people certainly don't seem to exist on IRC. But then again, maybe people who are afraid to use a cli are hesitant to use IRC or something.I find it kind of interesting how "DE" is basically synonymous for "Fancy useless GUI applets" while there's no real reason for that. A Desktop Environment in theory is nothing more than a collection of software that was designed to work together and look and feel consistently.

There's really no requirement for that to work with weird GUI applets.Golden rule of reddit when a topic asks for your opinion and you give it and it's negative then it'll be downvoted of course.

I contributed to the discussion by definition by answering "What are your expectations", but meh. imaginary internet points.No, not really, where did you get that idea?&gt; I'd also read these insightful replies[1] by /u/viccuad[2] 

For the record, I despise Arch and KISS and think Arch is a terrible implementation of Kiss but that reply is _really_ biased. I tried to keep mine neutral.

I agree with the ironic status of Arch as "minimal" yet having super bloated "take all or none" as a package philosophy where they really don't split up packages as much as they should though.

Debian following the KISS philosophy is utter BS though, not that I think that that's a good thing overall but it has its merits. Any idiot can learn how to package with pacman in minutes. dpkg is a looot more complex to try to understand.&gt; So, in a way, we're enabling the very thing that we are trying to undo.

I'm pretty sure that people who licence under permissive aren't trying to undo proprietary software. They're just okay with people using their code.They clearly should've called it iNode, and made it white with rounded corners.So Wayland is literally systemd and no one complains?Define "most important one".

It seems to me that whatever component when missing stops the OS from booting and running is tied for "most important one", in that sense I don't see how it's more important than a libc. Also, Linux couldn't be compiled without a libc or cc.There is a real life _address_ linked to battle.net accounts?

I know they have a fake name I once gave them and they still mail with me with that, but I'm pretty sure I never gave them a fake address.&gt; His comment it not about intentions but options.

Okay, so it's not about intentions.

&gt; If you give the permission to close the thing down then you give that permission. 

Agreed.

&gt;  If your goal is FOSS and you use a permissive license your code is FOSS, but it give the option to make it proprietary.

Right, so it's not about intentions but "goals" do play a part.

Okay fine, then their "goal" is not to eliminate proprietary software.



They, or at least Theo, has correctly noted that statistically the chance is higher that the improvements are shared back when proprietary software gets a hold of it than when the GPL gets a hold of it. Which seems to be True.This article talks like the kernel itself can't be replaced, which it has been, see Debian GNU/kFreeBSD.

In the end, they are all just components that are scrabed together by different distributions to get a fully functional unixlike system. People like to call it a "family of operating systems", I disagree with that, they act like it's some-how one thing. It isn't. There are just a bunch of possible components floating around in FOSS land that have been bolted together in widely different configurations to get a working unixlike OS, that's all.&gt; Rolling release; well not really a pure rolling release but a temporarily pinned, well tested kernel and drivers combination with always updated user-space packages on top.

No, because rolling release on a binary distro means they have to do what Arch does and demand that the user constantly upgrade all his or her packages to the latest. Which effectively makes it indistinguishable from versioned except that the version-slices are really short. Arch is the _only_ "rolling" binary distro  (or its children) for a good reason. It was based on Crux which is rolling and source based, rolling is extremely common on source-based systems and its major advantage is that you can pick which packages you want new, and which you want old. This can happen on source-based systems since they just compile against your current fundamental libraries. On binary distros you are met with a problem that can only be resolved it seems by forcing users to sync every package to the latest in the repos before installing anything, which takes away 75% of the advantages of a rolling system.

&gt; Snappy packages; related with the first item, these packages will have their own self-contained dependencies, meaning it becomes easier to follow a rolling model. Who knows, this might even be appealing for some software corporations to port their offerings to Ubuntu...

No, I think this is garbage.

&gt; Unity 8; finally an actual independent DE rather than simply a GNOME shell, this time built with Qt5/QML2. More easily targeted by cross-platform software and apps.

No, I think it's a good idea that it's just a plugin for Compiz actually. But I would not use Unity on Ubuntu, did you know that is possible.

&gt; Mir; nothing really exclusive here, same advantages as Wayland - no more tearing, better graphic performance, compatibility with X apps via XMir.

I know nothing of Mir.

&gt; Convergence; the promise of the same apps running on different devices and screen sizes. There are already some demos showcasing this ability. Desktop software on mobile devices and mobile apps on desktops.

If that's the case then they will run badly on both.

&gt; Mobile integration; SMS, phone calls, notifications, seamlessly flowing between the phone and the desktop.

Irrelevant to me, I don't have a mobile phone.

&gt; Privacy assurance (compared with Android, iOS, Windows); The new default instance of the controversial online Amazon search results is now opt-in, and hopefully it will remain like this in the future.

That would just be displacing the problem, I use google every day and I have no idea if IRCd's are collecting the private messages I send on them, my firmware may contain backdoors etc etc, so beating one soldier of an entire army doesn't do much in the end.No, EFI has a bootloader built into the firmware.

In which case you shouldn't say you run Linux, but EFI.Nothing I said has anything to do with mainstream. Maybe you should actually read it. Hell, 1/2 of it is "This is irrelevant for me / I know nothing about this". The biggest argument was that I don't see binary rolling releases working and that I think Unity as a plugin for Compiz works fine.If "how many people are working on it" means "more important" then any project that has largely been finished is unimportant.

It for instance means that various small projects which cannot run without X are more important than X because X has pretty much ceased active development a while back.

Same story with glibc, at some point a libc is just pretty much done and requires only minor maintainance.Source?

I wonder why the FSF did not clobber them around then.Even if I were to think they are human garbage. I wouldn't agree with it.

Just like I think it would be dumb to Noneify Muhammad Ali's titles if he was a convicted serial child rapist. He may be human garbage then, but he still won that boxing tournament.

It's an unrelated issue. If they didn't break Afreeca's rules they should not be banned for breaking someone else's rules.

I mean, should they banned from streaming as well because they didn't behave well in primary school and broke the school's rules? Whose other rules is Afreeca going to enforce and whose is it not?On the other hand, I think people who make "I agree" posts should be banned from streaming on Afreeca, especially when they do it to me.

You just gotta hate your ego being bruised when retards who find it necessary to make "I agree" posts shared your opinion. There's nothing quite as harming to my elitism as idiots sharing my awesome opinions.How does whether or not the software exists in flash memory on the board or in Flash memory connected with a SATA port on an SSD drive make a difference?

Because that's literally the only difference.No that seems about as dumb. If people want to see it then people want to see it.

It's not ESPN's responsibility to enforce other people's policies and cut into their own business doing so.Of course they have done it as a business decision. The point is that KeSPA and others assert the have soe kind of moral obligation.If you're talking about lines of code as importance then chromium is obviously the most important thing out there.That's sort of the point of "even if ..." isn't it? It goes to show it has nothing to do with the severely of the crime.Well, I'm pretty sure that a copyleft project taking permissive code has _never_ given it back and gave an exemption to the permissive project to use it.I loove bm'ing when I cheese for that reason, especially when it's still so close that the other can still win. Like 40% of the time you lose and look like a fool but it's all worth the massive rage in the 60% that you won.

I just loooove saying "ggtfo" or "offensive gg" in the middle of an all in. When you win it feels all the better because of it.It's KeSPA and the teams that entice young kids though. KeSPA definitely is guilty of creating a climate most conducive for matchfixing.

A lot of these "progamers" get no salary, just a place to stay and sleep and food. They on top of that serve as part of the cleaning crew and they're just glorified practise partners. The teams actively nurture their dreams that one day they too can be as big as Maru or sOs while the teams know damned well for most of them that'll never happen just to get cheap labour on.

The Korean scene is disproportionally top-heavy by design as well. And you can argue these 16 year old kids who are lured in with dreams of becoming the next Jaedong and throw their education away are effectively performing child labour. 

All in all, they breed a climate where the temptation of matchfixing becomes hard to resist.&gt; (companies contributing to OpenBSD vs Linux) indicates otherwise

That's an entirely different thing. He's saying that when GPL takes _their_ code they never get it back whereas when proprietary software takes it they sometimes get it back.

What you talk about is when companies take GPL vs permissive, which is a different situation.I find all these "benders" in Avatar to be quite amusing.

Obligatory rant about US culture though, when something in some other dialect of English is innocent and used as such but offends people in the US everyone in the US loses their shit about foreign media but in other places people are just "Yeah well, it doesn't mean that in US English so they don't mean that with it." and move on.&gt; Ubuntu 15.10 introduces stateless persistent network interface names \u2014 a technical feature that, for most of us, has little bearing on how Ubuntu runs.

No, these things are _super_ annoying if you're not some company having to deal with a million ethernet cables in a rack. Most home computers just have eth0 and wlan0 and thus no need for this, but I can certainly see what it's good for.This whole idea of two distros existing that pretty much only differ in their default DE install has got to be the most monumental waste of effort on the face of the planet. What you really should do is invest effort into making an installer that lets people chose it. Like Antergos is basically Arch + installer plus some _really_ minor changes and some extra repos. Would it not be better to not "fork" Arch but just make a third party installer _for_ Arch? The differences in the end with the actual product would be minimal and you'd just end up with Arch + cinnamon installed or something.

Of course, then all the oldschol ARch users would have to feel obliged t say "I run arch, and I did not use the Antergos installer project but did it manually." to keep their creds, but that's a minor price to pay.

Apart from that, it just spreads the idea that we're living in Windowsland where the GUI is soldered fixed to the bootloader with a kernel and init system in between as adhesive.Hmm, that'd kind of mean your interface would be like eth5 and you keep asking yourself why I guess.

But hey, there's definitely good reason for this. But as it stands mine are already persistent because I have exactly _one_ ethernet port and exactly _one_ wlan chip like most people.

I would say `net.ifnames=0` as kernel param to the rescue, but then I remembered that Debian and its parthenogeneses are very fond of constantly running `grub-mkconfig` and butcher your `grub.conf`. But maybe there's something you can set in `/etc/grub` to retain it.Semantics, you know that with "getting it back" and "taking it" he respectively means getting modifications in a way that allows him to put it in his project and by "taking" he means copying. Technically nothing is being _taken_ either but we both know what he means.

The issue is that the companies _sometimes_ provide the modified and improved code to him again with a licence (or no licence at all or even transfer copyright to openBSD) in a way that allows him to merge it back upstream. Whereas with the GPL that has _never_ happened to my knowledge. It would require the GPL to provide an exception purely for OpenBSD.Lighter, works with all, no unecessary fragmentation. The difference is that the end product you end up with is \u0385Ubuntu with KDE" not "Kubuntu", the differences between both being absolutely minimal so you can merge support efforts for instance.

I mean, try to get support for Funtoo on the Gentoo IRC channel, they will direct you to Funtoo's IRC channel which is much smaller while the differences are absolutely minimal. And the differences between Ubuntu and Kubuntu are even less. Daniel Robbins has said that he wouldn't even consider Funtoo a "fork" of Gentoo as much as just a variant with different default settings.&gt; You have not looked far. Linux has a lot of BSD-licensed drivers that remained BSD-licensed.

So how does this speak of permissive licenced code being forked into copyleft code and then given back to the original permissive source?

You just told a story about how someone forked permissive code into permissive code so it can be given back. That's sort of  Theo's point isn't it. He's not talking about that when Linux people use his stuff he doesn't get it back, he's talking about when the GPL or another permissive licence is wrapped around it.That it beats Tor browser shows the uselessness of this poll.

It might as well be called "What's your favourite browser".&gt; Lighter in what way? Certainly not the iso download, the way you propose it would be huge to accommodate both DEs and all of their apps.

Why would that be in the ISO, it downloads that from the net.

It's practically a shell script that just sets it up.

&gt; But there is the rub, the Ubuntu folks don't want to start supporting alternate DEs, but they are nice enough to coordinate with other folks who do. Thus Kubuntu. I'm really not seeing the problem you have with it.

They already do. KDE, Cinnamon and what not are packaged by Ubuntu and within their repos. Just because you use Ubuntu doesn't mean you have to use Unity, it's purely a default.That's irrelevant, Theo's argument is about _when_ permissive code gets pulled into copylefted code, not about how often it occurs.There's a subtle difference between "who is the most trustworthy" and "whom do I trust more" though. In this case, you can't answer ifsomeone whom you've just met is trustworthy. If you don't really know someone the proper answe risn't "That person is not trustworthy" but "I don't relaly know yet."&gt; He's also conveniently forgetting the case where the copylefted code simply links the permissive code and they contribute to it, without forking in the first place. That's also more likely than forking because of the same tl;dr as above.

Again, that's irrelevant for the discussion which is about _when_ it gets forked into copylefted code, not about how often it happens.True, that's also a solid use case.

My point isn't that these persistent network interface names are  a bad idea in general and have no use. But that "for most of us it has no bearing" is flagrant BS.

It has very real uses, but if you don't use it it creates impossibly long to remember and annoying names.My point is that Antergos is garbage _because_ it tries t be its own distro rather than an installer frontend for Arch.&gt; First part is speculation(And is easily disproved because dual licensed kernel modules is a thing), second part is wildly inaccurate and shows you don't really know how this works at all. The GPL doesn't have to do jack about it, the original copyright holder can release it as both GPL and BSD. Others can't do that, but that's not really something the GPL has to or even should care about.

Christ, _again_, you come with an example of Permissive code being incorporated into.. permissive code.

Is it really that hard to see that obviously dual licensed code which Theo can just take because of its licence is obviously _not_ what he's talking about and that he's probably very happy when people do this?

What Theo is _obviously_ talking about is that he's happier when his code is absorbed into proprietary software than into pure GPL software.

Dual licensed code has no bearing on this situation. You're talking about a completely unrelated situation to switch Theo is talking about.You know you can effortlessly upgrade your old Kubuntu without needing to go through a new live CD right?I would love t see a souce on that "guest" and "friend" stuff.

As far as I know, it just means strange, foreign and alien.Because it's 99% Arch Linux except with a different installer, so why not just make it an installer frontend for Arch instead of its own distro?

Kubuntu is like 99% Kubuntu is my point so why make it a different distro with split support resources when you can just make it an installer that results into Kubuntu with KDE.Basically, a while back Hearthstone fucked up badly, a lot of people had to wait like 6 months on content they paid for. And they were told in no uncertain terms by Blizzard that if they charged back which should be their damned right after that their _entire_ Blizzard account would be frozen.

The point of chargebacks is so you can do this and if the chargeback is fraudulent the company can go after _you_ rather than in reverse. But big game publishers nowadays circument the system by deliberately "conveniently having all your games in one place" so you can never ever do a chargeback out of fear of using your entire library you paid quite a lot for. So you have to go after _them_ rather than in reverse.

Suing  a mammoth like Blizzard over 30 EUR worth of Hearthstone Naxxramas content, even if you win, is probably not worth it, and they know that.

One of the reasons I do not like "buying" games on Steam, they tie the games you "buy" there to one giant account with a TOS that tells you they can pretty much freeze it for any reason including disliking your face.Am I the only one who by the way thought that the Brutal difficulty is actually _hard_ this time? 

Like, the second mission I did while massing voids, after observing that  they had very little AA. I'm not sure I could ever do that mission by just getting a large enough army and not cheesing that lack of AA. The escape part in the third also took several tries.

The first mission I failed like 10 times, but for some reason I thought you could only make stalkers, sentries and zealots. I did it in three tries after realizing you could make immortals. But man, these missions have gotten pretty tough after complaints that WoL and HotS brutal was too easy. I basically only died in the last mission on WoL brutal.

Edit: THat shortcut and suicide run at the end though, I was wondering how you'd made that time limit._whom_ you get*Someone didn't go to Oxford, clearly.And surprise surprise, it doesn't say that if it's _not_ automatically generated by `grub2-mkconfig`. It says "do not edit this file" because it's going to get overwritten if your distro is set up like that.

From the GRUB2 documentation:

&gt; grub-mkconfig does have some limitations. While adding extra custom menu entries to the end of the list can be done by editing /etc/grub.d/40\_custom or creating /boot/grub/custom.cfg, changing the order of menu entries or changing their titles may require making complex changes to shell scripts stored in /etc/grub.d/. This may be improved in the future. In the meantime, __those who feel that it would be easier to write grub.cfg directly are encouraged to do so (see Booting, and Shell-like scripting), and to disable any system provided by their distribution to automatically run grub-mkconfig.__

The `grub-mkconfig` script creates absolutely inane configurations putting everything it vaguely recognizes as an OS in there. It also falters hard when you share boot partitions between installs and cyclicly overwrites each with the other then. Writing it by hand creates very simple configurations that are far more solid. `grub-mkconfig` purely exists because for some reason Debian doesn't chase out people with torches and pitchforks who lack the ability to learn how to write a manual config which is _really_ easy. That `grub-mkconfig` generates such absolutely overcomplex configurations has also spread the misconception that its configuration language is extremely difficult to understand, which it is not. I'm sure you can understand my config easily and anyone just looking at it without even ever looking up how the syntax works:

    timeout=2
    default=1
    
    menuentry 'vmlinuz-4.1.6-ck + /dev/sdb6 + sysvinit' {
    	set root='hd0,msdos2'
    	linux	/vmlinuz-4.1.6-ck root=/dev/sdb6 ro text rootfstype=ext4 net.ifnames=0 quiet
    }
    
    menuentry 'vmlinuz-4.1.6-ck + /dev/sdb6 + runit' {
    	set root='hd0,msdos2'
    	linux	/vmlinuz-4.1.6-ck root=/dev/sdb6 ro text rootfstype=ext4 net.ifnames=0 quiet init=/sbin/runit-init
    }
    
    menuentry 'vmlinuz-4.0.6-040006-generic + /dev/sdb5' {
    	set root='hd0,msdos2'
    	linux	/vmlinuz-4.0.6-040006-generic root=UUID=44bc11b6-2c77-4a25-abec-dbb41307cc8f ro text quiet
    	initrd	/initrd.img-4.0.6-040006-generic
    }
Certainly not, my point is that most companies are _worse_ than this.

G2A leans far more to the side of the consumer than Valve and Blizzard, no doubt about that.A single frothing won't be as buffed up. Part of buffing it up was because the patrons had charge and could split massively before the whirlwind effect.That feel when Ubuntu users have a newer kernel than I.Please, only Queen's English here.And ironically enough, that's a problem with copyleft, not with permissive.

The ironic part of copyleft is that you often can't even mix it with _other_ copyleft if they have incompatible terms. Different permissive licences of course mix freely with each other.

Copyleft is typically phrased as "cannot be incorporated into proprietary software", and that's merely _one_ of the things it cannot be incorporated into, the actuality is "cannot be incorporated into a myriad of licences that are just slightly different from our own, including FOSS software and even other copyleft software" You can't even put GPLv2 code into GPLv3 code, you can in reverse I think.Hmm, to me, only the last mission of WoL brutal was a massive difficulty spike and the only one on which I died.

The mission before that were all pretty easy.Oh yeah, I forgot, that one I also failed once. But near the end I realized I went full on multiplayer mode and had 90 probes so my max was shit.

Next time I stayed around 50 probes, spammed cannons and colossi, cannns take no supply and essentially built no air and purely relied on the air I got and it was an easy win.Well, I'm having fun and my opponent is frothing at the mouth "Oh my god, you did not just offensively gg me.", so yeah, who wins here?

The best part is when they get so mad they float their buildings and postpone defeat and you can actually see them still controlling and trying hard to postpone it as much as possible while they're wasting their own time and the mere imagination of someone being so mad to actually do that is more than enough to make mine worthwhile.&gt; So when the company goes out of business after the failure of this gimmicky trash, the servers are going to shut down and you'll be left with an inoperable device?

Yap, kind of like the Steam people here love so much for some reason.

I know Gabe made that comment about if Valve ever goes out he'd release an anti-DRM patch, a lot of people have pointed out he probably isn't even legally allowed to given the agreements Valve made with other companies.Fair point, but there's plenty of software or games who implemented always-only DRM ketracel-white mode for the sake of it with a lot of the entire game logic of single player games running on the servers just to make it super hard to crack.

Legitimate customers who are screwed over when the servers are down, temporarily or permanently are just collateral damage of course.To be honest, I'm more frightened by the horror stories of people being denied access to their Steam account to then mail Support and after 2 months get a response in Russian that google translates back to "VAC denies not from account undo" than anything G2A could saddle you up with.That doesn't contradict my claim, I'm just talking about the collateral damage.

That the GPL and other copyleft licences not only excludes proprietary software from incorporating but also other FOSS including other copyleft is not an opinion, that's a fact.You can build tempests that mission?

Maybe I should actually check the tech tree out.&gt; I often install Kubuntu for people who don't have internet access at that particular location, so I'm definitely glad there is an installer with everything necessary on the image.

Doesn't the installer say "You must be connected to the internet"?

Anyway, let's say this argument flies for Ubuntu, it still doesn't fly for Arch since I know for a fact that installing Arch requires internet. And even if Ubuntu doesn't, you can just create a CD which installs "Ubuntu with KDE" rather than "Kubuntu".

My point is that "Ubuntu with KDE" is sooooo similar to "Kubuntu" that it's really not worth having a separate brand name and distro for and thus split support efforts and all that stuff. 

&gt; Kubuntu isn't really a fork of Ubuntu, it's just a different installer with a different default set of packages (which is basically what you proposed)

Except the part where it has its own IRC channel and if you ask Kubuntu support in #ubuntu they direct you to the much smaller #kubuntu. If you had asked the exact thing but lied "Hi, I use Ubuntu with KDE and how do I ..." then 99.99999999999% you could've followed their instructions to the letter on "Kubuntu" and it would've still worked.I always find the definition of "quick" of people who don't use the commandline often to be adorable.I think you and I have a very different definition of "sad" where my definition seems to mean the exact opposite from "having a very good time", which is what I'm having when I do this.

Not sure what yours is,  but I'm pretty sure that Merriam-Webster stands with me here.If this game had a man's interface instead of one for boys you'd just type `find -type n | xargs mark_read` into that search bar and get it over with.You have no idea by the way how hard it is to repair a broken system time since all this https everywhere stuff even if you don't want it. As in, my situation 8 months back:

- "Huh, I can't reach half of websites, how weird, let me google these error messages."
- "Huh, I can't reach google, how weird, let me ping it"
- "Huh, I can ping it easily, what's up here?"
- "Oh I see, my computer thinks it's 1970, I geuss that's what you get when you're soldering in the main board, I geuss it screws up with certificates, easy fix."
- "Let me just google how to set system ti... oh wait."
- "Manpages eh, that takes me back"
- "Ahh, so that's how you do it, I had no idea date could `set` time as much as get it.

It's kind of interesting how reliant you've become on search engines for trivial problems.

And no, I didn't know how to set system time, come on, how often do you need to actually do that. I don't even know how to set my location, it's something you do one time on install and then never again.No, it would be faster than typing new and hovering over all the cards in all the pages.Yes, I sometimes forget the median target audience of this game is confused by more than 9 deck slots and people who are smart enough to play it professionally are by and large incapable of acquiring 40 of the right pack-type at first try.&gt; Even ignoring how unimplementable your version is

How is it unimplementable?

&gt; I would argue that in most cases, typing three letters and flicking the mouse across the page would he faster than your method.

One page?

If only, try 7.&gt; Because end users don't want a console, they want a search bar. Why would you require knowledge that relatively few people have to use a product designed for mainstream mobile users? The point of a user interface is to allow users to access the program easily and with little, if any, specific learning. A search bar is intuitive.

You and I have every different definitions of "unimplementable".

Anyway, this hardly agues against my point that it's faster, it just argues that the HS userbase is too retarded to like a fast solution, which I agree with, that is why we have daddy Ben Brode t look after us to make sure we don't get too confused.

&gt; 7 pages of new cards, all at once? It's an extreme fringe case that someone acquires that many cards without using any of them, and even in that case, the situation would tend to show that the user doesn't have a want to instantly remove tags from all non-viewed cards.

It's extremely common when you buy 10 packs from either cold or new money

&gt; and you're trying show that the programming subculture is superior 

command line is not the same as "programming"

And as far as time saved goes, hell yeah it's superior. It's absolutely hilarious to watch people solve things by clicking around in some clunky graphical file manager and spend 2 minutes on something that can be quickly executed with a simple command in 10 seconds.

That is why again, I find the definition of "quick" these people use to be adorable.What I always find amusing is how there seem to be a lot of people who say "But you can also use torrents for legal stuff." seem to absolutely not buy it when the exact same argument is used in defence of keeping gun ownership legal.Define "native" here?

Some window managers do, some window managers don't. Did you know you can swap out "shells" on Windows. There's a port of blackbox for Windows which includes workspaces.

The "Why use Linux" list is honestly retarded. Some of which are "Depends on your definition" some of which are plain False.&gt; You are so far removed from normal social interactions if you think people are retarded for not wanting to using a very unintuitive string of letters and numbers into a command prompt.

"social"? Come on.

No, I don't interact much with people who mouse too much, if that's what you mean.

&gt; Seriously, in what world is that practical.

In the world where fast beats slow. Nothing in my post implies anything about what the average user wants.

Like I said, the average user is sloooow and I find the definition of "quick" of the average user adorable, that's all.

The average user is also amazing at putting words into people's mouths.&gt; It is unimplementable because it makes that piece of the application unusable to the vast majority of the target audience.

That's not what "unimplementable" in programming means. It means that there's some theoretical reason the problem can't be solved. A program that parses Perl in the general case is unimplementable, this is not.

&gt; You don't understand what you're saying. The point of a user interface is to simplify things once so that they are easy to be used intuitively by the users.

This has like _nothing_ to do with the quote you quote and purportedly respond to.

&gt; Why anyone would replace a search bar of all things with a command line is beyond me.

Because some people aren't dumb idiots who can barely operate a computer and like solutions to be fast rather than slow?

&gt; There is no reason to do so.

Except the speed afforded of course by a general purpose command line which can do anything.

&gt; There is no reason to do so. The search bar exists for one purpose, while a command line is used for many. Hence, the search bar is optimized for its task, which is finding relevant information (cards).

And it's still slower at this than a command line. With a command line you can filter whatever result you want, want all cards that have between 2-4 attack and cost 5 mana that are rare? Commandline has your back.

&gt; No game developer would ever force its users to learn relatively esoteric knowledge to use its basic features. They understand, unlike you, that the division of labor in society means that, surprisingly, not everyone has to know how to do everything!

Of course they wouldn't, sadly, video games by and large are played by a technophobe audience who's so incompetent that more than 9 deck slots "confuses" them and they mistakenly buy 40 classic packs when they want to buy GvG packs.

That still says nothing about how slow the current solution is, it just says that the audience of this game by and large is too dumb to not get confused by a faster one.

&gt; Having all cards opened from packs, even duplicates, is a bug. Replacing a search bar with a command prompt to fix a bug is ridiculous.

If you buy 10 new packs after an expo or just in general, even without this bug you'll get 7 pages at least.

&gt; My apologies. Your command line culture pride is also silly when you try to laud it over others as some sign of your superiority.

Of course it's superior. We get things done a lot faster.

&gt; Having a check box in the settings menu to turn off "new" tags is a way to implement your idea, without it being completely unusable by the majority of customers.

Again, this "unusable by the majority of customers" has nothing to do with my point and just affirms my original statement of:

"I find the definition of quick of people who don't use the commandline often to be adorable"You two are awful, awful parents.&gt; You cannot use a gun to do anything other than hurt another being

Yes you can. It's something that propells a projectile at high speed, you can use it for fun shooting at a target in your back yard for one. Sharpshooting, like darts and archery is a sport enjoyed by many, and guess what, lobbing a darts dart into someone tends to have bad consequences for their health as well so really, what's the difference?

A darts set and a gun is pretty much the same thing, it can be used to main someone or to have fun testing your hand-eye-co\u00f6rdination. But one is legal and the other isn't.

For the record, I'm anti gun. I just think this whole argument of "It also has legitimate uses" is quite often a dual standard.No, you put words into my mouth by saying that I claimed the average user wants to remember specific commands, which I never claimed.

I just said that those who don't have an adorable definition of "quick", as in, they do it the slow way.I subscribe to the theory that there is nothing on the internet kids of any ages shouldn't be able to see.

That pornography somehow gives children brain damage or whatever is a pretty big myth. I'm always extremely sceptical when people say that something is bad or damaging using such generic terms but don't say in what way exactly. Like what damaging effects does it actually have that have been researched? It gives kids depression or something?Just like guns have legitimate uses. But let's be honest here, the majority of bits transferred over Torrents probably belong to some file whose copyright does not allow the transferral to take place."On Ubuntu"This is the guy that has repeatedly made extremely personal and emotional blog posts about Ubuntu right?

If that is the guy, doesn't strike me as someone having the skin required to manage such a project to be honest.Because it's not clear what they mean/

When you say "I run GNU/Linux"I have _no idea_ what kind of system that is.&gt; I'm pretty sure there's a lower bound somewhere where kids just shouldn't be exposed to explicit sexual material outside an educational or medical setting.

Shouldn't to avoid _what_ effect and did you conclude that based on scientific evidence or what?

"shouldn't" is a pretty vague term, again, what do you think is actually going to happen when they are exposed. Simply saying "It shouldn't happen" without saying to avoid what effect just reeks of some morality-based gut feeling more than anything.&gt; Did you? I'm at work and don't have the time or desire to research the subject, but I don't really want to debate the age-appropriateness of porn or whatever.

Yes, there is no indication that watching porn correlates with mental conditions o any form.

&gt; just because you personally think porn doesn't affect kids negatively.

Depends on what you call "negatively" to many US parents, their children displaying a natural biology and gaining an interest in sex once their reproductive organs start working is a negative thing.I always find it amusing that people liken Free Software to "communism", like it even has the word "Free" in it. Any form of intellectual property is anti capitalist in nature, it is the state granting and protecting a monopoly, it goes against a free market. Now, you can argue whether or not a perfect free market is good or bad. But there is no doubt that a perfectly capitalist free market would not have any concept of intellectual property whatsoever. The more permissive your copyright, the more capitalist with public domain the most capitalist of course.

Of course, in common parlance, the terms "capitalism" and "marxism" have basically been polluted to "for big companies" and "for the people" respectively. While in reality _both_ are for the people, they ultimately have the same goal, to benefit the people, just different philosophies on how to achieve it. A capitalist believes that by free competition the people are ultimately benefit as companies are forced to fight for clients and therefore serve them the best. A Marxist will believe that collective ownership will ultimately benefit the people most.&gt; I still think Divine Favor is a bad card design and really frustrating to play against. Punishing players for being cautious with their resources on one hand and rewarding players for dumping their hand and having card disadvantage one the other just feels wrong and imbalanced.

I disagree, there are many situations in HS that invert what is commonly an advantage and I feel this is a good idea, otherwise the game would just be too simple:

- Usually your opponent at low health is good, except against handlock
- Usually having a big board is good, except against doggies
- Usually drawing cards is good, except against fatigue decks
- Usually buffing the attack of your holy champion is nice, unless you're facing a deck that looks like it has BGH in it

And all these decks heavily rely on threatening to turn a disadvantage into an advantage, otherwise they wouldn't work&gt; He's always held that no proprietary software can be trusted. Windows 10's shady behaviour proves his point.

Turning existential into universal quantification does not a "prove" make.&gt; so capitalism both exists and doesn't exist, great logic..

How does this follow.

&gt; I'm always amused by the redefinition game used to deflect criticism by saying it's not capitalism.

No, free market is the _original_ definition of capitalism. The redifinition is "standing up for companies.

&gt; here's a history lesson :capitalism was the name given to the phenomenon, not some utopian dream.

And this is not about a result, this is about a system of how a country can operate, for better or for worse, I never said capitalism was a good idea, I just said it meant the state involvement in the market being minimum.

&gt; oh hey you're that dude that thinks pedophilia is funny right? lol

Yes, just like everyone else in that topic told you to man up and take a joke.I never said torrents should be banned.

I just remarked upon a dual standard where people suddenly seem to drop the "There are also legitimate uses" argument when it doesn't suit them any more.&gt; I'm a woman you shitface.

What does that have to do with anything?

&gt; so who according to you originally defined capitalism? this is going to be great

The word "capitalist" is obviously ancient, its use for a means of production today was started/popularized by Marx who pretty used use "capitalist means of production" to mean just that, a free market where production is governed by people's own selfish desires to obtain more capital. The capitalist school of thought is that this is a "good thing" basically that will benefit everyone.


&gt; and so you don't believe there has ever been capitalism? do we live in feudalism?

No, there has never been a perfectly capitalist or perfectly communist state. Thank god for that, most state recognize that extremes are seldom a good thing and employ a model some-where in between. Even the US takes some intervention into the market at timesCiting _one_ example as evidence to that NO proprietary software can be trusted does not prove, it does not demonstrate, it does not evidence, it does not make a compelling argument, it does not even make a _weak_ argument.

This is like saying one post mentioning Hitler on the internet proves that every single discussion sooner or later is going to mention Hitler.&gt; The argument is simple: if you can't see the source code, you don't know what the program is doing. If you don't know what it's doing, you can't trust it.

That's not the argument, that's a completely unrelated argument. The argument I'm criticising here is "There is at least _one_ piece of proprietary software that can't be trusted, this proves that ALL proprietary software can't be trusted,."this is a fallacy. It mentions nothing about source code at all.

Furthermore, your argument above is a Falsehood, it assumes that there is no proprietary software of which you can see the source code. This is False, software can be both proprietary and open source. In fact, for sake of argument I will _prove_ Stallman here wrong here with a _constructive_ prove, I will construct at least one piece of proprietary software that can be trusted:

     #!/bin/bash
     
     # check if downloads folder exists and is a folder
     if [[ ! -d ~/Downloads ]] ; then 
       echo "No downloads folder?" 1&gt;&amp;2 
       exit 1
     fi

     # remove all non dotfiles
     # we loop to ensure we don't pass more arguments than the kernel can support
     for x in ~/Downloads/* ; do
       rm -r "$x"
     done


Copyright, all rights reserved. I hereby licence anyone to redistribute the above program free of charge.

The above program is proprietary, because it does not allow you to modify the code or fork it, yet it can be trusted as the source code is public and visible. Thus establishing at least a single example of proprietary software that can be trusted, thus disproving the statement that NO proprietary software can be trusted. Q.E.D. Checkmate atheists.

Edit: Furthermore, your argument contains another fallacy, it assumes that the _only_ way to gain trust in a program is to view its source code. This isn't True because you can, if you have a lot of time, also verify the machine-code in the end and there are probably enough other ways to gain trust in the functionality of a black box whose inner workings you can't exactly decipher.THat's circumstantial evidence, it's like saying that Red Hat can't be trusted because they have a commercial agenda.

trusting in this sense one assumes means that you can be sure it does what it says it does. Not per se that it does the right thing.

There's such a thing as trusting someone to do the wrong thing you know. You can say "I trust you'll make a mistake."I'm pretty sure Uzi's are then again illegal pretty much everywhere, the gun control debate is exactly about being able to own guns that can be used for recreation.

Besides, it's legal to on your own property in many places  pretty much blow up a tree. So if you just want to launch an RPG into a tree for the laughs of the explosion on your own ranch, that seems like a legitimate use to me.We're already doing that.

A lot of games rely on a lot of server-side logic.

The thing is, that as soon as networking capacity becomes fast enough to make this acceptable for actual things tht nowadays go over PCI like actual desktop effects. Then at that point the communication inside the hardware has been improved to go so much faster that it's no longer acceptable.

Current internet is a lot faster than than even register reading speed of computers 30 years back.And this argument can just as well be used to argue why Torrents should be illegal is my point.

My point isn't whether or not guns should be legal or illegal or whether torrents should be legal or illegal which you seem to make it. My point is the dual standard of the argument. You see the same people who at one point raise "But it has legitimate uses too, so you can't outlaw it." suddenly don't buy the exact same argument any more when it works against them, it est, a dual standard.

The _real_ argument of course is "I use torrents, thus I want them to be legal" and "I use guns, thus I want them to be legal". Virtually any other one is just ad hoc.Any one for which all the hardware is supported by the kernel, I don't know.No, the same argument can be applied in both cases. The argument is "If _x_ can be used for illegal things but has legal uses, then _x_ should not be illegal.", yet it is applied in one, and not in another.It's pretty clear that for the purpose of this discussion "can be trusted" means "can be verified to do what it says it does"No, this is the _argument_.

If you say that more things play a factor then the argument never was. Then the argument was "If x can also be used for illegal things plus a thousand other reasons, then ...", but that's not what they say.

They say the reason they supposedly think that torrents should be legal is because they have legitimate uses. My point is that that is not the actual reason, the actual reason is in fact nothing they could ever possibly hope to express cognitively, it's a gut feeling.You can tell from "personal experience" that pornography gives children brain damage?

How can you _possibly_ have had enough personal experience to tell from personal experience alone that kids get brain damage from pornography? You have "personal experience" with enough people exposed to pornogrpahy at an early age to make it a decent sample size/It's about bandwidth obviously, not latency. The point is it's only like 8 or 16 bits per 1/1190000 second.I'm pretty sure the probability of mentioning my greying hairlock approaches 1 if it goes on long enough.They are, how does that in any relate to my point that when someone says that Torrents should remain legal "because they have legitimate uses" but somehow is against banning guns that person is having a dual standard?

You seem to have some kind of trouble reading the structure of an argument outside of the context it's currently applied in.Well, the author makes the fallacy regardless because the author says that Windows proves that "no proprietary software can be trusted".

The point is that "one case where x applies" does not prove "x always applies".

That's kind of you know, the kind of trivial elementary logic they put on IQ tests to test if you're not completely mentally retarded. Anyone should see it, and this is also why they always use nonsensical placeholder names like "flubs" and "prots".

It turns out that when you use actual references to real life concepts but use the exact same logic people suddenly stop being able to see elementary logical fallacies as long as they want the conclusion to be True. I'm pretty sure that the author of that post is in the general case able to see that you can't turn existential quantification into universal quantification. But as soon as you make references to real life concepts people will hold on to whatever fallacy and turn a blind eye when it serves to corroborate their agenda.&gt; because the argument does not exist in a void.

Not making an argument in a void _is_ a dual standard. It's the same thing.

If you say "I think this because of Y" but you consider other things than Y as well that make you not reach the same conclusion in places where Y also applies that's a dual standard.

Letting context influence the conclusion while _claiming_ that the logical argument is what made you arrive at it is a dual standard. The context is what the standard of the argument is, if the context influences the argument then you apply _two_ standards to the same arguments depending on the context, that's what a _dual_ standard is.

If you have a single standard you always consider the argument the same.It doesn't matter what he or she says Even if he or she said it was green. The argument is invalid simply because of the transformation of an existential qualifier to a universal one?

Seriously, /r/linux is pretty fucking inept at logic at times. I'm currently tied up in 3 different separate debates on this sub where people  are individually seemingly incapable of seeing the difference between the logical structure of the argument being fallacious and agreeing with the conclusion or not.

There's such a thing as agreeing with a conclusion but still recognising the logic itself contains a fallacy, you know that right?Um noo, that's what my argument at the start was:

&gt; What I always find amusing is how there seem to be a lot of people who say "But you can also use torrents for legal stuff." __seem to absolutely not buy it when the exact same argument is used in defence of keeping gun ownership legal.__
&gt; tourney

The only word on the face of the planet that makes me want to punch its users harder in the face than "telly".It doesn't work like that, you have to _believe_ it to harness the True power.I have honestly never in my life met anyone who seriously played assassin's creed.

Everyone I know really doesn't get it and considers it a super boring game.Oh come on, we all have things people do that make us want to hit them in the face at times. For some people it's making certain noises while they eat, for others it's nails on a blackboard.I disagree "tournament" is , "tourney" sounds like such a ridiculous diminutive for something which makes no sense to regard as something small to begin with. It sounds about as weird as "Championshie" instead of "championship". I also for some reason never see anyone use it outside of esports.\&gt;not basically making your PC a bunch of hardware lying on shelves that are screwed to your wall.The point is that by saying "I don't think torrents should be illegal _because_ they have legitimate uses.", you put it in a vacuum, that's just the meaning of the word "because". If you say that you imply that having legitimate reasons is the _sole_ reason needed to not make something illegal.

If you consider the context you don't think that torrents should be legal _because_ they have legitimate uses, you think they should be legal for entirely different uses on top of that.So how exactly would anything in this video be different if it was KDE running on Ubuntu instead of Kubuntu or even on Slackware or Fedora or even BSD?

I mean, this is just a "KDE Demonstration" surely. The host unixlike environment that runs it has absolutely no relevance here methinks._number_ of protocols*

"Protocols" is not a mass noun. Do not make baby Grammar Hitler cry.I suspected this for long but I could't find anything on it, I always found the Chromium memory thing overrated.

To expand on what is written above for those that care. On Windows, new processes are created via the spawn syscall. This creates a new empty process which is later filled to to speak. On Unix, every process except the first one has a parent. A process is always created by first making a copy of its parent and then altering the copy. This might seem insane but creating a copy of a process is actually cheaper on Unix than creating an entirely new empty process on Windows. Copying a process is called forking it.

The added bonus is if a process needs to be highly similar to its parent they in fact of course share a lot of resources and memory between each other. However very often what is used if the child needs to be completely different is a combination of first forking, and then issuing the exec system call which replaces an existing process with an entirely different one. Fork followed by an immediate exec is basically the same as Windows spawn. Except for some reason I don't understand it's _still_ cheaper in practice.

I don't know if it's actually True if chromium on Unix actually implements multiple browser tabs by forking an existing tab as this would require a significantly different codebase between both environments for making new tabs.Or be Japanese but don't care about retarded customs.

Linus never struck me as someone who did something arbitrary because he saw everyone do it.

Then again, as I say it he smiles when a picture is taken, so scratch that.Am I the only one by the way who noticed that Terrans seem to care a lot more that their favourite players play their race while Protoss and Zerg players seem more fine being fan of players of other races?

At least, I'm seeing a lot more comments here by Terrans implying they take some value in someone playing Terran or otherwise having a Terran as favourite player than for Protoss and Zerg players.&gt; A smile doesn't hurt and does make you more likable, so why not?

So do many things he flagrantly, brazenly and proudly violates on the LKML though.Then the argument makes absolutely no sense and no example is needed at all as proof. In that case the argument is purely rational with no empirical evidence and Windows 10 as an example serves no purpose, an example isn't needed.

Note that if that was the argument, which in my opinion is really filling in a looot of guessing which wasn't in that sentence. It's still wrong, or relies on a fallacy, that proprietary software can never be verified. The old rule of "All free software is open source, but not all open source software is free" applies. It's perfectly possible to have non free open source software. You may inspect and verify the code to be certain that is not malicious. You may even compile the code yourself. You just can't use the code to make derivative products. The above hypothetical example of a software licence is open source, but not free software but is still something that can be trusted.&gt; If all proprietary software were perfectly non-malicious, then you could say all of them are trustworthy. So providing a single example was needed.

Not really, the argument you propose works regardless of a single piece of malicious proprietary software existing, as I said, it's rational, malicious proprietary softawre need not exist for the argument to work, it just needs to be theoretically possible that it exists.

Even if not a single piece of known malicious proprietary software was found, the argument would still work with "But you can never know if there are malicious pieces of proprietary softawre which we just haven't found out about yet.

&gt; Your second point is irrelevant and a red herring. Being able to modify the source code has no effect on its trustworthiness. __In terms of trust, the only thing that matters is being able to inspect it.__

My point is that there is proprietary software whose source code you can inspect. Therefore not _all_ proprietary software is untrustworthy by this argument you are making.Source on that? Because [this](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Proprietary_software) article does not claim any of that

The GNU and FSF themselves (as well as that wikipedia article) partition software into "free" and "proprietary" all software is either free or proprietary and never both. Any software that misses one or more of the four freedoms is proprietary.

http://www.gnu.org/proprietary/proprietary.en.html

Apart from that, copyright does not cover the right to inspect code. You have the right to inspect code the moment it lands under your eyes. There is no legal mechanism for companies to stop people from reading any leaked information nor do you commit a crime or a civil wrong in any jurisdiction I know of when you do so. Copyright does not cover the right to inspect source code. A company merely releases their code, or not. (or it is leaked)

Proprietary software whose copyright is a standard all rights reserved licence but otherwise freely publishes its source code for inspection and academic use would be trustworthy but proprietary.

A good example of such a piece of code was the Minix 1 OS as well as various other things written by AST such as the Amsterdam Compiler Kit. Its source code was open and public but it wasn't free software and therefore couldn't be used by the FSF. RMS himself wanted to use the ACK for the GNU OS but couldn't because it wasn't free. This serves as a pretty strong example of nonfree software that can be trusted which thus invalidates RMS' own claim that NO nonfree software can be trusted by the rule of a single counter example needed to disprove a universal quantification.The idea is to treat encryption like firearm possession, as in, you are already guilty when you use it regardless of what you hide in it because they can't find out _what_ you hide in it.

I mean, it's not a completely unfair point, courts for a long time have relied on being able to subpoena records of companies and people for processes. The thing with encryption is that you can just encrypt it, they can then force you to turn over the key but there are various encryption schemes that don't work like that such as being able to encrypt multiple things into something and decrypting it back depending on what key is offered. So you can give the key that provides something innocent while you hide the real classified evil documents.

Basically, you can argue that if you give citizens a right to encryption that's the same thing as giving them a right to not be subpoenaed to turn over their records to the courts. Which is definitely an argument you can make. But the system that exists right now that you can be subpoenaed to turn over records, _unless_ they are encrypted in such a way is a pretty arbitrary line. 

That said, it just displaces the problem, because there are again encryption schemes that hide shit in plain sight that doesn't even _look_ encrypted but like actual, so they don't know if you actually encrypted anything. In the end, politicians are very fond of wanting things from technology computer scientists will tell them is theoretically impossible. And the phrase "theoretically impossible" is often translated in the brain of a politician to "We're just not trying hard enough.", some comments I saw by some pretty much make it clear they don't understand the implications of a mathematical proof that says it can't be done.You and I take the word "prove" to mean different things I see.

So tell me, does your magnificent line of thought here also fly say when one girl sucks at math to then conclude that _all_ girls suck at math? Or can you only use this line of thought on proprietary software?&gt; shrug Obviously it doesn't refer to a mathematical proof, you're being pedantic. Do you complain about the use of the word "prove" in courtrooms too?

Like I said, it's not a proof, it's not strong evidence, it's not compelling evidence, it's not even weak evidence, it's note ven a remotely argument.

It finds _one_ example and uses that to jump to a universal trend. This is like a nanometre above finding no example at all. If only it was just not a mathematical proof but otherwise a strong compelling argument I wouldn't have jumped in, this doesn't even deserve entry in the lowest barriers of evidence imaginable.

&gt; wat

Let me paraphrase the original quote in the article to drive the point home:

"He's always held that no girls can be good at math. My mother being absolutely terrible at it proves his point."

Absolutely ridiculous argument when you change it like that yes?&gt; Dennis \u201cTaKe\u201d Gehlen is a legend within the esports community. 

Yes, but only because the esports community loves to exaggerate and give out sobriquets like "legend" or qualification like "extraordinary" to basically almost anyone who's ever done anything within esports.

&gt; It grew notorious for having some of the most risque content in esports\u2014including players getting lapdances on stream\u2014but also had some of the most entertaining SC2 matches around.

That that isn't happening any more sort of shows the dangers of esports growing to the point that angry mothers get a say.


&gt; We aim to cast the best matches in the world

He says, after continuing to invite "local heroes". I mean, if that's your schtick, fine with me, it's your tournament, but let's be honest here and not act like people watch HSC for the exceptionally high level play.

&gt; and it typically includes 32 players from all over the world facing each other in StarCraft II.

No, it typically includes 32 players from North America, Europe and Korea.

&gt; The goal of the apprenticeship program is to give people various experiences to help them understand what they want to do. So we give those people the opportunity to work in multiple areas in our company. Mainly, that\u2019s going to be production of shows and events, but there\u2019s also project work with partners, video editing, and editorial work.

I'd love to know if these apprentices are getting paid, if it's in the negative then the convenient side effect of free labour is conveniently omitted.&gt; You're just ignoring the meaning of "trust"

Quite right, the meaning of trust is completely irrelevant, no matter what trust means, a single example cannot prove a universal trend.

&gt; and the context of the whole thing

The context, likewise, is irrelevant to the point that a single example does not prove a universal trend.

&gt; When one of the largest out of a relatively small group of commercial operating systems vendors demonstrates that it's willing to violate your privacy to further its own interests, it's irrational to trust any of them. And when you can't trust the OS, you're fucked - you can't trust anything.

So you just called it homogenous but now you concede that there's one thing fundamentally different about MS, it's super large.

Have you considered the fact that smaller proprietary software might be more trustworthy because it has far less to gain by selling your stuff and also that it needs to earn your trust to compete whereas MS is so large that it can afford to not care about that any more?

&gt; Right. You changed in a way that made it both ridiculous and unrelated to the original statement.

I kept the logical structure identical. You just find it ridiculous now because you now disagree with the _conclusion_.

There's such a thing as agreeing with a conclusion while realizing the argument itself is garbage you know. You think I think proprietary software is to be trusted or something? Of course not, I just think that that argument of "proof" given there was one of the most absolute garbage arguments I have had the displeasure of reading in quite some time.

Have you like ever in your life come to a point where you recognized that someone made a garbage argument to substantiate something you agreed with?You must be from the US.RIP neurons of unclutter users.You even have democracy and freedom of religion. Mad jelly.Like I said elsewhere, there is such a thing as open source proprietary software. Free and open source aren't the same ting.I never got this obsession with protecting people from their own stupidity.

I praefer to let them make their own mistakes and learn from it, and laugh at them and say "Ahahaha, told you so." when they do.\***********

Huh, how does this work, I still see my own password here? Did you trick me?2GB of RAM bro, 2 GB of RAM, that's the issue, not the registers. In fact some things go faster in the CPU if it runs in 32 bit compatibility....hoow?

The crime itself in that case is using encryption, they have to still prove that you use encryption.&gt; That said, it just displaces the problem, because there are again encryption schemes that hide shit in plain sight that doesn't even look encrypted but like actual, so they don't know if you actually encrypted anything. In the end, politicians are very fond of wanting things from technology computer scientists will tell them is theoretically impossible. And the phrase "theoretically impossible" is often translated in the brain of a politician to "We're just not trying hard enough.", some comments I saw by some pretty much make it clear they don't understand the implications of a mathematical proof that says it can't be done.&gt; is that it only shows relevant settings to you. So, for instance, it won\u2019t have a Touchpad section if you don\u2019t have a supported touchpad device, and so on\u2026

This just makes it harder to fix things when their fancy detection features don't work properly.

Anyway, more silly Windows-like BS to make it "easier to switch", GNOME 3 uses a binary configuration format right? Not particularly impressed with any of this stuff.&gt; No it means that we make those "fancy" detection features work all the time. Like how good software should be written.

That's impossible, it will always rely on certain assumptions about both the hardware and the software already installed that just aren't always there. You see plenty of support quaestions lying around on this stuff where people are dumstruct of something not working because hey, no error messages or useless ones.

&gt; Honestly, a platform from top to bottom should all work together.

I take it you and I both agree that whatever does this silly mouse menu should in no way work together with the implementation of WPA you use.

&gt; If every project starts writing ways to get around things broken in upstream we are doing it wrong.

Gee, I guess the dependency on systemd that some people have managed to write things to get around was doing it wrong then. Speaking of working together.

Not that I agree with that though. But you cannot _assume_ stuff will always work.

What if there's _hardware failure_, have you thought of that? what error messages is someone going to get then to correctly diagnose the problem? That person just sees nothing there, and is confused and doesn't see the cause. That person has no idea what is broken then.

Edit: To get more comprehensive, what if any of these things happen, is the result different and if so, how am I properly informed of what is wrong:

- the ZIF in my notebook isn't connected to the touchpad
- there is actually damage on the mainboard which stops the touchpad from working
- the kernel has been wrongly configured to not support the touchpad
- the kernel has been correctly configured, it just doesn't support the touchpad I have yet
- I assume that this system relies on udev, if it doesn't scratch this point: udev is not installed
- udev is somehow broken, some part of it is corrupted on the filesystem requiring a re-install
- the permissions in /dev are set wrongly

So you tell me what's going to happen in any of those cases which stop the touchpad form working properly, does it just "not appear" or do you actually get a useful error message that helps you know where to look for a fix?

I re-iterate "just works" is a pipe dream, a marketing gimmick, it is fundamentally and theoretically impossible to achieve, it will _always_ rely on some assumptions and when those assumptions aren't met it won't work.[this](https://www.reddit.com/r/linux/comments/3q226o/gnome_new_mouse_panel/cwbjsmk)

Day in day out someone comes into an IRC channel asking for help and everyone ignores it or just bluntly says "Give error messages." when they come with something vague like "I have a touchpad but GNOME 3 doesn't show me touchpad settings."

Error messages are essential when stuff doesn't work, a simple "Not there" when it can't detect a touchpad is insufficient. Say _why_ it's not there, can't it detect it at all, are the permissions not right, where in the hardware is the failure, is the hardware there but not the correct kernel settings?

This "just works" philosophy falls flat on its face when it _doesn't_ just work. And you can find so many stories over at /r/pcmasterrace of people who "tried linux", something didn't properly work like touchpad or audio or keyboard leds and they quit not realizing that probably a simple change would make it work, but how are they supposed to know that without proper error messages?TIL Satan listens to heavy metal. What does that have to do with each other.I never got how Nix is some-how special. They say you specify your system in a declarative way and then you run a command to make it so. But how exactly is that different from say just updating your world file and your flags in Portage and running `emerge -auND @world` and I'm sure there's some place in any package manager where it stores your selected world set?The point is, the system can't _know_ if it's an error or intended. The system doesn't know the difference between the touchpad actually not being there or the ZIF simply not being connected or the drivers not being installed on purpose because there is no touchpad or by accident and there is one.

The system goes through several stages to check if there's a touchpad where it needs success in the older stages to go on. But it doesn't tell you at what stage it concluded there wasn't one, thus not helping you when something is broken.

At the very least, it should tell you _for what reason_ it has concluded there is no touchpad to help you on your way when there is one but it's not showing up.Indeed it doesn't, but that's not what they do, they show nothing about touchpad at all, no section.

The section should rather than _nothing_ contain. "There are no touchpad setttigns, the system couldn't find a touchpad because ..." and say when and where it concluded that there isn't one.

Apart from that, it _doesn_ make sense, these settings are persistent and get activated _when_ you plug in a touchpad, while it's obviously highly esoteric to want t some-how control it before you plug in a touchpad. For instance someting more realistic, wanting to turn the headphone volume down before you connect your headphones is definitely something that has a massive use case and should be possible.

All and all, in True GNOME tradition, they make too many assumptions about people's use cases and systems.&gt; In the vast majority of cases in which the system doesn't detect a touchpad, there simply is no touchpad.

Yes, but errors occur, let's not kid yourselves, we all had a situation where something did not work and at that point we all wanted to know why so we could fix it.

&gt; the only thing it could say is "the system couldn't find a touchpad because it couldn't find a touchpad". I'm sorry but I don't find that particularly helpful.

This is just patently False.  The last time my touchpad didn't work when I used synclient it gave me compeltely discriptive error messages which quickly made it obvious to me the kernel was wrongly configured and the hardware was fine, and I can also recall a case where the kernel was fine but the ZIF was not connected and again, the error messages made it perfectly clear to me what the reason was, no device found.

Whatever governs your touchpad is perfectly capable to tell you the reason it has detected no touchpad other than "Couldn't find a touchpad", the detection system goes through many stages and steps